Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB533.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
3 Section 1. The projects authorized by the General Assembly in this Act
4 constitute the official 2026-2028 Biennial Highway Construction Plan.
5 Section 2. Whereas the funding for these projects is provided by the
6 Transportation Cabinet Budget Bill, which takes effect upon its passage and approval by
7 the Governor or upon its otherwise becoming a law, an emergency is declared to exist
8 and this Act takes effect upon its passage and approval by the Governor or upon its
9 otherwise becoming a law.
10 Section 3. The 2026-2028 biennial highway construction plan is as follows:
Page 1 of 244
BR136900.100 - 1369 - 130264 - 4678v Jacketed

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Adair 4325 KY-1702 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-1702 IN ADAIR COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 58,000
Project Cost: 58,000 0 0
Adair 22207 LN-9008 ADDRESS CONDITION OF Louie B. Nunn Cumberland Parkway FROM PL
MILEPOINT 43.02 TO MILEPOINT 48.15 DN NHPM 200,000
RW
UT
CN NHPM 2,000,000
Project Cost: 0 2,200,000 0
Adair 80003 KY-55 KY 55 NEW TURNING LANE AT BETTY'S OK COUNTRY COOKING. PL
(18CCN)(2020CCR) (2022CCR) (2024CCR) DN SPP 450,000
RW SPP 1,420,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 450,000 1,420,000
Adair 80200 KY-55 IMPROVE SAFETY AND MOBILITY ALONG KY 55 NEAR DOC'S PL
MARKET. (2022CCN) (2024CCR) DN SPP 400,000
RW SPP 1,260,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 400,000 1,260,000
Adair 80351 KY-55 Provide access into Green River Commerce Park along KY 55 to PL
promote economic growth in Adair County. (MP 16.6-16.75) DN SPP 200,000
(2024CCN) RW SPP 790,000
UT SPP 8,100,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 200,000 8,890,000
Page 2 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Adair 80352 KY-55 Improve mobility and congestion along KY 55 from US 127 in Russell PL SPP 400,000
County to the Louis B. Nunn Cumberland KY 55/KY6177 in Adair DN SPP 7,560,000
County. (Russell MP 0.0 - 8.159; Adair MP 0.0 - 9.68) (2024CCN) RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 400,000 7,560,000 0
Total for Adair county PL 400,000
DN 8,810,000
RW 3,470,000
UT 8,100,000
CN 58,000 2,000,000
Total Amounts: 458,000 10,810,000 11,570,000
Allen 320 KY-100 IMPROVEMENTS TO KY 100: CURVE, BRIDGE, AND INTERSECTION PL
IMPROVEMENTS FROM NEAR THE STONY POINT ROAD DN
INTERSECTION TO EAST OF THE ALONZO LONG HOLLOW ROAD RW
INTERSECTION (12CCR)(18CCN) (2020CCR) (2024CCR)
UT
CN SPP 11,780,000
Project Cost: 0 11,780,000 0
Allen 8802 KY-100 WIDENING OF KY 100 (FRANKLIN ROAD) TO 3 LANES WITH URBAN PL
SECTION FROM OLIVER STREET TO US 31E TO INCREASE DN
CAPACITY/SAFETY. MP 11.800-12.700 (14CCN)(18CCN) (2020CCR) RW SPP 610,000
(2024CCR)
UT SPP 580,000
CN SPP 720,000
Project Cost: 0 1,190,000 720,000
Allen 10026 CR-1043 BRIDGE PROJECT IN ALLEN COUNTY ON (002C00004N) JEFFERSON PL
SCHOOL R AT DIFFICULT CREEK DN FBP2 139,182
RW
UT
CN FBP2 927,878
Project Cost: 0 0 1,067,060
Page 3 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Allen 80206 KY-100 RECONSTRUCT KY-100 FROM KY-622 IN SIMPSON COUNTY TO EST PL
OF SULPHUR FORK CREEK IN ALLEN COUNTY (2012CCR) (2022CCN) DN
(2024CCR) RW
UT
CN SPP 19,140,000
Project Cost: 0 19,140,000 0
Allen 80207 KY-101 Improve safety on KY 101 from KY 234 to the Warren County Line. PL
(2022CCN) (2024CCR) DN
RW SPP 2,200,000
UT SPP 2,510,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 2,200,000 2,510,000
Allen 80308 KY-100 IMPROVE SAFETY AND REDUCE CONGESTION ALONG KY 100 (OLD PL
GALLATIN RD) FROM THE INTERSECTION WITH WOODLAND CIRCLE DN SPP 526,000
DRIVE TO JOHN KELLY DRIVE IN SCOTTSVILLE. (2024CCN) RW SPP 563,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 526,000 563,000
Allen 80312 PF-9999 Improve connectivity within Allen Springs Industrial Park. (2024CCN) PL
DN
RW STP2 110,000
UT STP2 260,000
CN SPP 2,700,000
Project Cost: 370,000 2,700,000 0
Allen 80315 KY-101 RECONSTRUCTION/NEW CONSTRUCTION OF TWO-LANE ROADWAY PL
WITH SHOULDERS AND WIDER BRIDGES. (2024CCN) DN SPP 9,120,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 9,120,000 0
Page 4 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Allen 80353 KY-100 Construct roundabout intersection at KY 100 and KY 3500 (Old PL
Gallatin Road/Franklin Road) (MP 13.05-13.15) (2024CCN) DN
RW SPP 250,000
UT SPP 500,000
CN SPP 1,300,000
Project Cost: 0 750,000 1,300,000
Total for Allen county PL
DN 9,646,000 139,182
RW 110,000 3,060,000 563,000
UT 260,000 1,080,000 2,510,000
CN 33,620,000 2,947,878
Total Amounts: 370,000 47,406,000 6,160,060
Anderson 806 KY-151 IMPROVE KY 151 FROM US 127 AT LAWRENCEBURG TO I-64 IN PL
FRANKLIN COUNTY. (2020CCN) (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT SPP 420,000
CN SPP 1,800,000
Project Cost: 420,000 1,800,000 0
Anderson 8100.1000 US-62 WIDENING WITH ACCESS IMPROVEMENTS TO ANDERSON CROSSING PL
ON US62, FROM 0.2MI W OF CORPORATE DR TO US127B DN
(LAWRENCEBURG BYPASS). PRIORITY SECTION (2016BOP) RW SPP 5,040,000
(2024CCN)
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 0 5,040,000
Anderson 10065 KY-44 ADDRESS DEFICIENCIES OF BRIDGE ON KY 44 OVER TIMBER CREEK PL
(003B00028N) DN BRX 237,733
RW
UT
CN BRX 1,584,890
Project Cost: 0 0 1,822,623
Page 5 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Anderson 22183 BG-9002 ADDRESS CONDITION OF Martha Layne Collins Bluegrass Parkway PL
FROM MILEPOINT 56.287 TO MILEPOINT 58.345 DN NHPM 200,000
RW
UT
CN NHPM 2,003,520
Project Cost: 0 2,203,520 0
Anderson 80001 US-62 IMPROVE US-62 (VERSAILLES RD.) FROM HILLTOP DR. TO WEST END PL
OF BRIDGE OVER KENTUCKY RIVER AT TYRONE(18CCN) (2020CCR) DN
(2022CCR) (2024CCR) RW
UT STP2 5,850,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 5,850,000 0
Total for Anderson county PL
DN 200,000 237,733
RW 5,040,000
UT 420,000 5,850,000
CN 3,803,520 1,584,890
Total Amounts: 420,000 9,853,520 6,862,623
Ballard 118 US-60 Improve US-60 from Humphrey Creek bridge to 0.4 mi west of Hester PL
Sullivan Lane. (02CCR) (2020CCR) (2022CCR) (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT NH 11,200,000
CN NH 10,640,000
Project Cost: 0 11,200,000 10,640,000
Ballard 1140 US-51 CONSTRUCT NEW STRUCTURE OVER THE OHIO RIVER AT CAIRO, PL
ILLINOIS (KENTUCKY'S SHARE)(004B00021N) DN BRO2 4,000,000 4,500,000 3,005,000
RW
UT
CN BRO2 26,365,000
Project Cost: 4,000,000 30,865,000 3,005,000
Page 6 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Ballard 1140.2000 US-51 CONSTRUCT APPROACH ROADWAY TO NEW BRIDGE OVER THE PL
OHIO RIVER AT CAIRO, ILLINOIS (KY APPROACH ROADWAY WORK DN
ONLY). RW
UT
CN NH 14,620,000
Project Cost: 0 14,620,000 0
Ballard 80300 US-60 ADDRESS CONDITION, SAFETY, CONGESTION, AND FUTURE PL
CAPACITY ISSUES ON US-60 THROUGH THE CITY OF LACENTER. DN NH 1,560,000
(2024CCN) RW NH 2,750,000
UT NH 1,500,000
CN
Project Cost: 1,560,000 0 4,250,000
Ballard 80301 US-60 ADDRESS CONDITION, SAFETY, CONGESTION, AND FUTURE PL
CAPACITY FROM PROPOSED BARLOW EASTERN BYPASS TO DN NH 2,080,000
PROPOSED LACENTER SOUTHERN BYPASS. (2024CCN) RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 0 2,080,000
Ballard 80308 US-51 CORRECT ROADWAY GEOMETRICS, INADEQUATE PASSING ZONES, PL
IMPROVE OPERATING SPEEDS AND IMPROVE CONNECTIVITY FROM DN SPP 1,560,000
CARLISLE COUNTY LINE TO RAILROAD OVERPASS IN WICKLIFFE. RW
(2024CCN)
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,560,000 0
Ballard 80320 US-51 THE PURPOSE OF THIS PROJECT IS TO PROVIDE ROADWAY PL
INFRASTRUCTURE TO SUPPORT COMMUNITY DN SPP 300,000
GROWTH/DEVELOPMENT AND SAFE ACCESS FOR FREIGHT TRAFFIC RW SPP 400,000
TO DEVELOPING RIVERPORT SOUTH OF WICKLIFFE. (2024CCN)
UT SPP 400,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 300,000 800,000
Page 7 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Ballard 80322 KY-286 IMPROVE GEOMETRIC DEFICIENCIES, FREIGHT TRUCK MOBILITY, AND PL
IMPROVE SAFETY ON KY 286 FROM HERSHEL JONES ROAD TO KY DN SPP 1,500,000
473. (2024CCN) RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,500,000 0
Total for Ballard county PL
DN 5,560,000 7,860,000 5,085,000
RW 3,150,000
UT 11,200,000 1,900,000
CN 40,985,000 10,640,000
Total Amounts: 5,560,000 60,045,000 20,775,000
Barren 8821 CR-1366, IMPROVE KY-1297 FROM CR-1366 (DONNELLY DRIVE) TO US-31E PL
KY-1297 (ROGER WELLS), AND IMPROVE CR-1366 (DONNELLY DRIVE) FROM DN
KY-1297 TO US-68 IN GLASGOW. (14CCN) (16CCN) (2020CCR) RW
(2024CCR)
UT
CN SPP 13,440,000
Project Cost: 0 13,440,000 0
Barren 10001 US-31 ADDRESS DEFICIENCIES OF US 31EX BRIDGE OVER WATER STREET. PL
(005B00058N) DN
RW BRX 1,000,000
UT BRX 550,000
CN BRX 2,900,000
Project Cost: 1,000,000 550,000 2,900,000
Barren 20038 US-31 ADDRESS CONDITION OF US-31E FROM MILEPOINT 8.052 TO PL
MILEPOINT 12.117 DN STP4 160,000
RW
UT
CN STP4 1,840,000
Project Cost: 2,000,000 0 0
Page 8 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Barren 22300 US-68 ADDRESS CONDITION OF US-68X FROM MILEPOINT 2.75 TO PL
MILEPOINT 4.27 DN STP3 640,000
RW
UT
CN STP3 7,360,000
Project Cost: 8,000,000 0 0
Barren 80002 LN-9008 NEW INTERCHANGE ON THE LOUIE NUNN CUMBERLAND PARKWAY PL
AT KY (CONTINGENT ON ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT PROJECTS)-249 DN SPP 2,030,000
IN GLASGOW(18CCN) (2022CCR) (2024CCR) RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 0 2,030,000
Barren 80300 LN-9008 REDUCE CONGESTION AND INCREASE MOBILITY ON US 31E FROM PL
ABERDEEN DRIVE TO TROJAN TRAIL, INCLUDING RECONSTRUCTION DN
OF THE INTERCHANGE WITH LN 9008. (2024CCN) RW SPP 330,000
UT SPP 1,860,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 2,190,000 0
Barren 80319 US-31 IMPROVE SAFETY AND MOBILITY ON US-31E IN THE HAYWOOD PL
AREA. (2024CCN) DN SPP 620,000
RW SPP 650,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 620,000 650,000
Barren 80352 KY-3600 Addition of southbound left turn lane and northbound right turn lane at PL
new Southern States facility on KY 3600 (MP 1.95). (2024CCN) DN
RW
UT
CN SPP 190,000
Project Cost: 0 190,000 0
Total for Barren county PL
DN 800,000 620,000 2,030,000
RW 1,000,000 330,000 650,000
UT 2,410,000
CN 9,200,000 13,630,000 2,900,000
Total Amounts: 11,000,000 16,990,000 5,580,000
Page 9 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Bath 193 KY-111 RECONSTRUCT KY-111 IN THE VICINITY OF THE "S-CURVE" EAST OF PL
OWINGSVILLE (14CCR) (2022CCN) (2024CCR) DN SPP 380,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 0 380,000
Bath 4327 US-60 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON US-60 IN BATH COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 46,000
Project Cost: 46,000 0 0
Bath 8404 KY-965 RECONSTRUCT CURVE AT .8 MILE SOUTH OF KY-36 (08CCN)(12CCR) PL
MILEPOINT 7.147 TO 7.247) (2022CCN) DN SPP 270,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 0 270,000
Bath 8814 KY-36 CORRECT HORIZONTAL AND WIDTH DEFICIENCIES ON KY 36 FROM PL SPP 400,000
"OLD KY 11" MP 1.004 TO KY 1325 (MP 6.97) TO IMPROVE SAFETY DN SPP 3,640,000
AND OPERATIONAL EFFICIENCY OF ROADWAY (14CCN) (2022CCN) RW
(2024CCR)
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 400,000 3,640,000
Bath 10067 US-60 BRIDGE PROJECT IN BATH COUNTY ON (006B00012N) US-60 AT PL
DRAINAGE DITCH DN BRX 357,929
RW
UT
CN BRX 2,386,193
Project Cost: 0 0 2,744,122
Page 10 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Bath 10068 US-60 BRIDGE PROJECT IN BATH COUNTY ON (006B00013N) US-60 AT PL
CROOKED RUN CREEK DN BRX 366,778
RW
UT
CN BRX 2,445,188
Project Cost: 0 0 2,811,966
Bath 10095 US-60 ADDRESS DEFICIENCIES OF BRIDGE ON US 60 OVER COW CREEK PL
(006B00011N) DN BRX 144,243
RW
UT
CN BRX 961,619
Project Cost: 0 0 1,105,862
Bath 22045 I -64 ADDRESS CONDITION OF I-064 FROM MILEPOINT 117.83 TO PL
MILEPOINT 123.6 DN NHPM 490,000
RW
UT
CN NHPM 4,910,000
Project Cost: 0 5,400,000 0
Bath 22046 I -64 ADDRESS CONDITION OF I-064 FROM MILEPOINT 123.6 TO MILEPOINT PL
128.955 DN NHPM 450,000
RW
UT
CN NHPM 4,521,000
Project Cost: 4,971,000 0 0
Bath 80101 KY-36 IMPROVE SAFETY ON KY 36 FROM THE INTERSECTION WITH I-64 TO PL
THE INTERSECTION OF KY 965 INCLUDING THE CURVES KNOWN AS DN
CLEAR CREEK FURNACE AND THOMAS HILL (2020CCN) MILEPOINT RW SPP 1,650,000
13.394 TO MILEPOINT 17.104 (2022CCN) (2024CCR)
UT SPP 2,430,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 4,080,000 0
Page 11 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Bath 80102 KY-36 IMPROVE SAFETY AND OPERATIONAL EFFICIENCY ON KY 36 FROM PL
NORTH OF MARIELLA DR TO THE INTERSECTION OF OLD KY 36 (2020 DN SPP 720,000
CCN) (2022CCN) (2024CCR) RW SPP 1,300,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 720,000 1,300,000
Bath 80250 US-60 REALIGN ROADWAY ON US 60 NEAR OWINGSVILLE BEGINNING IN PL
THE VICINITY OF ROSE BUSH LN AND ENDING AT WELLS ROAD DN
NEAR I 64 EXIT 123 (2022CCN) (2024CCR) RW SPP 1,820,000
UT SPP 1,300,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,820,000 1,300,000
Total for Bath county PL 400,000
DN 450,000 1,210,000 5,158,950
RW 3,470,000 1,300,000
UT 2,430,000 1,300,000
CN 4,567,000 4,910,000 5,793,000
Total Amounts: 5,017,000 12,420,000 13,551,950
Bell 167 KY-74 ENHANCING CUMBERLAND AVENUE FROM US 25E TO 18TH STREET PL
WITH STREET IMPROVEMENTS FOR VEHICLE AND PEDESTRIANS, AS DN
WELL AS STORM WATER MANAGEMENT TO IMPROVE SAFETY, RW SPP 580,000
CONGESTION, AND ENVIRONMENTAL IMPACT. (2020CCR) (2024CCR)
UT SPP 3,860,000
CN SPP 17,580,000
Project Cost: 0 4,440,000 17,580,000
Bell 4395 KY-2011 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-2011 IN BELL COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 80,000
Project Cost: 80,000 0 0
Page 12 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Bell 4397 KY-66 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-66 IN BELL COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 110,000
Project Cost: 110,000 0 0
Bell 8702 US-119 PROVIDE PASSING OPPORTUNITIES ON US 119 IN THE VICINITY OF PL
MP 4.5 IN BELL COUNTY. (12CCN)(14CCR) (2020CCN) (2024CCR) DN
RW SPP 1,240,000
UT SPP 610,000
CN SPP 5,600,000
Project Cost: 0 1,850,000 5,600,000
Bell 10171 KY-66 BRIDGE PROJECT IN BELL COUNTY ON (007B00055N) KY-66 AT RED PL
BIRD CREEK DN
RW BRX 10,000
UT BRX 10,000
CN BRX 1,046,035
Project Cost: 0 0 1,066,035
Bell 10239 KY-217 BRIDGE PROJECT IN BELL COUNTY ON (007C00072N) 17TH STREET PL
AT YELLOW CREEK DN FBP2 202,446
RW
UT
CN FBP2 1,349,640
Project Cost: 0 0 1,552,086
Bell 22303 US-119 ADDRESS CONDITION OF US-119 FROM MILEPOINT 13.88 TO PL
MILEPOINT 15.88 DN STP5 318,364
RW
UT
CN STP5 3,661,186
Project Cost: 0 3,979,550 0
Page 13 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Bell 80201 US-25 Fill in existing depressed median to install a two-way left turn lane PL
from the intersection of KY 441 to intersection of Tim Short DN SPP 240,000
Automotive. (2022CCN) RW
UT
CN SPP 560,000
Project Cost: 0 240,000 560,000
Total for Bell county PL
DN 558,364 202,446
RW 1,820,000 10,000
UT 4,470,000 10,000
CN 190,000 3,661,186 26,135,675
Total Amounts: 190,000 10,509,550 26,358,121
Boone 80 I -75 REDUCE CONGESTION AND IMPROVE TRAFFIC MOBILITY AT THE PL
INTERCHANGE OF I-75 AND KY-14 IN WALTON. (2020CCR) DN
(2022CCR) (2024CCR) RW NH 17,250,000
UT NH 1,680,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 0 18,930,000
Boone 446.1000 US-42 Provide East-West Connectivity and Improve Mobility From KY 237 to PL
KY 842. (2024BOP) DN
RW SPP 15,750,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 0 15,750,000
Boone 446.2000 US-42 Provide East-West Connectivity and Improve Mobility from KY 842 to PL
Mall Road. (2024BOP) DN
RW SPP 36,750,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 0 36,750,000
Page 14 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Boone 447 US-25 IMPROVE MOBILITY AND REDUCE CONGESTION ON US-25 FROM PL
WINNING COLORS DRIVE TO THE NORFOLK SOUTHERN RAILROAD DN
CROSSING SOUTH OF KY-1829 (INDUSTRIAL ROAD); EXCLUDES RW SPP 28,750,000
GRADE SEPARATION AT KY-536. (2020CCR) (2022CCR) (2024CCR)
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 28,750,000 0
Boone 447.1000 US-25 Reconstruct US 25 from Winning Colors Drive to Melinda Lane. PL
(2024BOP) DN
RW SPP 10,500,000
UT SPP 4,160,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 10,500,000 4,160,000
Boone 447.2000 US-25 Reconstruct US 25 from Melinda Lane to RR Spur Crossing. PL
(2024BOP) DN
RW SPP 15,750,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 0 15,750,000
Boone 966.0800 CO-0 DEDICATED FEDERAL-AID STP FUNDS EARMARKED FOR NKY PL
URBANIZED AREA AND SUBJECT TO MPO CONTROL FOR FY 2026 DN
THROUGH FY 2032. (FUNDING SUBJECT TO FISCAL CONSTRAINT RW
PENDING MPO TIP) (2020CCR) (2024CCR)
UT
CN SNK 8,600,000 8,600,000 8,600,000
Project Cost: 8,600,000 8,600,000 8,600,000
Boone 1087 KY-842 ADDRESS DEFICIENCIES OF BRIDGE OVER NS (CNO&TP)RR ON PL
RICHARDSON ROAD (KY 842) 0.14 MI E OF US 25 NEAR DN
INDEPENDENCE (008B00092N) (2020CCN) RW BRX 4,000,000
UT BRX 3,775,000
CN BRX 10,000,000
Project Cost: 0 17,775,000 0
Page 15 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Boone 8000.2000 I -275 I-275/KY-212 INTERCHANGE AND KY-20 RECONSTRUCTION NEAR PL
GREATER CINCINNATI AIRPORT. (2004BOPC)(KYTC SHARE @ 46.6%) DN SPP 6,990,000
(2024CCN) RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 0 6,990,000
Boone 10028 I -275 ADDRESS DEFICIENCIES OF BRIDGE ON I-275 OVER OHIO RIVER PL
(008B00052N) DN FBP 520,000
RW
UT
CN FBP 5,200,000
Project Cost: 0 0 5,720,000
Boone 10049 KY-14 ADDRESS DEFICIENCIES OF BRIDGE ON KY 14 OVER MCCOYS FORK PL
(008B00003N) DN BRX 211,800
RW
UT
CN BRX 1,411,999
Project Cost: 0 0 1,623,799
Boone 80000 KY-237 RECONSTRUCT GUNPOWDER RD. FROM US-42 TO KY-536. (18CCN) PL
(2020CCR) (2022CCR) (2024CCR) DN
RW SPP 19,800,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 0 19,800,000
Boone 80001 KY-237 EXPANSION OF ROUNDABOUTS ALONG KY-237 AT CARDINAL COVE PL
AND GRAVES RD(18CCN) (2020CCR) (2022CCR) (2024CCR) DN
RW SPP 2,880,000
UT SPP 1,570,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 4,450,000 0
Page 16 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Boone 80100 KY-1017, CONVERT TURFWAY RD AND THOROUGHBRED BLVD FROM 2 WAY PL
KY-717 TO ONE WAY AND CONSTRUCT NEW I-75 ACCESS (2020CCN) DN SPP 3,000,000
(2022CCR) (2024CCR) RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 3,000,000 0
Boone 80101 KY-18 CONVERT KY 18 (BURLINGTON PIKE) TO A SUPER STREET PL
(2020CCN) (2022CCR) (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN NH 19,500,000
Project Cost: 0 19,500,000 0
Boone 80102 KY-3060 Reconstruct KY 3060 (Frogtown Road) from US 42 to US 25. PL
(2022CCR) (2024CCR) DN
RW SPP 16,680,000
UT SPP 4,710,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 16,680,000 4,710,000
Boone 80150 KY-717 Reconstruct Turfway Road (KY 717) from Aero Parkway (MP 0.0) to PL
Donaldson Road (MP 1.67). (2020CCN) (2022CCR) (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN STPF 5,000,000 5,000,000
Project Cost: 0 5,000,000 5,000,000
Boone 80202 KY-536, Conduct a planning study to evaluate potential improvement options to PL SPP 810,000
US-42 promote economic growth through central Boone County as well as DN
improving safety and modernizing existing roadways (2022CCN) RW
(2024CCR)
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 810,000 0
Page 17 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Boone 80204 KY-536, PLANNING STUDY TO IMPROVE EXISTING ALIGNMENTS AND NEW PL SPP 840,000
US-42 CONSTRUCTION BETWEEN KY 536 (HATHAWAY ROAD) AND KY 14 DN
(VERONA MUDLICK ROAD) (2022CCN) (2024CCR) RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 840,000 0 0
Boone 80206 KY-18 Improve safety and address geometric deficiencies along KY 18 from PL
Caroline Williams Way to KY 338; include multi-modes. (2022CCN) DN SPP 1,040,000
(2024CCR) RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,040,000 0
Boone 80207 CR-1001 Improve safety & mobility, reduce congestion and address geometric PL
deficiencies along Camp Ernst Road (CR 1001) from KY 237 (Pleasant DN
Valley Rd) to KY 536 (Hathaway Rd). (2022CCN) (Includes Item No. RW SPP 17,250,000
6-80208) (2024CCR)
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 0 17,250,000
Boone 80208 CR-1001 Improve safety & mobility, reduce congestion and address geometric PL
deficiencies along Camp Ernst Road (CR 1001) from Long Branch Rd. DN SPP 2,690,000
to KY 237 (Pleasant Valley Rd.) (2022CCN)(See Item No. 6-80207) RW
(2024CCN)
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 0 2,690,000
Boone 80209 KY-237 Improve access to KY 237 for Litton Lane. (2022CCN) (2024CCR) PL
DN
RW SPP 7,350,000
UT SPP 520,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 7,350,000 520,000
Page 18 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Boone 80210 KY-18 Paired Grade-Separated Intersections along KY 18 at KY 842 and Mall PL
Road. (2022CCN) (2024CCR) DN SPP 4,992,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 4,992,000 0
Boone 80211 KY-18 Improve capacity at the KY 18 (Burlington Pike) intersection with KY PL
1017 (Aero Parkway) to support existing and future traffic volumes. DN SPP 1,860,000
Consider grade separation design options. (2022CCN) RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,860,000 0
Boone 80257 I -75 EXPAND NORTHBOUND AND SOUTHBOUND REST AREAS ON PL
I-71/I-75 IN BOONE COUNTY TO ADD MORE TRUCK PARKING. DN
(2022CCN) (2024CCR) RW
UT NH 450,000
CN NH 16,000,000
Project Cost: 16,450,000 0 0
Boone 80304 CR-1151 IMPROVE SAFETY AND REDUCE CONGESTION ALONG HICKS PIKE PL
(CR 1151) FROM US 42 TO KY 338. (2024CCN) DN SPP 5,160,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 5,160,000 0
Boone 80316 US-25 IMPROVE SAFETY & MOBILITY, AND ADDRESS GEOMETRIC PL
DEFICIENCIES ALONG US 25 (DIXIE HWY.) BETWEEN KY 16 (MARY DN SPP 4,320,000
GRUBBS HIGHWAY) AND KY 338 (RICHWOOD RD.) (2024CCN) RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 4,320,000 0
Page 19 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Boone 80317 CR-1042 IMPROVE SAFETY AND REDUCE CONGESTION ON LIMABURG ROAD PL
FROM CONRAD LANE TO KY 18 (BURLINGTON PIKE). (2024CCN) DN SPP 2,160,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 2,160,000 0
Boone 80318 KY-20 IMPROVE SAFETY AND MOBILITY ALONG KY 20 (PETERSBURG PL
ROAD) FROM GRAVES ROAD TO KY 237 (NORTH BEND ROAD). DN SPP 4,380,000
(2024CCN) RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 4,380,000 0
Boone 80320 KY-237 Transportation improvements adjoining KY 237 Central Parkway in PL
Partnership with Boone County (TID). (2024CCN) DN
RW
UT
CN SPP 10,400,000
Project Cost: 0 10,400,000 0
Boone 80350 KY-2951 Improve Steeplechase Elementary School access and safety by PL
extending Grand National Blvd to Chambers Road. (2024CCN) DN SPP 2,000,000
RW SPP 4,000,000
UT SPP 200,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 2,000,000 4,200,000
Boone 80352 I -75 Add additional exit lane on I-75 Southbound (MP 171 South) ramp and PL
align lights to provide 2 left turn lanes and I right turn lane on HWY DN
14/16 Nart Grubbs HWY. Ramp only work. (2024CCN) RW
UT
CN SPP 1,560,000
Project Cost: 0 1,560,000 0
Page 20 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Boone 80356 CR-1042 Reconstruct Limaburg Road from KY 18 to Gateway Blvd (CR 1086) PL
(2024CCN) DN SPP 4,500,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 4,500,000 0
Boone 80357 KY-20 Reconstruct KY 20 from the new KY 495 (Graves Road) Interchange PL
to KY 18 (MP14.6-16.7) (2024CCN) DN SPP 4,500,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 4,500,000 0
Boone 80358 KY-536 Reconstruct KY 536 from Camp Ernst Road to Old Union Road (MP PL
8.0-10.8) (2024CCN) DN SPP 6,750,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 0 6,750,000
Boone 80359 US-25 Improve safety & mobility and address geometric deficiencies along US PL
25 (Dixie Hwy) between KY 16 and KY 338 (Richwood Rd) (MP DN SPP 4,000,000
2.2-4.7) (2024CCN) RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 4,000,000 0
Boone 80360 PF-9999 CONSTRUCT A NEW CONNECTION BETWEEN KY 1292, BEAVER PL
ROAD, TO KY 2951, CHAMBERS ROAD, AND KY 16. (2024CCN) DN SPP 6,000,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 6,000,000 0
Total for Boone county PL 840,000 810,000
DN 47,912,000 17,161,800
RW 70,160,000 126,550,000
UT 450,000 5,345,000 11,270,000
CN 24,600,000 55,060,000 20,211,999
Total Amounts: 25,890,000 179,287,000 175,193,799
Page 21 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Bourbon 474 CO-0 Extend Stewart Street to Bellafato Street in the City of Paris to provide PL
improved access to US 460. DN SPP 355,000
RW SPP 150,000
UT SPP 310,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 355,000 460,000
Bourbon 80104 US-460 IMPROVE US 460 FROM RUSSELL CAVE RD TO I 75 (2ND PART OF PL
7-8705) (2020CCN)(SEE 7-8705.10) (2022CCR) (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN STP2 5,000,000 14,660,000
Project Cost: 5,000,000 14,660,000 0
Bourbon 80155 KY-537 IMPROVE SAFETY OF CANE RIDGE ROAD (KY 537) FROM THE PL
INTERSECTION WITH 460 TO THE ENTRANCE PAST COLOR POINT DN SPP 3,240,000
(2020CCN) (2022CCR) RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 0 3,240,000
Bourbon 80203 KY-1939 MODERNIZE ROADWAY, IMPROVE CONGESTION, SAFETY AND PL
PEDESTRIAN ACCESS FROM US 27 ALONG Y 1939 FOR .212 MILES DN
INCLUDING IMPROVEMENTS TO THE INTERSECTION OF MATLACK ST RW SPP 740,000
AND THE BOURBON COUNTY SCHOOL BUS BARN (2022CCN)
UT SPP 1,150,000
(INCLUDES ITEM NO. 7-916) (2024CCR)
CN SPP 2,240,000
Project Cost: 0 740,000 3,390,000
Bourbon 80321 KY-627 Improve safety on KY 627 (Winchester Rd) from Clark/Bourbon CL to PL
US 68X (High St). Breakout section including the KY 57 (Austerlitz Rd) DN SPP 350,000
intersection and continuing North for approx. 0.70 miles. (2024CCN) RW SPP 100,000
UT SPP 100,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 350,000 200,000
Page 22 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Bourbon 80361 KY-1893 Replace bridge on KY 1893 (Shawhan Rd) over Stoner Creek. PL
(009B00041N) DN FBP2 325,909
RW
UT
CN FBP2 2,172,724
Project Cost: 0 0 2,498,633
Total for Bourbon county PL
DN 705,000 3,565,909
RW 740,000 250,000
UT 1,560,000
CN 5,000,000 14,660,000 4,412,724
Total Amounts: 5,000,000 16,105,000 9,788,633
Boyd 180 KY-716 IMPROVE SAFETY AND DECREASE CONGESTION ON KY 716 FROM PL
MP 0.0 (US 60) TO MP 0.56 (KY 3293) (2020CCR) (2024CCN) DN SPP 520,000
RW SPP 280,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 520,000 280,000
Boyd 208.0600 CO-0 FEDERAL 'STP' FUNDS DEDICATED TO HUNTINGTON-ASHLAND MPO PL
FOR FY 2022-2028. (FUNDING SUBJECT TO FISCAL CONSTRAINT DN
PENDING MPO TIP) (2020CCR) (2022CCR) (2024CCR) RW
UT
CN SAH 1,800,000 1,800,000 1,800,000
Project Cost: 1,800,000 1,800,000 1,800,000
Boyd 10016 I -64 ADDRESS DEFICIENCIES ON PERRY GENTRY BRIDGES OVER THE BIG PL
SANDY RIVER. JOINT PROJECT WITH WEST VIRGINIA. (010B00046L DN FBP 200,000
AND 010B00046R)(SD) RW
UT
CN FBP 2,000,000
Project Cost: 0 0 2,200,000
Page 23 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Boyd 10074 US-23 BRIDGE PROJECT IN BOYD COUNTY ON (010B00058N) US-23S AT PL
OHIO RIVER,CSX,STREETS DN BRO 260,000
RW
UT
CN BRO 2,600,000
Project Cost: 0 2,860,000 0
Boyd 10096 US-23 ADDRESS DEFICIENCIES OF BRIDGE ON US 23 OVER OHIO RIVER,CSX PL
,STREETS (010B00040N) DN BRZ 200,000
RW
UT
CN BRZ 2,000,000
Project Cost: 0 2,200,000 0
Boyd 80300 KY-168, Improve operational efficiency of the US 60 (13th Street) and KY 168 PL
US-60 (Blackburn Ave) intersection. (2024CCN) DN NH 1,300,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,300,000 0
Boyd 80301 US-23 Improve the operational efficiency of Greenup Avenue (US-23) from PL
the southern split with Winchester Avenue (US-23X) (MP 17.065) to DN NH 560,000
the intersection of 20th Street (MP 18.055). (2024CCN) RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 0 560,000
Boyd 80350 KY-168 Improve safety, mobility and accessibility at the intersection of KY 168 PL
and CS 2341 (Robert's Drive); located within close proximity of an at DN SPP 760,000
grade CSX Railroad Crossing (MP 6.7-6.8) (2024CCN) RW SPP 2,400,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 760,000 2,400,000
Page 24 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Boyd 80351 CR-1299 Improve Commerce Drive (CR 1299), including widening, improving PL
geometrics and drainage (2024CCN) DN SPP 780,000
RW SPP 1,150,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 780,000 1,150,000
Boyd 80353 PF-9999 Construct a new bridge from south side of Camp Landing across the PL
Little Sandy River. Near US 60/KY 180 (Memorandum of Agreement DN SPP 570,000
with Boyd County, state funds provided for design only) (2024CCN) RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 570,000 0
Total for Boyd county PL
DN 4,390,000 760,000
RW 3,830,000
UT
CN 1,800,000 6,400,000 3,800,000
Total Amounts: 1,800,000 10,790,000 8,390,000
Boyle 473 US-127, US 150 Bypass between Fireside Dr and Gose Pike in Danville, PL
US-150 Kentucky; City of Danville’s SS4A USDOT Grant Funded Project. DN KYD 2,190,000
RW
UT
CN KYD 13,760,000
Project Cost: 15,950,000 0 0
Boyle 80204 KY-52 RECONSTRUCT KY 52 FROM KY 1805 (Goggin Ln) TO KY 590 PL
(2022CCN) (2024CCR) DN
RW SPP 2,510,000
UT SPP 3,480,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 0 5,990,000
Page 25 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Boyle 80250 KY-34 IMPROVE THE SAFETY AND MOBILITY OF KY 34 FROM ALUM PL
SPRINGS CROSSPIKE (MP 10.391) TO APPROX. 1,000 FEET WEST OF DN
CORPORATE DRIVE (MP 10.800) (2022CCN) RW SPP 3,360,000
UT SPP 1,120,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 3,360,000 1,120,000
Boyle 80300 KY-1805 Widen the Goggin Ln from MP 0 to MP 2.712 to create a road shoulder PL
that would improve safety (2024CCN) DN SPP 2,430,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 2,430,000 0
Boyle 80302 KY-34 Improve roadway geometry to promote safety on KY 34 from PL
Lexington Avenue to Old Bridge Road in Boyle County. (2024CCN) DN SPP 1,500,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,500,000 0
Boyle 80313 KY-52 PLANNING STUDY TO EVALUATE OPTIONS FOR IMPROVING SAFETY PL
ON KY 52 BETWEEN DANVILLE AND LANCASTER. (2024CCN) DN SPP 1,950,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,950,000 0
Boyle 80354 US-68 Improve the existing geometry and typical section of US 68 from PL
approx. MP 5.2 to MP 6.39 at the intersection of 2nd Street in Perryville DN SPP 780,000
(2024CCN) RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 780,000 0
Total for Boyle county PL
DN 2,190,000 6,660,000
RW 3,360,000 2,510,000
UT 4,600,000
CN 13,760,000
Total Amounts: 15,950,000 10,020,000 7,110,000
Page 26 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Bracken 355.2200 KY-8 OPERATION OF AUGUSTA FERRY FOR FY 2027 THROUGH FY 2032. PL
(12CCR)(14CCR) (2020CCR) (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN SPP 537,000 338,000
Project Cost: 0 537,000 338,000
Bracken 80103 KY-8 RECONSTRUCT KY 8 FROM WRANGLING RUN RD TO OLD KY 19. PL
(2020CCN) (2022CCR) (2024CCR) DN SPP 4,550,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 4,550,000 0
Bracken 80250 KY-9 IMPROVE SAFETY AND MOBILITY AT THE INTERSECTION OF KY 9 PL
(AA HIGHWAY) AND KY 1019 (LENNOXBURG FOSTER ROAD). DN SPP 140,000
(2022CCN) (2024CCR) RW SPP 20,000
UT SPP 120,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 140,000 140,000
Total for Bracken county PL
DN 4,690,000
RW 20,000
UT 120,000
CN 537,000 338,000
Total Amounts: 0 5,227,000 478,000
Breathitt 375 KY-205 IMPROVE KY-205 FROM NORTH OF KY-1812 TO SOUTH OF PEGGS PL
FORK RD. (2020CCR) DN
RW
UT STPF 2,360,000
CN STPF 5,000,000
Project Cost: 0 2,360,000 5,000,000
Page 27 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Breathitt 5014 KY-15 ROCKFALL MITIGATION ON KY 15 FROM 0.593 MILE NORTH OF PL
BEAVERLY ROAD (MP 13.750) TO KY 1098/KY 1813 (MP 14.644). DN
(2018BOP) (2024CCR) RW
UT
CN KYD 24,490,000
PROT 9,510,000
Project Cost: 34,000,000 0 0
Breathitt 80107 CR-1125 REPLACE BRIDGE OVER PUNCHEON CREEK ON MAX ROARK RD PL
(2020CCN) DN SPP 150,000
RW SPP 10,000
UT SPP 10,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 150,000 20,000
Total for Breathitt county PL
DN 150,000
RW 10,000
UT 2,360,000 10,000
CN 34,000,000 5,000,000
Total Amounts: 34,000,000 2,510,000 5,020,000
Breckinridge 159 KY-86 REALIGN KY 86 FROM JESSIE PRIEST ROAD TO EAST OF ROSETTA PL
CORNERS. (2020CCR) ($2 MILLION CONGRESSIONAL EARMARK DN
DEMO ID KY188) (2024CCR) RW
UT
CN SPP 8,100,000
Project Cost: 0 0 8,100,000
Breckinridge 8702 KY-79 ADDRESS SAFETY AND GEOMETRIC DEFICIENCIES ON KY 79 FROM PL
KY 477 TO KY 144 (12CCN)(14CCR)(18CCN)(2020 CCR) (COMBINED DN
W/ 4-8703) (2022CCR) (2024CCR) RW SPP 4,200,000
UT SPP 2,430,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 4,200,000 2,430,000
Page 28 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Breckinridge 8902 KY-261 REPLACE LOW WATER STRUCTURE ON KY 261 AT MP 15.74. PL
(18CCN) DN BRX 100,000
RW BRX 25,000
UT BRX 25,000
CN BRX 400,000
Project Cost: 0 0 550,000
Breckinridge 8904 KY-992 MINOR WIDENING OF KY 992 BETWEEN ROCK QUARRY AND US 60. PL
(16CCN) (18CCN) (2024CCN) DN SPP 560,000
RW SPP 900,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 560,000 900,000
Total for Breckinridge county PL
DN 560,000 100,000
RW 4,200,000 925,000
UT 2,455,000
CN 8,500,000
Total Amounts: 0 4,760,000 11,980,000
Bullitt 43 KY-44 RECONSTRUCT KY 44 FROM KY 1319 KINGS CHURCH HIGHWAY TO PL
SPENCER COUNTY LINE (2020CCN) (2024CCR) DN SPP 1,250,000
RW SPP 1,050,000
UT SPP 890,000
CN SPP 5,570,000
Project Cost: 2,300,000 6,460,000 0
Bullitt 150.0200 KY-44 RECONSTRUCT KY 44 FROM I 65 TO CHIMNEY ROCK DRIVE PL
(MILEPOINT 13.1 TO MILEPOINT 15.1). (2022CCN) DN SPP 2,420,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 2,420,000 0
Page 29 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Bullitt 150.5000 KY-44 SECTION 5 FROM CS 3316/CS 3628 TO US 31E BYPASS (2008BOPC) PL
(2022CCN) (2024CCR) DN
RW SPP 1,720,000
UT SPP 610,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,720,000 610,000
Bullitt 347.5000 KY-44 MT. WASHINGTON-TAYLORSVILLE RD; RECONSTRUCT KY 44 FROM PL
US31E BYPASS TO KY 1319 KINGS CHURCH HIGHWAY (2020CCN) DN
(2022CCR) (2024CCR) RW SPP 4,500,000
UT SPP 1,770,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 4,500,000 1,770,000
Bullitt 578 I -65 EXPAND TRUCK PARKING AT I-65 SB WELCOME CENTER. PL
DN
RW
UT
CN NH 1,160,000
Project Cost: 1,160,000 0 0
Bullitt 4309 KY-1319 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-1319 IN BULLITT COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 30,000
Project Cost: 30,000 0 0
Bullitt 8307.2000 KY-245 WIDEN KY-245 FROM FLAGET HOSPITAL (MP 7.722) THROUGH PL
COUNTY LINE (MP12.261 NELSON/MP0.000 BULLITT) TO HAPPY DN
HOLLOW RD (MP 4.425). (2022CCN) (2024CCR) RW SPP 5,250,000
UT SPP 12,880,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 5,250,000 12,880,000
Page 30 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Bullitt 8509 KY-245 WIDEN KY-245 FROM BERNHEIM FOREST TO THE COMMUNITY PL
COLLEGE. (08CCN)(10CCR)(14CCR)(16CCR) (2020CCR) (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN HGC 14,680,000
Project Cost: 14,680,000 0 0
Bullitt 10143 KY-2674 ADDRESS DEFICIENCIES OF BRIDGE ON KY 2674 OVER WHITTAKER PL
RUN (015B00083N) DN BRZ 440,483
RW
UT
CN BRZ 2,936,554
Project Cost: 0 0 3,377,037
Bullitt 22067 I -65 ADDRESS CONDITION OF I-065 FROM MILEPOINT 110.7 TO MILEPOINT PL
118.58 DN NHPM 7,200,000
RW
UT
CN NHPM 72,000,000
Project Cost: 79,200,000 0 0
Bullitt 80100 KY-61 ACCESS, SAFETY AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT IMPROVEMENT PL SPP 260,000
STUDY ALONG KY 61 IN LEBANON JUNCTION FROM LEBANON DN
JUNCTION MIDDLE SCHOOL TO NELSON COUNTY LINE 9 (MP 0.0 TO RW
3.7) (2020CCN)
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 260,000 0
Bullitt 80101 KY-1450 IMPROVE SAFETY AND REDUCE CONGESTION ON KY 1450 (BLUE PL
LICK RD.) BETWEEN THE INTERSECTIONS WITH KY 1526 (JOHN DN
HARPER HIGHWAY) AND CR 1512A (JEFFIE LANE) (2020CCN) RW SPP 1,800,000
(2022CCR) (2024CCR)
UT SPP 5,750,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,800,000 5,750,000
Page 31 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Bullitt 80103 KY-44 RECONSTRUCT KY 44 FROM BOGARD LANE TO ARMSTRONG LANE PL
(2020CCN) (2022CCR) DN SPP 2,670,000
RW SPP 5,640,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 2,670,000 5,640,000
Bullitt 80339 KY-1526 REDUCE CONGESTION, IMPROVE SAFETY, AND ENHANCE MOBILITY PL SPP 260,000
ON JOHN HARPER HWY (KY 1526) FROM I-65 (MP 11.4) TO KY 61 DN
(MP 12.9) (2024CCN) RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 260,000 0
Bullitt 80354 US-31 Improve traffic operations and improve safety along US 31E PL
(Louisville-Bardstown Rd) from the Bullitt/Nelson County Line to KY 44. DN STPF 1,670,000
Consider a 2+1 configuration and/or innovative intersections (MP 0.0 - RW
3.53 Bullitt; MP 0.0 - 1.882 Spencer). (2024CCN)
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,670,000 0
Bullitt 80357 KY-61 Improve safety and reduce congestion on KY 61 from KY 245 to Plaza PL SPP 260,000
Park Blvd in Lebanon Junction. Project will evaluate widening from 2 to DN SPP 8,050,000
4 travel lanes and consider other lower impact alternatives. (MP RW
1.97-9.42) (2024CCN)
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 260,000 8,050,000
Total for Bullitt county PL 780,000
DN 8,450,000 6,760,000 8,490,483
RW 1,050,000 13,270,000 5,640,000
UT 890,000 21,010,000
CN 87,870,000 5,570,000 2,936,554
Total Amounts: 97,370,000 27,270,000 38,077,037
Page 32 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Butler 125.1500 KY-269 OPERATION OF REED'S FERRY AT LOGANSPORT FOR FY 2027 PL
THROUGH FY 2032.(12CCR) (2020CCR) (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN SPP 166,000 173,000
Project Cost: 0 166,000 173,000
Butler 8504.1000 KY-369 OPERATION OF THE ROCHESTER FERRY BY THE BUTLER AND OHIO PL
COUNTY FERRY AUTHORITY FOR FY 2027-2032.(12CCR) (2020CCR) DN
(2024CCR) RW
UT
CN SPP 166,000 173,000
Project Cost: 0 166,000 173,000
Butler 10031 US-231 BRIDGE PROJECT IN BUTLER COUNTY ON (016B00002N) US-231 AT PL
W FK INDIAN CAMP CREEK DN FBP 850,925
RW
UT
CN FBP 5,672,835
Project Cost: 0 0 6,523,760
Butler 10054 KY-340 ADDRESS DEFICIENCIES OF BRIDGE ON KY 340 OVER E PRONG PL
INDIAN CAMP CREE (016B00042N) DN FBP2 133,805
RW
UT
CN FBP2 892,032
Project Cost: 0 1,025,837 0
Butler 22311 US-231 ADDRESS CONDITION OF US-231 FROM MILEPOINT 10.68 TO PL
MILEPOINT 10.94 DN STP4 88,000
RW
UT
CN STP4 1,012,000
Project Cost: 1,100,000 0 0
Page 33 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Butler 80329 CR-1401 Bridge replacement over Panther Creek PL
DN FBP2 142,168
RW
UT
CN FBP2 947,784
Project Cost: 0 0 1,089,952
Total for Butler county PL
DN 88,000 133,805 993,093
RW
UT
CN 1,012,000 1,224,032 6,966,619
Total Amounts: 1,100,000 1,357,837 7,959,712
Caldwell 11 I -24 STUDY THE I-24 CORRIDOR FROM THE I-69 INTERCHANGE IN LYON PL NH 750,000
COUNTY TO THE TENNESSEE STATE LINE. DN
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 750,000 0 0
Caldwell 187.6000 US-641 RELOCATE US-641 FROM SOUTH OF THE LYON/CALDWELL COUNTY PL
LINE TO FREDONIA, 4.5 MILES. (2020CCN) (2022CCR) (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT STPF 4,000,000
CN SPP 28,080,000
Project Cost: 0 0 32,080,000
Caldwell 10063 KY-293 BRIDGE PROJECT IN CALDWELL COUNTY ON (017B00050N) KY-293 PL
AT DONALDSON CREEK DN BRX 1,299,093
RW
UT
CN BRX 8,660,621
Project Cost: 9,959,714 0 0
Page 34 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Caldwell 22079 I -69 ADDRESS CONDITION OF I-069 FROM MILEPOINT 73.694 TO PL
MILEPOINT 77.994 DN NHPM 1,290,000
RW
UT
CN NHPM 12,850,000
Project Cost: 0 0 14,140,000
Caldwell 80304 CS-1006 RECONSTRUCT CS 1006 (JEFF WATSON RD) FROM KY 91 TO KY PL
2617. (2024CCN) DN SPP 730,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 730,000 0
Caldwell 80307 US-62 ADDRESS TRAFFIC CONTROL AT THE INTERSECTION OF KY2617 PL
AND US62 WEST TO IMPROVE TURN MOVEMENTS FROM KY 2617. DN SPP 780,000
(2024CCN) RW SPP 500,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 780,000 500,000
Caldwell 80308 KY-91 EXTEND 3 LANE SECTION OF KY 91 (MARION ROAD) FROM MP 12.9 PL
TO BECKNER LANE (MP 13.4) (2024CCN) DN SPP 520,000
RW SPP 600,000
UT SPP 300,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 520,000 900,000
Total for Caldwell county PL 750,000
DN 1,299,093 2,030,000 1,290,000
RW 1,100,000
UT 4,300,000
CN 8,660,621 40,930,000
Total Amounts: 10,709,714 2,030,000 47,620,000
Page 35 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Calloway 8502 KY-2594, CITY OF MURRAY BUSINESS LOOP FROM GLENDALE TO INDUSTRIAL PL
KY-94, ROAD. (SEE 1-120 FOR D, R, U FUNDING) (08CCN)(10CCR)(LET BY DN
PF-9999, CITY) (2022CCN) (2024CCR) RW
US-641
UT
CN HGC 10,800,000
Project Cost: 0 10,800,000 0
Calloway 8952 CS-1047, IMPROVE N 16TH STREET FROM KY 1327 (5 POINTS) TO KY 121 PL
KY-748 (2020CCN) DN
RW
UT SPP 810,000
CN SPP 5,750,000
Project Cost: 0 810,000 5,750,000
Calloway 80100 PF-9999 PLANNING STUDY FOR SCENIC BYWAY ALONG KENTUCKY LAKE PL SPP 250,000
(2020CCN) (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 250,000 0 0
Calloway 80200 CS-1047 Address congestion, geometric deficiencies, and access issues from PL
KY121 to Utterback Road in Murray. (2022CCN) (2024CCR) DN
RW SPP 3,300,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 3,300,000 0
Calloway 80316 KY-94 CORRECT ROADWAY GEOMETRICS AND ADDRESS CONGESTION PL
AND SAFETY ISSUES AT KY 94 AND KY 1660 (JOHNNY ROBERTSON DN SPP 270,000
ROAD) NEAR MURRAY. (2024CCN) RW SPP 320,000
UT SPP 210,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 270,000 530,000
Total for Calloway county PL 250,000
DN 270,000
RW 3,300,000 320,000
UT 810,000 210,000
CN 10,800,000 5,750,000
Total Amounts: 250,000 15,180,000 6,280,000
Page 36 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Campbell 23 I -471 ADD LANE ON RAMP FROM EASTBOUND I-275 TO NORTHBOUND PL
I-471. (2024CCR) DN NH 2,320,000
RW
UT
CN NH 12,400,000
Project Cost: 0 2,320,000 12,400,000
Campbell 352.1000 PF-9999 Extend Pond Creek Road from US 27 to Persimmon Grove, KY 1121. PL
(2024BOP) DN
RW SPP 13,200,000
UT SPP 1,620,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 13,200,000 1,620,000
Campbell 352.2000 PF-9999 Extend Pond Creek Road from Persimmon Grove, KY 1121 to AA PL
Highway, KY 9 . (2024BOP) DN
RW SPP 22,000,000
UT SPP 8,640,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 22,000,000 8,640,000
Campbell 1086 KY-8 REPLACE 4TH STREET BRIDGE OVER THE LICKING RIVER BETWEEN PL
COVINGTON AND NEWPORT; BRIDGE NUMBER 059B00037N DN
RW
UT
CN BRO 27,042,195 35,520,000
FBP 29,770,000
Project Cost: 27,042,195 35,520,000 29,770,000
Campbell 8104 I -471, KY-8 CONSTRUCT NEW I-471 SOUTHBOUND OFF-RAMP AT KY-8 (SEE PL
ALSO 6-183.00). (02CCN)(06CCN) (2020CCN) DN SPP 4,340,000
RW SPP 5,750,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 4,340,000 5,750,000
Page 37 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Campbell 80311 KY-9 IMPROVE SAFETY AND REDUCE CONGESTION AT THE I-275 PL
INTERCHANGE WITH KY-9 (AA HWY.) (2024CCN) DN SPP 5,000,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 5,000,000 0
Campbell 80313 PF-9999 Construct a roundabout at the intersection of KY 1892 (Grand Ave) PL
and Highland Ave (2024CCN) DN SPP 810,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 810,000 0
Campbell 80314 US-27 IMPROVE CONDITIONS BY CONSTRUCTING A SOUTHBOUND TRUCK PL
CLIMBING LANE NORTH OF KY 709, AND RECONSTRUCT THE DN SPP 780,000
INTERSECTION OF KY 709 AND US 27 TO ALLOW FOR ADEQUATE RW SPP 1,500,000
TURN LANES THAT ACCOMMODATE ALL MOVEMENTS. (2024CCN)
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 780,000 1,500,000
Total for Campbell county PL
DN 13,250,000
RW 35,200,000 7,250,000
UT 10,260,000
CN 27,042,195 35,520,000 42,170,000
Total Amounts: 27,042,195 83,970,000 59,680,000
Carlisle 333 US-51, US-62 CORRECT GEOMETRIC DEFICIENCIES AT INTERSECTION OF PL
US-51/US-62/FRONT ST/ELM ST IN BARDWELL TO ADDRESS FLOW, DN
SAFETY, AND ACCESS ISSUES.(12CCR)(18CCN) RW
UT
CN SPP 390,000
Project Cost: 390,000 0 0
Page 38 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Carlisle 80302 US-62 CORRECT SUBSTANDARD ROADWAY GEOMETRICS ON US-62 FROM PL
KY 1181 TO KY 408 TO ADDRESS ACCESS ISSUES, SAFETY DN SPP 1,560,000
CONCERNS, FLOOD PRONE AREA, AND REGIONAL CONNECTIVITY. RW SPP 500,000
(2024CCN)
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,560,000 500,000
Carlisle 80303 US-62 IMPROVE SAFETY, MOBILITY, CONNECTIVITY, AND ADDRESS PL
GEOMETRIC DEFICIENCIES ALONG US-62 BETWEEN HOBBS DN SPP 1,040,000
ROAD/BOSWELL ROAD TO KY 307. (2024CCN) RW SPP 400,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,040,000 400,000
Carlisle 80309 US-51 CORRECT ROADWAY GEOMETRICS AND IMPROVE SAFETY, ACCESS PL
AND REGIONAL CONNECTIVITY FROM HICKMAN COUNTY LINE TO KY DN SPP 900,000
1377 SOUTH OF BARDWELL. (2024CCN) RW SPP 400,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 900,000 400,000
Carlisle 80323 US-51 CORRECT SUBSTANDARD ROADWAY GEOMETRICS, TO IMPROVE PL
TRAFFIC FLOW, SAFETY AND ACCESS MANAGEMENT ISSUES FROM DN SPP 1,000,000
KY 1377 TO TRUMAN CREEK BRIDGE IN BARDWELL. (2024CCN) RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 0 1,000,000
Carlisle 80331 US-62 IMPROVE INTERSECTION WITH US 62 AND KY 1628 / PALESTINE RD PL
(CR 1024). (2024CCN) DN SPP 750,000
RW SPP 500,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 750,000 500,000
Total for Carlisle county PL
DN 4,250,000 1,000,000
RW 1,800,000
UT
CN 390,000
Total Amounts: 390,000 4,250,000 2,800,000
Page 39 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Carroll 1084 US-42 BRIDGE PROJECT IN CARROLL COUNTY ON (021B00043N) US-42 AT PL
KENTUCKY RIVER & CITY ST DN
RW
UT BRX 2,500,000
CN BRX 28,645,178
Project Cost: 31,145,178 0 0
Carroll 20020 I -71 ADDRESS CONDITION OF I-071 FROM MILEPOINT 46.1205 TO PL
MILEPOINT 53.433 DN NHPM 2,840,000
RW
UT
CN NHPM 28,400,000
Project Cost: 31,240,000 0 0
Carroll 22101 I -71 ADDRESS CONDITION OF I-071 FROM MILEPOINT 38.808 TO PL
MILEPOINT 46.1205 DN NHPM 3,170,000
RW
UT
CN NHPM 31,670,000
Project Cost: 34,840,000 0 0
Carroll 80219 KY-36 Improve safety and mobility and address geometric deficiencies at the PL
intersection of KY 36 & KY 1492 (Locust Road). (2022CCN) DN SPP 740,000
(2024CCR) RW SPP 450,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 740,000 450,000
Carroll 80301 US-42 IMPROVE SAFETY AND MOBILITY AND ADDRESS GEOMETRIC PL
DEFICIENCIES ALONG US 42 FROM THE WESTERN CITY LIMIT OF DN SPP 2,160,000
GHENT TO THE GALLATIN COUNTY LINE. (2024CCN) RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 2,160,000 0
Page 40 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Carroll 80302 KY-55 IMPROVE SAFETY AND MOBILITY AND ADDRESS GEOMETRIC PL
DEFICIENCIES ALONG KY 55 FROM KY 389 TO US 42. (2024CCN) DN SPP 4,320,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 4,320,000 0
Total for Carroll county PL
DN 6,010,000 7,220,000
RW 450,000
UT 2,500,000
CN 88,715,178
Total Amounts: 97,225,178 7,220,000 450,000
Carter 3028 I -64 Carter County East Bound Rest Area Renovation located on I-64 at MP PL
174. (2024BOP) DN
RW
UT
CN NH 940,000
Project Cost: 940,000 0 0
Carter 8401 US-60 RECONSTRUCT US-60 FROM WEST OF GLENWOOD HOLLOW ROAD PL
TO EAST OF KY-3296. THE PROJECT SHALL INCLUDE 12' LANES, DN SPP 1,040,000
WIDE PAVED SHOULDERS, UNOBSTRUCTED CLEAR ZONES, RW SPP 3,450,000
FLATTER VERTICAL GRADES, AND GENTLY HORIZONTAL CURVES.
UT
(08CCN)(12CCR)(14CCR)(18CCN) (2020CCR) (2024CCR)
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,040,000 3,450,000
Carter 9021 US-60 CONSTRUCT TURN LANES AND SAFETY FEATURES AT PROPOSED PL
NEW HIGH SCHOOL AND CAREER TECHNOLOGY CENTER. (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN SPP 1,040,000
Project Cost: 0 1,040,000 0
Page 41 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Carter 10081 CR-1464 BRIDGE PROJECT IN CARTER COUNTY ON (022C00044N) SMOKY PL
CREEK RD OVER SMOKEY CREEK DN FBP2 107,323
RW
UT
CN FBP2 715,484
Project Cost: 0 822,807 0
Carter 22051 I -64 ADDRESS CONDITION OF I-064 FROM MILEPOINT 148.665 TO PL
MILEPOINT 150.16 DN NHPM 430,000
RW
UT
CN NHPM 4,310,000
Project Cost: 0 0 4,740,000
Carter 22052 I -64 ADDRESS CONDITION OF I-064 FROM MILEPOINT 150.16 TO PL
MILEPOINT 154.26 DN NHPM 430,000
RW
UT
CN NHPM 4,310,000
Project Cost: 0 4,740,000 0
Carter 80050 US-60 IMPROVE US-60 GEOMETRY BEGINNING TERMINI AT NEW PL
CONSTRUCTION AT OLIVE HILL MP 12.4 EXTENDING 1.1 MILES TO I-64 DN
EXIT 161.(18CCN) (2022CCR) (2024CCR) RW SPP 7,700,000
UT SPP 7,020,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 7,700,000 7,020,000
Carter 80200 KY-1025 Geometric improvements on KY 1025 from US 60 (MP 0.0),East of PL
Olive Hill extending North 0.30 miles providing access to West Carter DN
Middle and High Schools and facilities. Project will include bike/ped RW
facilities. (2022CCN)
UT
CN SPP 2,470,000
Project Cost: 0 2,470,000 0
Page 42 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Carter 80201 KY-3297 Improve safety and operational efficiency of KY 3297 near East Carter PL
Middle School and the new sports complex. (2022CCN) (2024CCR) DN
RW SPP 280,000
UT SPP 220,000
CN SPP 710,000
Project Cost: 500,000 710,000 0
Carter 80304 PF-9999 Improve connectivity in Grayson between KY 1 (Carol Malone Blvd) PL
and KY 3297 (Midland Trail). (2024CCN) DN SPP 810,000
RW SPP 6,600,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 810,000 6,600,000
Carter 80305 KY-174 Curve correction on KY 174 to improve horizontal alignment which will PL
include a bridge replacement. (2024CCN) DN SPP 1,350,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,350,000 0
Total for Carter county PL
DN 3,737,323 430,000
RW 280,000 7,700,000 10,050,000
UT 220,000 7,020,000
CN 940,000 9,245,484 4,310,000
Total Amounts: 1,440,000 20,682,807 21,810,000
Casey 164 PF-9999, IMPROVE SAFETY AND GEOMETRIC DEFICIENCIES ALONG US 127 AT PL
US-127 DUNNVILLE (2022CCN) DN
RW SPP 1,880,000
UT SPP 1,030,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 0 2,910,000
Page 43 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Casey 8701 KY-70 NEW ALIGNMENT ON KY-70 FROM MP 16.8 TO 19 (12CCN) (2022CCN) PL
(2024CCR) DN SPP 1,200,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,200,000 0
Casey 8702 US-127 CORRECT VERTICAL ALIGNMENT ON US 127 AND KY 1552 NEAR PL
INTERSECTION.(12CCN) DN NH 210,000
(2024CCN) RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 210,000 0
Casey 8703 KY-70 RECONSTRUCT BELL HILL FROM MP 10.4 TO MP 11.9.(12CCN) PL
(16CCR)(18CCN) (2020CCR) (2024CCR) DN
RW SPP 3,420,000
UT SPP 1,090,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 3,420,000 1,090,000
Casey 8704 KY-49 RECONSTRUCT BRUSH CREEK HILL FROM MP 1.8 TO MP 2.8.(12CCN) PL
(16CCR)(18CCN) (2020CCR) (2022CCR) (2024CCR) DN
RW SPP 1,000,000
UT SPP 1,040,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,000,000 1,040,000
Casey 8706 KY-70 CONSTRUCT A NEW STORM DRAINING SYSTEM, CURB AND GUTTER PL
FROM BELDON AVENUE EASTWARD AND CONSTRUCT A NEW LEFT DN PROT 786,000
TURN ONTO COLLEGE STREET.(12CCN) RW PROT 1,660,000
(2024CCN)
UT
CN
Project Cost: 786,000 1,660,000 0
Page 44 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Casey 10048 KY-910 BRIDGE PROJECT IN CASEY COUNTY ON (023B00084N) KY-910 AT PL
BRANCH- DRY FORK DN BRX 151,553
RW
UT
CN BRX 1,010,356
Project Cost: 0 0 1,161,909
Total for Casey county PL
DN 786,000 1,410,000 151,553
RW 6,080,000 1,880,000
UT 3,160,000
CN 1,010,356
Total Amounts: 786,000 7,490,000 6,201,909
Christian 10 I -24 Improve capacity and mobility of the I-24/KY 115 interchange (Exit 89) PL
in Christian County, KY (2022BOP). (2024CCR) DN
RW NH 1,580,000
UT NH 2,080,000
CN NH 19,440,000
Project Cost: 3,660,000 19,440,000 0
Christian 136 PF-9999 EXTEND KY-1682 FROM THE E.T. BREATHITT PARKWAY TO PL
US-68/KY-80 EAST OF HOPKINSVILLE (HOPKINSVILLE NORTHEAST DN
BYPASS). (2020CCN) (2022CCR) (2024CCR) RW SPP 5,170,000
UT SPP 2,710,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 5,170,000 2,710,000
Christian 227 KY-1007, RECONSTRUCT KY 1007 FROM US 68 TO KY 1682 IN HOPKINSVILLE. PL
PF-9999 (INCLUDES 2-227.10)(2020CCR) (2022CCR) (2024CCR) DN
RW SPP 7,250,000
UT SPP 7,400,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 7,250,000 7,400,000
Page 45 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Christian 381.2000 PF-9999 CONSTRUCT NEW CONNECTOR FROM JUST SOUTH OF THE CSX PL
RAILROAD WEST OF PEMBROKE TO US 41 NEAR THE INDUSTRIAL DN
PARK. (D,R,U UNDER 2-381) (2024CCR) RW
UT
CN STP2 14,040,000
Project Cost: 14,040,000 0 0
Christian 8703 KY-107 IMPROVE KY-107 FROM THE BYPASS TO KY-380.(12CCN)(14CCR) PL
(2020CCR) (2024CCN) DN
RW
UT SPP 1,800,000
CN SPP 2,530,000
Project Cost: 0 1,800,000 2,530,000
Christian 8953 KY-115 IMPROVE AND WIDEN KY 115 FROM ANDERSON ROAD (MP 6.87) TO PL
JUST SOUTH OF PEMBROKE (MP 9.625)(16CCN)(18CCN) (2022CCR) DN
(2024CCR) RW
UT
CN STP2 8,010,000
Project Cost: 0 8,010,000 0
Christian 8954 KY-115 IMPROVE AND WIDEN KY 115 FROM I-24 (MP 2.901) TO ANDERSON PL
ROAD (MP 687). (16CCN) (2022CCR) (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN SPP 13,100,000
Project Cost: 0 0 13,100,000
Christian 10068 KY-107 BRIDGE PROJECT IN CHRISTIAN COUNTY ON (024B00041N) KY-107 PL
AT DONALDSON CREEK DN BRX 245,217
RW
UT
CN BRX 1,634,783
Project Cost: 0 0 1,880,000
Page 46 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Christian 10069 KY-109 BRIDGE PROJECT IN CHRISTIAN COUNTY ON (024B00058N) KY-109 PL
AT MCKNIGHTS CREEK DN BRX 237,593
RW
UT
CN BRX 1,583,953
Project Cost: 0 0 1,821,546
Christian 22014 I -24 ADDRESS CONDITION OF I-024 NON-CARDINAL DIRECTION FROM PL
MILEPOINT 75 TO MILEPOINT 85.563 DN NHPM 310,000
RW
UT
CN NHPM 3,138,790
Project Cost: 0 0 3,448,790
Christian 80001 US-41 US 41A NEW TURNING LANE NORTHBOUND AT EXISTING MEDIAN PL
CROSSOVER NEAR MILEPOST 11.4. CITY TO CONSTRUCT AND BE DN SPP 60,000
REIMBURSED. (18CCN) (2020CCR) RW
UT
CN SPP 210,000
Project Cost: 0 270,000 0
Christian 80103 I -24 ADDRESS SAFETY ISSUES BY INSTALLING INTERCHANGE LIGHTING PL
(2020CCN) DN
RW
UT
CN SPP 820,000
Project Cost: 0 820,000 0
Christian 80250 KY-107 IMPROVE SAFETY AND MOBILITY BY WIDENING AND CORRECTING PL
GEOMETRIC DEFICIENCIES ON KY 107 FROM MILEPOINT 15.0 TO DN
MILEPOINT 15.6 (2022CCN) (2024CCR) RW
UT
CN SPP 3,230,000
Project Cost: 3,230,000 0 0
Page 47 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Christian 80250.1000KY-107 Provide left and right turn lanes and improve sight distance on KY 107 PL
at the intersection of KY 107 and Lovers Lane. DN
RW
UT
CN SPP 1,680,000
Project Cost: 1,680,000 0 0
Total for Christian county PL
DN 60,000 792,810
RW 1,580,000 12,420,000
UT 2,080,000 1,800,000 10,110,000
CN 18,950,000 28,480,000 21,987,526
Total Amounts: 22,610,000 42,760,000 32,890,336
Clark 27 I -64 REPAIR, RENOVATE, AND PRESERVE THE HISTORICAL I-64 EB REST PL
AREA FACILITY IN CLARK COUNTY. DN
RW
UT
CN SPP 3,140,000
Project Cost: 3,140,000 0 0
Clark 3047 I -64 Clark County Rest Area Renovation Located on I-64 at MP 98. PL
(2024BOP) DN
RW
UT
CN SPP 4,890,000
Project Cost: 0 4,890,000 0
Clark 8952 US-60 RECONSTRUCT US 60 FOR SAFETY IMPROVEMENTS FROM I-64 IN PL
CLARK COUNTY (MP 14.210)) TO 500 FEET WEST OF SEWELL SHOP DN SPP 1,730,000
ROAD (MP 17.032).(16CCN)(18CCN) (2022CCR) (2024CCR) RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,730,000 0
Page 48 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Clark 8953 US-60 RECONSTRUCT US 60 FOR SAFETY IMPROVEMENTS FROM 500 FEET PL
WEST OF SEWELL SHOP ROAD (MP 17.032) IN CLARK COUNTY TO DN SPP 2,650,000
500 FEET WEST OF BENTBROOK (MP 2.007) IN MONTGOMERY RW
COUNTY.(16CCN) (2024CCN)
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 2,650,000 0
Clark 22154 KY-9000 ADDRESS CONDITION OF Bert T. Combs Mountain Parkway FROM PL
MILEPOINT 0 TO MILEPOINT 5.341 DN NHPM 460,000
RW
UT
CN NHPM 4,626,186
Project Cost: 0 5,086,186 0
Clark 80151 US-60 MODERNIZE AND IMPROVE CAPACITY ON US 60 FROM KY 859 PL
(HALEY RD) TO KY 1958 (BYPASS RD) IN CLARK COUNTY. DN SPP 4,090,000
(2020CCN) (2022CCR) (2024CCR) RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 0 4,090,000
Clark 80350 KY-1923 New construction of KY 1923 (Waterworks Road) between MP 4.2 PL
and 5.0. This includes a new crossing over the West Fork of Lower DN SPP 940,000
Howard Creek (2024CCN) RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 940,000 0
Clark 80359 CR-1205 Bridge Rehab/Replacement on Four Mile Road (CR 1205) at MP PL
2.15-2.16 over an Unnamed Tributary approx. 2.16 miles east along DN FBP2 158,545
the KY River from the town of Ford (025C00028N) RW
UT
CN FBP2 1,056,965
Project Cost: 0 0 1,215,510
Total for Clark county PL
DN 5,780,000 4,248,545
RW
UT
CN 3,140,000 9,516,186 1,056,965
Total Amounts: 3,140,000 15,296,186 5,305,510
Page 49 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Clay 8003.1000 US-421 IMPROVE US 421 FROM GOOSE CREEK BRIDGE (MP 15.4) TO CHOP PL
BOTTOM RD (MP 14.3) INCLUDING RECONSTRUCTION OF DN
HIGHWAY/RAIL GRADE CROSSING ON KY-1999 AT THE RW
INTERSECTION WITH US-421 AND KY-80 (2022CCN) (2024CCR)
UT
CN SPP 14,000,000
Project Cost: 0 14,000,000 0
Clay 8861 KY-638 IMPROVE SAFETY AND SIGHT DISTANCE ALONG KY 638 (MP 6.7 TO PL
MP 7.1) AND ITS INTERSECTION WITH KY 3476. (14CCN)(18CCN) DN SPP 80,000
(2020CCR) RW SPP 160,000
UT SPP 340,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 80,000 500,000
Clay 8864 CR-1286 IMPROVE GEOMETRICS ALONG URBAN CREEK ROAD (CR 1286) AND, PL
INCLUDING INTERSECTIONS AT HAL ROGERS PARKWAY AND KY DN
687. (14CCN)(18CCN) (2020CCR) RW
UT
CN SPP 12,950,000
Project Cost: 12,950,000 0 0
Clay 10176 US-421 BRIDGE PROJECT IN CLAY COUNTY ON (026B00012N) US-421 AT PL
RICE BRANCH DN
RW BRX 10,000
UT BRX 10,000
CN BRX 717,551
Project Cost: 0 0 737,551
Clay 10178 KY-66 BRIDGE PROJECT IN CLAY COUNTY ON (026B00050N) KY-66 AT PL
JACKS CREEK DN
RW BRX 10,000
UT BRX 10,000
CN BRX 1,074,388
Project Cost: 0 0 1,094,388
Page 50 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Clay 10185 CR-1155 BRIDGE PROJECT IN CLAY COUNTY ON (026C00072N) CR-1155 AT PL
MILL CREEK DN
RW FBP2 10,000
UT FBP2 10,000
CN FBP2 529,644
Project Cost: 0 549,644 0
Clay 20042 HR-9006 ADDRESS CONDITION OF Hal Rogers Daniel Boone Parkway FROM PL
MILEPOINT 27.785 TO MILEPOINT 35.929 DN STP5 180,000
RW
UT
CN STP5 1,780,000
Project Cost: 0 1,960,000 0
Clay 80251 US-421 CONSTRUCT NEW CONNECTOR ROAD BETWEEN US 421 AT MP 17.51 PL
TO RAILROAD AVE. AT MP 0.1. THIS WILL REQUIRE APPROXIMATELY DN SPP 400,000
300' OF NEW ROADWAY ALONG THE CONNECTOR, A 450' 3-LANE RW SPP 410,000
BRIDGE, NEW RIGHT TURN LANE ON US 421 AND NEW TRAFFIC
UT SPP 390,000
SIGNALS AT PROPOSED INTERSECTION. THIS IS CONTINGENT ON
CN
Project Cost: 0 400,000 800,000
Clay 80253 KY-3472 IMPROVE GEOMETRIC ALIGNMENT FROM KY 3472 AT MP 1.7 PL
CONTINUING PAST THE BERT. T. COMBS PARK TO THE INTERSECTION DN
OF BEECH CREEK ROAD AND WHITE OAK ROAD. (APPROXIMATELY RW SPP 2,000,000
1.5 MILES OF ROADWAY TO IMPROVE) (2022CCN)
UT SPP 12,760,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 14,760,000 0
Clay 80254 CR-1004 IMPROVE GEOMETRIC ALIGNMENT FROM THE INTERSECTION OF PL
BEECH CREEK ROAD AND WHITE OAK ROAD TO KY-11 AT MP 14.24. DN
(APPROXIMATELY 4.0 MILES OF ROAD WAY TO IMPROVE) RW SPP 2,200,000
(2022CCN)
UT SPP 1,250,000
CN SPP 16,000,000
Project Cost: 0 3,450,000 16,000,000
Page 51 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Clay 80352 HR-9006 Preliminary Engineering and Environmental for Hal Rogers Parkway PL
Improvement (HRPI) corridor from London to Hazard (BMP 3.887 to DN IF 24,960,000
EMP 55.201) (IF-Potential RAISE GRANT) (2024CCN) RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 24,960,000 0
Clay 80356 KY-1524 Install Guardrail on KY 1524 in Clay County (MP 9.45-12.3) (2024CCN) PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 90,000
Project Cost: 90,000 0 0
Total for Clay county PL
DN 25,620,000
RW 4,210,000 590,000
UT 14,020,000 750,000
CN 13,040,000 16,309,644 17,791,939
Total Amounts: 13,040,000 60,159,644 19,131,939
Clinton 8601.3000 US-127 RELOCATION OF US-127 FROM EAST OF THE AARON RIDGE RD AND PL
OLD US-127 INTERSECTION, EXTENDING NORTHERLY TO NORTH OF DN
THE KY-3063 AND OLD US-127 INTERSECTION. (SEE 8-108 AND RW
8-115 FOR PE&ENV)(12CCR) (2020CCR) (2022CCR) (2024CCR)
UT
CN NH 7,000,000 8,420,000
Project Cost: 0 7,000,000 8,420,000
Clinton 80313 KY-558 Improve safety and mobility of KY 558 from KY 90 to Russell/Clinton PL SPP 400,000
Co line (2024CCN) DN SPP 1,040,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 400,000 1,040,000 0
Page 52 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Total for Clinton county PL 400,000
DN 1,040,000
RW
UT
CN 7,000,000 8,420,000
Total Amounts: 400,000 8,040,000 8,420,000
Crittenden 326.1700 KY-91 OPERATION OF CAVE-IN-ROCK FERRY AT OHIO RIVER FOR FY 2027 PL
THROUGH FY 2032 USING AUDITED COSTS AS THE BASIS.(12CCR) DN
(2020CCR) (2022CCR) (2024CCR) RW
UT
CN SPP 1,662,000 1,662,000
Project Cost: 0 1,662,000 1,662,000
Crittenden 80201 KY-295 Reconstruct and elevate a 0.12 mile section of KY 295 above the PL
floodplain from M.P. 1.038 to M.P. 1.605 just south of Dycusburg DN
(2022CCN) RW SPP 180,000
UT SPP 120,000
CN SPP 560,000
Project Cost: 0 300,000 560,000
Crittenden 80334 CS-1094, UPGRADE STREET TO ACCOMMODATE TRUCK TRAFFIC, ADDRESS PL
CS-1095 SAFETY CONCERNS, ADDRESS GEOMETRIC DEFICIENCIES, POSSIBLE DN SPP 780,000
BIKE AND PED PATH. THIS PROJECT WILL EXTEND FROM US 60 TO RW SPP 500,000
US 641. (2024CCN)
UT SPP 750,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 780,000 1,250,000
Crittenden 80335 KY-120 On KY 120 reconstruct substandard curve between Herman Travis PL
Rd Intersection and Piney Creek (2024CCN) DN SPP 260,000
RW SPP 300,000
UT SPP 100,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 260,000 400,000
Page 53 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Total for Crittenden county PL
DN 1,040,000
RW 180,000 800,000
UT 120,000 850,000
CN 1,662,000 2,222,000
Total Amounts: 0 3,002,000 3,872,000
Cumberland 10053 KY-90 BRIDGE PROJECT IN CUMBERLAND COUNTY ON (029B00020N) KY-90 PL
AT DUTCH CREEK DN FBP 278,729
RW
UT
CN FBP 1,858,195
Project Cost: 2,136,924 0 0
Total for Cumberland county PL
DN 278,729
RW
UT
CN 1,858,195
Total Amounts: 2,136,924 0 0
Daviess 8300.2000 KY-54 IMPROVE KY-54 FROM BOLD FORBES WAY TO KY 1456 PL
(THRUSTON-DERMONT RD). DESIGN UNDER PARENT 2-8300.00. DN
(2018BOP) (2022CCN) (2024CCR) RW SPP 3,900,000
UT SPP 5,710,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 9,610,000 0
Daviess 8300.3000 KY-54 IMPROVE KY-54 FROM KY 1456 (THRUSTON-DERMONT RD) TO PL
COUNTRYSIDE DRIVE; DESIGN UNDER PARENT 2-8300.00. (2018BOP) DN
(2022CCR) (2024CCR) RW
UT
CN SPP 5,030,000
Project Cost: 0 0 5,030,000
Page 54 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Daviess 8300.4000 KY-54 IMPROVE KY-54 FROM COUNTRYSIDE DRIVE TO JACK HINTON RD. PL
DESIGN UNDER PARENT 2-8300.00. (2018BOP) (2022CCR) (2024CCR) DN
RW SPP 5,750,000
UT SPP 6,920,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 5,750,000 6,920,000
Daviess 8801 KY-1456 ADDRESS SUBSTANDARD ROADWAY GEOMETRICS AND SAFETY PL
CONCERNS ON KY 1456 FROM KY 54 TO HAYDEN ROAD. MP 2.778 DN
TO 4.714 (SEE 2-8709.00)(14CCN)(16CCR) (2022CCN) RW SPP 4,400,000
UT SPP 4,370,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 4,400,000 4,370,000
Daviess 8854 KY-3143 IMPROVE KY-3143 FROM KY-3335 TO KY 54. (14CCN) (2020CCR) PL
(2022CCR) (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN STP1 5,000,000
Project Cost: 0 0 5,000,000
Daviess 10020 KY-2262 ADDRESS DEFICIENCIES WITH GLOVER CARY BRIDGE OVER OHIO PL
RIVER. JOINT PROJECT WITH INDIANA. (030B00118N)(BSBP) DN BRX 1,500,000
RW
UT
CN BRX 10,000,000
Project Cost: 0 0 11,500,000
Daviess 80150 KY-144 ADDRESS SAFETY, CONGESTION, AND MOBILITY ISSUES ON KY 144 PL
FROM MP 2.5 TO MP 3.75 INCLUDING 12 FOOT DRIVING LANES AND DN SPP 720,000
TURNING LANES WHERE NEEDED. (2020CCN) (2022CCR) (2024CCR) RW SPP 1,680,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 720,000 1,680,000
Page 55 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Daviess 80301 KY-298 OLD HARTFORD RD - WIDEN TO IMPROVE TRAFFIC FLOW AND PL
SAFETY. PROJECT BEGINS AT HARRIET LN (CR 1120H) AND ENDS DN SPP 1,290,000
AT BURLEW BLVD (KY 1432). (2024CCN) RW SPP 2,190,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,290,000 2,190,000
Daviess 80302 KY-2699 RECONSTRUCT GOETZ DR FROM SOUTHTOWN BLVD (KY 2121) TO PL
FREDERICA ST (US 431). INSTALL TURN LANES AS NEEDED. DN SPP 490,000
(2024CCN) RW SPP 600,000
UT SPP 580,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 490,000 1,180,000
Daviess 80305 KY-2127 WIDEN KY 2127 FROM KELLER ROAD (CR 1301) TO KY 2121, PL
INCLUDING 10' MULTIUSE PATH. (2024CCN) DN SPP 1,130,000
RW SPP 280,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,130,000 280,000
Total for Daviess county PL
DN 3,630,000 1,500,000
RW 14,050,000 4,750,000
UT 5,710,000 11,870,000
CN 20,030,000
Total Amounts: 0 23,390,000 38,150,000
Edmonson 7030.1000 KY-259, RECONSTRUCT KY-70/KY-259 FROM 0.36 MILE NORTH GREEN RIVER PL
KY-70 BRIDGE AT BROWNSVILLE TO 0.42 MILE NORTH OF THE DN
KY-70/KY-259 INTERSECTION.(06CCR)(2004BOPC)(12CCR)(14CCR) RW
(18CCN) (2020CCR) (2022CCR) (2024CCR)
UT
CN STP2 1,240,000
Project Cost: 0 1,240,000 0
Page 56 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Edmonson 80107 KY-259 IMPROVE SAFETY AND MOBILITY ON KY 259 FROM NORTH OF PL
KYROCK ROAD TO THE GRAYSON COUNTY LINE. (2020CCN) DN
RW SPP 370,000
UT SPP 340,000
CN SPP 2,190,000
Project Cost: 0 710,000 2,190,000
Edmonson 80317 KY-259 RECONSTRUCTION AND REALIGNMENT OF KY 259 FROM MP 12.096 PL
TO 15.633/ (2024CCN) DN SPP 1,300,000
RW SPP 5,390,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,300,000 5,390,000
Edmonson 80323 KY-2326 RECONSTRUCT KY 2326 (OTTER GAP ROAD) FROM US 31W IN PL
WARREN CO. TO NOAH BLEDSOE ROAD IN EDMONSON CO. DN SPP 1,300,000
(2024CCN) RW SPP 1,500,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,300,000 1,500,000
Edmonson 80350 CR-1137 Reconstruction/Widening from KY 2326 to KY 101 (MP 0.0 - 2.455). PL
(2024CCN) DN SPP 1,670,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,670,000 0
Edmonson 80351 CR-1139 Reconstruction/Widening from KY 743 to Noah Bledsoe Road (MP 0.0 - PL
1.254). (2024CCN) DN SPP 890,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 890,000 0
Total for Edmonson county PL
DN 5,160,000
RW 370,000 6,890,000
UT 340,000
CN 1,240,000 2,190,000
Total Amounts: 0 7,110,000 9,080,000
Page 57 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Elliott 192.0100 KY-32 IMPROVE KY-32 FROM WEST OF STEGALL COLD SPRING ROAD TO PL
KY-7 NEAR NEWFOUNDLAND. (PRIORITY SECTION I)(06CCR) (08CCR) DN
(10CCR)(12CCR)(14CCR)(16CCR)(18CCR) (2020CCR) RW
UT
CN STP2 20,000,000
Project Cost: 0 0 20,000,000
Elliott 192.0300 KY-32 RECONSTRUCT KY-32 FROM 0.408 MILES WEST OF STEGALL COLD PL
SPRING ROAD TO KY-7 NEAR NEWFOUNDLAND.(PRIORITY SECTION DN STP2 4,030,000
2). (10CCR)(16CCN)(18CCN) (2024CCN) RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 4,030,000 0
Elliott 228.4000 KY-7 Reconstruct KY 7 from Sandy Hook to the Morgan County Line. PL
(2024CCR) DN
RW SPP 8,800,000
UT SPP 6,480,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 8,800,000 6,480,000
Elliott 8802 KY-32 KY-32 FROM 9.2 MILE MARKER TO 10.2 MILE MARKER WIDENING. PL
(14CCN)(16CCR)(18CCN)(2020CCR) (2022CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN STP2 17,930,000
Project Cost: 17,930,000 0 0
Total for Elliott county PL
DN 4,030,000
RW 8,800,000
UT 6,480,000
CN 17,930,000 20,000,000
Total Amounts: 17,930,000 12,830,000 26,480,000
Page 58 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Estill 205 KY-82 IMPROVE LEVEL OF SERVICE, SAFETY, AND CONNECTIVITY ON PL
KY-82 FROM KY-89 IN ESTILL CO. TO NEW CONSTRUCTION DN
LOCATED NORTH OF HUDSON MILL ROAD IN ESTILL COUNTY. RW SPP 6,300,000
(2022CCR) (2024CCN)
UT SPP 4,010,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 0 10,310,000
Estill 206 KY-2459 IMPROVE SAFETY ON KY-2459 (CARHARTT AVE.) FROM KY-89 TO PL
THE RAILROAD BRIDGE. (2020CCR) DN
RW SPP 390,000
UT SPP 620,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,010,000 0
Estill 4315 KY-499 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-499 IN ESTILL COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 20,000
Project Cost: 20,000 0 0
Estill 80300 KY-52 Construct a walkway across the Kentucky River along KY 52 in Irvine. PL
(2024CCN) DN
RW
UT
CN SPP 2,310,000
Project Cost: 2,310,000 0 0
Total for Estill county PL
DN
RW 390,000 6,300,000
UT 620,000 4,010,000
CN 2,330,000
Total Amounts: 2,330,000 1,010,000 10,310,000
Page 59 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Fayette 122.2000 US-25 Lexington-Georgetown; Reconstruct/Widen US 25 from Spurr Road to PL
Kearney Road. (Section 1) (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN SPP 22,380,000
Project Cost: 0 0 22,380,000
Fayette 122.3000 US-25 Lexington-Georgetown; Reconstruct/Widen US 25 from Kearney Road PL
to Ironworks Road. (Section 2) (2022CCR) (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN HGC 36,225,000
Project Cost: 0 36,225,000 0
Fayette 227.1400 CO-0 DEDICATED FEDERAL-AID STP FUNDS EARMARKED FOR LEXINGTON PL
URBANIZED AREA AND SUBJECT TO MPO CONTROL FOR FY 2026 DN
THROUGH FY 2032. (FUNDING SUBJECT TO FISCAL CONSTRAINT RW
PENDING MPO TIP) (2020CCR) (2024CCR)
UT
CN SLX 7,800,000 7,800,000 7,800,000
Project Cost: 7,800,000 7,800,000 7,800,000
Fayette 265 CO-0 CONSTRUCT CITATION BOULEVARD FROM RUSSELL CAVE ROAD TO PL
NEWTOWN PIKE. (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN STPF 4,060,000
Project Cost: 4,060,000 0 0
Fayette 357.1700 KY-169, OPERATION OF VALLEY VIEW FERRY AT KY RIVER FOR FY 2027 PL
PF-9999 THROUGH FY 2032. (12CCR)(18CCR) (2020CCR) (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN SPP 540,000 540,000
Project Cost: 0 540,000 540,000
Page 60 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Fayette 412 US-27 REPLACE RJ CORMAN RAILROAD BRIDGE OVERPASS (MP 8.378) PL
IMPROVE DRAINAGE AND TYPICAL SECTION ON US 27 (NORTH DN
BROADWAY) (12CCR)(14CCR)(16CCR)(18CCN)(2020CCR)(2022CCR) RW
(2024CCR)
UT
CN NH 13,492,000
Project Cost: 13,492,000 0 0
Fayette 412.1000 US-27 REPLACE RJ CORMAN RAILROAD BRIDGE OVERPASS (MP 8.378), PL
IMPROVE DRAINAGE AND TYPICAL SECTION ON US 27 (NORTH DN
BROADWAY)(12CCR)(14CCR)(16CCR)(18CCN) (2020CCR) RW
(2022CCR)(FEDERAL RAISE GRANT FUNDING COMPONENT)(SEE ITEM
UT
NO. 7-412.00 FOR NH COMPONENT)
CN KYD 8,120,000
Project Cost: 8,120,000 0 0
Fayette 430 US-27 ACCESS MANAGEMENT ON NICHOLASVILLE ROAD BETWEEN PL
NICHOLASVILLE AND MAN-O-WAR BLVD. (14CCR) (2024CCN) DN
RW SPP 11,250,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 0 11,250,000
Fayette 430.2000 US-27 NICHOLASVILLE - MAN-O-WAR BLVD; ACCESS MANAGEMENT ON PL
US-27 (NICHOLASVILLE RD) FROM JUST SOUTH OF KOHL'S DRIVE DN
TO MAN-O-WAR BLVD. RW NH 4,400,000
UT NH 1,460,000
CN SPP 15,000,000
Project Cost: 0 4,400,000 16,460,000
Fayette 439 KY-4 NEW CIRCLE RD: IMPROVE SAFETY AND REDUCE CONGESTION PL
FROM US-68 (HARRODSBURG RD) TO US-60 (VERSAILLES RD). SEE DN NH 2,480,000
SEGMENTS 2A & 2B IN AUGUST, 1998 ADVANCE PLANNING STUDY. RW
(2024CCR)
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 0 2,480,000
Page 61 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Fayette 462 KY-4 SAFETY IMPROVEMENTS TO NEW CIRCLE ROAD BETWEEN PL
BOARDWALK AND BRYAN STATION ROAD. - STATE FUNDED DN
COMPONENT OF FEDERAL GRANT RECEIVED IN LATE 2023. RW
(2024CCR)
UT KYD 690,000
CN HGC 3,980,000
Project Cost: 4,670,000 0 0
Fayette 475 CS-4702 Improve the Red Mile Corridor between South Broadway and PL
Versailles Road. DN
RW
UT
CN SPP 13,500,000
Project Cost: 0 13,500,000 0
Fayette 8801 KY-4 SOUND BARRIERS ALONG OUTER LOOP OF NEW CIRCLE ROAD PL
BETWEEN TATES CREEK ROAD AND NICHOLASVILLE ROAD. (14CCN) DN
(18CCN) (2022CCR) (2024CCR) RW
UT
CN SPP 6,350,000
Project Cost: 0 0 6,350,000
Fayette 8902 KY-1927 IMPROVE LIBERTY ROAD FROM GRAFTONS MILL LANE TO NEW PL
CIRCLE ROAD AND IMPROVE INTERSECTION WITH NEW CIRCLE DN
ROAD. (16CCN)(18CCR) (2020CCR) (2022CCR) (2024CCR) RW
UT
CN STPF 5,000,000 6,000,000
Project Cost: 0 5,000,000 6,000,000
Fayette 8909.1000 I -75 REDUCE CONGESTION ON I-64/I-75 FROM NORTHERN SPLIT TO PL
NEWTOWN PIKE (MP 115.200 – 117.665). SECTION 1 (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT NH 30,000
CN
Project Cost: 30,000 0 0
Page 62 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Fayette 8909.1500 I -75 REPLACE EXISTING I-75 SOUTHBOUND BRIDGE (034B00085N) AND PL
APPROACHES TO REDUCE CONGESTION ON I-64/I-75 FROM DN
NORTHERN SPLIT TO NEWTOWN PIKE (MP 118.0 TO MP 116.8). RW
SECTION 1 PRIORITY CONSTRUCTION SECTION.
UT
CN NH 15,000,000
Project Cost: 0 15,000,000 0
Fayette 10076 I -75 ADDRESS DEFICIENCIES OF BRIDGE ON S 75 NC OVER N PL
BROADWAY & N LIMESTONE (034B00083L and 034B00083R) DN BRX 548,856
RW
UT
CN BRX 3,659,040
Project Cost: 0 0 4,207,896
Fayette 20008 I -64 ADDRESS CONDITION OF I-064 CARDINAL DIRECTION FROM PL
MILEPOINT 71 TO MILEPOINT 74.3 DN NHPM 150,000
RW
UT
CN NHPM 1,501,000
Project Cost: 1,651,000 0 0
Fayette 20050 I -64 ADDRESS CONDITION OF I-064 FROM MILEPOINT 71 (74.3 CARDINAL) PL
TO MILEPOINT 74.729 DN STP5 180,000
RW
UT
CN STP5 1,801,000
Project Cost: 0 1,981,000 0
Fayette 80150 US-60 ADDRESS CONGESTION AND IMPROVE SAFETY ON US 60 FROM PL
MILEPOINT 12.41 TO MILEPOINT 16.37 BY WIDENING AND DN
MODERNIZING US 60 FROM THE END OF THE FOUR-LANE SECTION RW STPF 1,610,000
NEAR POLO CLUB BLVD TO KY 859 (HALEY RD). (2020CCN)
UT STPF 1,530,000
(2022CCR) (2024CCR)
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,610,000 1,530,000
Page 63 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Fayette 80205 US-27 ACCESS MANAGEMENT IMPROVEMENT ON US 27 (NICHOLASVILLE PL
RD) AT KY 4 (NEW CIRCLE) INTERCHANGE. (2022CCN) (2024CCR) DN NH 1,120,000
RW NH 2,630,000
UT NH 2,500,000
CN
Project Cost: 1,120,000 2,630,000 2,500,000
Fayette 80207 KY-1425, Provide a safe and efficient connection with access to I-64 from US PL SPP 390,000
PF-9999, 60 near the Hamburg area. (2022CCN) DN
US-60 RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 390,000 0
Fayette 80303 KY-4 RELIEVE TRAFFIC CONGESTION ON NEW CIRCLE RD BETWEEN Tates PL
Creek AND Nicholasville Rd (MP 17.741-19.283) BY INCREASING DN SPP 4,500,000
CAPACITY (2024CCN) RW SPP 1,500,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 4,500,000 1,500,000
Fayette 80304 PF-9999 Regional Corridor Feasibility Study to evaluate east-west connectivity PL SPP 540,000
between US 127 and I-75. Study region includes the following DN
counties: Anderson, Fayette, Franklin, Jessamine, Mercer, Scott & RW
Woodford. (2024CCN)
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 540,000 0
Fayette 80305 CS-3016 Alumni Drive: Address congestion from Edgewater DR to MOW Blvd. PL
(2024CCN) DN SPP 1,250,000
RW SPP 3,500,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,250,000 3,500,000
Page 64 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Fayette 80306 US-60 Modernize roadway, improve multi-mobility, and include safety and PL
capacity improvements at intersections on US 60 (Versailles Road) DN
from Viley Road to west end of Norfolk Southern railroad bridge. RW NH 2,210,000
Breakout Section of US 60 from Viley Road to Oxford Circle
UT
(2024CCN)
CN
Project Cost: 0 0 2,210,000
Fayette 80307 KY-1425 Provide additional capacity and improve multi-modal access on KY PL
1425 (Man o' War Blvd) from I-75 to US 60 (Winchester Road). DN SPP 780,000
(2024CCN) RW SPP 2,070,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 780,000 2,070,000
Fayette 80308 KY-4 Improve safety and access management measures on New Circle Rd. PL
(KY 4): from Boardwalk to North Limestone Street. (2024CCN) DN SPP 1,560,000
RW SPP 5,000,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,560,000 5,000,000
Fayette 80309 US-60 Operational & multimodal improvements on US 60 (Winchester Rd) from PL
Midland to New Circle Rd. (2024CCN) DN NH 370,000
RW NH 500,000
UT NH 500,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 370,000 1,000,000
Fayette 80323 US-60 Modernize roadway, improve multi-mobility, and include safety and PL
capacity improvements at intersections on US 60 (Versailles Road) DN NH 180,000
from Viley Road to west end of Norfolk Southern railroad bridge. RW
Breakout section of US 60 from Porter Place to Oliver Lewis
UT
(2024CCN)
CN
Project Cost: 0 0 180,000
Page 65 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Fayette 80352 KY-4 Improve safety of the entrance ramp onto WB New Circle from Tates PL
Creek Road, extension of the acceleration lane (MP 17.8 - 18.2) DN SPP 250,000
(2024CCN) RW
UT
CN SPP 900,000
Project Cost: 0 250,000 900,000
Fayette 80363 KY-4 Reduce congestion on New Circle Road between Richmond Road and PL
Alumni Drive (MP 14.851-16.123).(SAME AS 4-80360 IN SB 91 DN SPP 4,000,000
CHANGES) (2024CCN) RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 4,000,000 0
Total for Fayette county PL 930,000
DN 1,270,000 12,890,000 3,208,856
RW 8,640,000 26,030,000
UT 720,000 5,990,000
CN 38,953,000 79,866,000 62,629,040
Total Amounts: 40,943,000 102,326,000 97,857,896
Fleming 8815 KY-165 UPGRADE, WIDEN, AND PROVIDE SPOT IMPROVEMENTS ON KY-165 PL
TO IMPROVE SAFETY FROM KY-32 TO US-68. (14CCN) DN SPP 2,000,000
(2024CCN) RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 2,000,000 0
Fleming 8901 KY-11 CONSTRUCT LEFT TURN LANES ON KY 11 AT ROSS DRIVE, TAYLOR PL
MILL AND THE INDUSTRIAL PARK ROAD. (16CCN) (2024CCN) DN SPP 810,000
RW SPP 1,440,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 810,000 1,440,000
Page 66 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Fleming 8903 KY-32 SAFETY IMPROVEMENTS AND PAVEMENT REHAB EAST OF PL
FLEMINGSBURG BYPASS TO KY 156. (2020CCN) (2022CCR) DN
(2024CCR) RW
UT
CN SPP 16,200,000
Project Cost: 16,200,000 0 0
Fleming 8915 KY-801 WIDEN KY 801 FROM NEAR MMRC REGIONAL PARK TO KY 158 IN PL
FLEMING CO. (16CCN)(18CCN) (2020CCR) (2022CCR) (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN STP2 6,000,000 6,000,000
Project Cost: 0 6,000,000 6,000,000
Fleming 9020 KY-11 CONSTRUCT TURN LANES AT PROPOSED NEW SCHOOL, CENTRAL PL
OFFICE , AND BUS GARAGE. (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN SPP 1,820,000
Project Cost: 0 0 1,820,000
Fleming 10083 KY-597 BRIDGE PROJECT IN FLEMING COUNTY ON (035B00004N) KY-597 AT PL
INDIAN CREEK DN BRZ 140,251
RW
UT
CN BRZ 935,008
Project Cost: 0 1,075,259 0
Fleming 80051 KY-32 IMPROVE SAFETY AND SIGHT DISTANCE ON KY-32 BEGINNING AT PL
0.4 MILES WEST OF FLEMING/ROWAN CO LINE AND ENDING 0.3 DN
MILES EAST OF THE LINE.(18CCN) (2020CCR) (2022CCR) RW SPP 1,650,000
UT SPP 1,950,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 3,600,000 0
Page 67 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Fleming 80103 KY-57 RECONSTRUCT KY 57 TO PROVIDE BETTER HORIZONTAL AND PL
VERTICAL ALIGNMENT, WIDER SHOULDERS, AND EXTEND CLEAR DN
ZONES (2020CCN) (2022CCR) (2024CCR) RW SPP 9,900,000
UT SPP 8,400,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 9,900,000 8,400,000
Total for Fleming county PL
DN 2,950,251
RW 11,550,000 1,440,000
UT 1,950,000 8,400,000
CN 16,200,000 6,935,008 7,820,000
Total Amounts: 16,200,000 23,385,259 17,660,000
Floyd 195.1000 KY-979 SPOT IMPROVEMENTS ON KY 979, BEGINNING 0.14 MI WEST OF PL
NEWMAN’S BRANCH ROAD TO THE JOHN M. STUMBO SCHOOL. DN
(SECTION 1) RW
UT
CN HGC 6,140,000
Project Cost: 6,140,000 0 0
Floyd 195.2000 KY-979 SPOT IMPROVEMENTS ON KY 979 FROM BRANHAM’S CREEK TO 0.14 PL
MIL WEST OF NEWSOME BRANCH ROAD. (SECTION 2) DN
RW
UT
CN HGC 7,080,000
Project Cost: 0 7,080,000 0
Floyd 4336 KY-1929 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-1929 IN FLOYD COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 30,000
Project Cost: 30,000 0 0
Page 68 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Floyd 4355 KY-404 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-404 IN FLOYD COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 130,000
Project Cost: 130,000 0 0
Floyd 4356 KY-404 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-404 IN FLOYD COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 70,000
Project Cost: 70,000 0 0
Floyd 4387 KY-3385 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-3385 IN FLOYD COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 70,000
Project Cost: 70,000 0 0
Floyd 4390 KY-680 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-680 IN FLOYD COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 60,000
Project Cost: 60,000 0 0
Floyd 4423 KY-1100 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-1100 IN FLOYD COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 80,000
Project Cost: 80,000 0 0
Page 69 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Floyd 4424 KY-1100 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-1100 IN FLOYD COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 100,000
Project Cost: 100,000 0 0
Floyd 4425 KY-1428 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-1428 IN FLOYD COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 30,000
Project Cost: 30,000 0 0
Floyd 4426 KY-1428 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-1428 IN FLOYD COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 9,000
Project Cost: 9,000 0 0
Floyd 4429 KY-3384 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-3384 IN FLOYD COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 6,000
Project Cost: 6,000 0 0
Floyd 4430 KY-550 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-550 IN FLOYD COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 88,000
Project Cost: 88,000 0 0
Page 70 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Floyd 4431 KY-777 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-777 IN FLOYD COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 99,000
Project Cost: 99,000 0 0
Floyd 4432 KY-850 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-850 IN FLOYD COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 49,000
Project Cost: 49,000 0 0
Floyd 4472 KY-1498 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-1498 IN FLOYD COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 20,000
Project Cost: 20,000 0 0
Floyd 5019 KY-80 ADDRESS ROCKFALL ISSUES ON KY 80 AT MP 8 TO MP 10 IN FLOYD PL
COUNTY. (2024CCN) DN
RW
UT
CN SPP 14,200,000
Project Cost: 0 0 14,200,000
Floyd 10098 CR-1655 BRIDGE PROJECT IN FLOYD COUNTY ON (036C00074N) MARTHA'S PL
VINEYARD AT BULL CREEK DN
RW BRZ 35,000
UT BRZ 300,000
CN
Project Cost: 335,000 0 0
Page 71 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Floyd 80300 KY-680 Planning Study to evaluate potential improvements for KY 680 from MP PL SPP 620,000
13.90 to the intersection of US 23, as well as the intersection of KY DN
680 and US 23. (2024CCN) RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 620,000 0
Floyd 80353 PF-9999 Construct a new bridge and approaches off of KY 1428 near MP 14.1. PL
Provide a new access route from KY 1428 across Levisa Fork of the DN
Big Sandy River near Ball Alley Curve in Prestonsburg (Previously RW
12-8806)
UT
CN SPP 5,500,000
Project Cost: 0 0 5,500,000
Total for Floyd county PL 620,000
DN
RW 35,000
UT 300,000
CN 6,981,000 7,080,000 19,700,000
Total Amounts: 7,316,000 7,700,000 19,700,000
Franklin 551 I -64 IMPROVE SAFETY, TRUCK MOBILITY, AND REDUCE CONGESTION PL
ALONG I-64 FROM DIRECTLY EAST OF US-127 TO US-60 SOUTH OF DN NH 20,000,000
FRANKFORT. (2024CCR) RW NH 870,000
UT NH 340,000
CN
Project Cost: 20,000,000 0 1,210,000
Franklin 2035.4000 I -64 WIDEN I-64 TO 6 LANES FROM KY-395 TO KY-151. PL
DN
RW NH 280,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 0 280,000
Page 72 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Franklin 2035.7000 I -64 WIDEN I-64 TO 6 LANES FROM KY-151 TO WEST OF THE KY-420 PL
BRIDGE. (2004BOPC)(DESIGN FUNDED UNDER 5-2035.40)(16CCN) DN
(SEE ITEM NO. 5-2035.80 FOR BRIDGES) (2024CCN) RW NH 150,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 0 150,000
Franklin 10045 KY-676 BRIDGE PROJECT IN FRANKLIN COUNTY ON (037B00074N) KY 676 PL
(E-W CONN) AT KENTUCKY RIVER & KY 1263 DN
RW FBP 70,000
UT FBP 90,000
CN FBP 18,000,000
Project Cost: 0 160,000 18,000,000
Franklin 10139 US-60 ADDRESS DEFICIENCIES OF "SINGING" BRIDGE ON US 60X OVER PL
KENTUCKY RIVER (037B00065N) DN
RW STP1 1,050,000
UT STP1 3,120,000
CN STP1 8,000,000 12,000,000
Project Cost: 4,170,000 8,000,000 12,000,000
Franklin 22032 I -64 ADDRESS CONDITION OF I-064 FROM MILEPOINT 57.811 TO PL
MILEPOINT 59.431 DN NHPM 970,000
RW
UT
CN NHPM 9,700,000
Project Cost: 0 10,670,000 0
Franklin 80105 US-60 ADD A TURN LANE AT THE INTERSECTION OF KY 676 AND US 60 PL
(2020CCN) (2024CCR) DN SPP 190,000
RW SPP 180,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 190,000 180,000
Page 73 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Franklin 80301 US-60 IMPROVE SAFETY AND TRAFFIC FLOW ON US 60 (VERSAILLES PL
ROAD) FROM US 460 TO I-64 IN FRANKFORT. (2024CCN) DN NH 730,000
RW NH 3,720,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 730,000 3,720,000
Total for Franklin county PL
DN 20,000,000 1,890,000
RW 1,050,000 70,000 5,200,000
UT 3,120,000 90,000 340,000
CN 17,700,000 30,000,000
Total Amounts: 24,170,000 19,750,000 35,540,000
Fulton 25 JC-9003 IMPROVE THE PURCHASE PARKWAY AT THE KENTUCKY/TENNESSEE PL
LINE TO SOUTHWEST OF THE US-51 INTERCHANGE.(I-69 CORRIDOR DN
IMPROVEMENT) (2022CCR) RW
UT NH 1,120,000
CN NH 13,440,000
Project Cost: 1,120,000 13,440,000 0
Fulton 320.1700 KY-1354 OPERATION OF HICKMAN FERRY AT MISSISSIPPI RIVER FOR FY 2027 PL
THROUGH FY 2032. (12CCR) (2020CCR) (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN SPP 144,000 144,000
Project Cost: 0 144,000 144,000
Fulton 80304 KY-307 ADDRESS ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT, AND TRUCK ACCESS ISSUES PL
TO THE FULTON INDUSTRIAL PARK FROM THE PURCHASE PARKWAY DN SPP 780,000
TO HOLLAND LANE IN FULTON. (2024CCN) RW SPP 500,000
UT SPP 400,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 780,000 900,000
Page 74 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Fulton 80310 KY-125 CORRECT GEOMETRIC DEFICIENCIES AND ADDRESS SAFETY AND PL
FREIGHT ACCESS ISSUES FROM KY 166 TO KY 1099 IN HICKMAN. DN SPP 1,630,000
(2024CCN) RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,630,000 0
Fulton 80319 KY-94 CORRECT GEOMETRIC DEFICIENCIES AND ADDRESS SAFETY ISSUES PL
AND FREIGHT ACCESS AT INTERSECTION WITH KY 94 SOUTHWEST. DN SPP 300,000
(2024CCN) RW SPP 150,000
UT SPP 250,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 300,000 400,000
Fulton 80324 KY-1099 CORRECT SUBSTANDARD INTERSECTION GEOMETRICS AND PL
ADDRESS ACCESS ISSUES AT KY 309 & KY 1099 IN HICKMAN TO DN SPP 780,000
IMPROVE THE LESS THAN ADEQUATE TRUCK TURNING RADIUS. RW SPP 400,000
(2024CCN)
UT SPP 1,000,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 780,000 1,400,000
Fulton 80326 KY-125 CORRECT GEOMETRIC DEFICIENCIES AND ADDRESS SAFETY ISSUES PL
AND FREIGHT ACCESS FROM TENNESSEE STATE LINE TO KY 166. DN SPP 1,000,000
(2024CCN) RW SPP 750,000
UT SPP 500,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,000,000 1,250,000
Total for Fulton county PL
DN 4,490,000
RW 1,800,000
UT 1,120,000 2,150,000
CN 13,584,000 144,000
Total Amounts: 1,120,000 18,074,000 4,094,000
Page 75 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Gallatin 8910 I -71 IMPROVE GEOMETRICS ON I-71 FROM US-127 TO MP 64. (16CCN) PL
(18CCR) (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN NH 12,650,000 20,000,000
Project Cost: 0 12,650,000 20,000,000
Gallatin 22104 I -71 ADDRESS CONDITION OF I-071 FROM MILEPOINT 56.673 TO PL
MILEPOINT 59.94 DN STP4 480,000
RW
UT
CN STP4 4,820,000
Project Cost: 5,300,000 0 0
Gallatin 80303 I -71 RECONSTRUCT I-71 WITH ADDITIONAL LANES FROM LITTLE SUGAR PL
ROAD OVERPASS TO THE BOONE COUNTY LINE. (2024CCN) DN SPP 3,780,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 3,780,000 0
Gallatin 80355 US-42 Relocate US 42 from MP 0.6 to MP 2.0 (Memorandum of Agreement PL
with Nucor Steel Gallatin to provide ROW). (2024CCN) DN STP2 3,640,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 0 3,640,000
Total for Gallatin county PL
DN 480,000 3,780,000 3,640,000
RW
UT
CN 4,820,000 12,650,000 20,000,000
Total Amounts: 5,300,000 16,430,000 23,640,000
Page 76 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Garrard 196.3000 US-27 IMPROVE US-27 FROM WEST LANCASTER BYPASS TO KY-34. PL
(2006BOPC) (16CCN)(18CCR) (2020CCR) (2024CCR) DN
RW NH 9,350,000
UT NH 5,520,000
CN NH 10,000,000
Project Cost: 9,350,000 5,520,000 10,000,000
Garrard 196.5000 CO-0 West Lancaster Bypass from North of Lancaster to Bell Street at PL
Stanford, KY. (2024CCR) DN
RW NH 12,740,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 0 12,740,000
Garrard 80326 KY-34 Safety improvements to address right turn movements out of Chenault PL
Bridge onto Lexington Road (2024CCN) DN
RW
UT SPP 50,000
CN SPP 325,000
Project Cost: 50,000 325,000 0
Total for Garrard county PL
DN
RW 9,350,000 12,740,000
UT 50,000 5,520,000
CN 325,000 10,000,000
Total Amounts: 9,400,000 5,845,000 22,740,000
Grant 80216.1000US-25 Update US 25 from KY 2842 to south intersection of KY 491. PL
(2024BOP) DN
RW SPP 1,470,000
UT SPP 1,560,000
CN SPP 11,760,000
Project Cost: 0 1,470,000 13,320,000
Page 77 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Grant 80216.2000US-25 Update US 25 from KY 1994 to KY 2842. (2024BOP) PL
DN
RW SPP 4,200,000
UT SPP 3,120,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 4,200,000 3,120,000
Grant 80315 US-25 NEW CONSTRUCTION ON THE EAST SIDE OF THE RR FROM PL
SHERMAN-NEWTOWN ROAD TO LEMON-NORTHCUTT ROAD. DN SPP 6,380,000
(2024CCN) RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 0 6,380,000
Total for Grant county PL
DN 6,380,000
RW 5,670,000
UT 4,680,000
CN 11,760,000
Total Amounts: 0 5,670,000 22,820,000
Graves 220 CO-0 Rebuild Downtown Mayfield, KY from 2021 Tornado Devastation PL
(Allocated KYD USDOT RAISE Grant Funding project) (See Zvarious DN
99-8600 SPP Western KY December 2021 Tornado Relief Funding Pool RW
for uncovered FEMA or Insurance for reconstruction of existing
UT KYD 4,300,000
roads.)
CN KYD 27,200,000
Project Cost: 4,300,000 27,200,000 0
Graves 10260 KY-2422 ADDRESS DEFICIENCIES OF BRIDGE ON KY 2422 OVER BR OF OBION PL
CREEK (042B00232N) DN BRZ 221,285
RW
UT
CN BRZ 1,475,232
Project Cost: 0 1,696,517 0
Page 78 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Graves 80103 KY-303 WIDEN KY 303 FROM MP 16.034 (EAST FARTHING ST) TO MP 16.807 PL
(CHARLES DR) (2020CCN) (2022CCR) (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT SPP 2,700,000
CN SPP 5,600,000
Project Cost: 0 2,700,000 5,600,000
Graves 80104 KY-131 WIDEN KY 131 FROM MP 0 (KY 58) TO MP 4.555 (KY 483) (2020CCN) PL
(2022CCR) (2024CCR) DN
RW SPP 2,100,000
UT SPP 2,600,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 2,100,000 2,600,000
Graves 80202 KY-121 Upgrade/Widen KY 121 bypass in Mayfield to four lanes. (2022CCN) PL
(2024CCR) DN
RW SPP 550,000
UT SPP 540,000
CN SPP 10,800,000
Project Cost: 0 1,090,000 10,800,000
Graves 80332 KY-131 CORRECT GEOMETRIC DEFICIENCIES AND ADDRESS SAFETY AND PL
TRUCK ACCESS ISSUES FROM KY 348 IN SYMSONIA TO DN SPP 1,000,000
MCCRACKEN COUNTY LINE. (2024CCN) RW SPP 1,500,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,000,000 1,500,000
Graves 80333 KY-58 ADDRESS ACCESS, CONGESTION, AND GEOMETRIC ALIGNMENT PL
ISSUES FROM THE EASTERN CITY LIMITS OF MAYFIELD TO KY 131. DN SPP 1,000,000
(2024CCN) RW SPP 1,000,000
UT SPP 1,500,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,000,000 2,500,000
Total for Graves county PL
DN 2,221,285
RW 2,650,000 2,500,000
UT 4,300,000 3,240,000 4,100,000
CN 28,675,232 16,400,000
Total Amounts: 4,300,000 36,786,517 23,000,000
Page 79 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Grayson 8502.2000 US-62 IMPROVE US 62 FROM JUST EAST OF BEEHIVE CURVE TO KY224. PL
CONSTRUCTION SEGMENT 2. (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN SPP 9,720,000
Project Cost: 0 9,720,000 0
Grayson 10048 KY-79 BRIDGE PROJECT IN GRAYSON COUNTY ON (043B00053N) KY-79 AT PL
ROUGH RIVER LAKE DN FBP 310,073
RW
UT
CN FBP 2,067,154
Project Cost: 2,377,227 0 0
Grayson 22166 WK-9001 ADDRESS CONDITION OF Wendell H. Ford Western KY Parkway PL
FROM MILEPOINT 95.03 TO MILEPOINT 106.08 DN NHPM 1,360,000
RW
UT
CN NHPM 13,640,000
Project Cost: 0 0 15,000,000
Grayson 22167 WK-9001 ADDRESS CONDITION OF Wendell H. Ford Western KY Parkway PL
FROM MILEPOINT 106.08 TO MILEPOINT 108 DN NHPM 360,000
RW
UT
CN NHPM 3,640,000
Project Cost: 0 0 4,000,000
Grayson 80101 KY-259 ADDRESS SAFETY, GEOMETRIC DEFICIENCIES, AND MAINTENANCE PL
ISSUES ALONG KY 259 FROM BEAR CREEK ROAD (MP 9.217) TO THE DN SPP 1,670,000
NORTHERN INTERSECTION OF BLOOMINGTON ROAD (MP 11.761) RW
SOUTH OF LEITCHFIELD (2020CCN) (2022CCR) (2024CCR)
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,670,000 0
Page 80 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Grayson 80311 KY-3155 IMPROVE INTERSECTIONS ALONG THE LEITCHFIELD BYPASS AT KY PL
1214, US 62, AND KY 920. (2024CCN) DN SPP 500,000
RW
UT SPP 260,000
CN SPP 3,240,000
Project Cost: 0 760,000 3,240,000
Total for Grayson county PL
DN 310,073 2,170,000 1,720,000
RW
UT 260,000
CN 2,067,154 9,720,000 20,520,000
Total Amounts: 2,377,227 12,150,000 22,240,000
Green 398 PF-9999 CONSTRUCT NEW CONNECTOR ON THE EAST SIDE OF GREENSBURG PL
BEGINNING NEAR THE US-61 AND US-68 INTERSECTION SOUTH OF DN
TOWN AND EXTENDING TO KY 3535 ON THE NORTH SIDE OF RW SPP 4,200,000
GREENSBURG. (2020CCR) (2022CCR) (2024CCR)
UT SPP 3,240,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 4,200,000 3,240,000
Green 4316 KY-61 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-61 IN GREEN COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 90,000
Project Cost: 90,000 0 0
Green 8712 KY-61 IMPROVE SAFETY AND MOBILITY ON KY-61 FROM PITMAN CREEK PL
BRIDGE TO JUST NORTH OF KY323. (12CCN)(14CCR)(16CCR) DN
(2020CCR) (2022CCR) (2024CCR) RW
UT
CN STPF 8,640,000
Project Cost: 8,640,000 0 0
Page 81 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Green 80154.2000KY-210 ADDRESS SAFETY ON KY 210 FROM MORNINGSTAR ROAD (LARUE PL
MP14.23) TO JUST EAST OF CORINTH CHURCH (TAYLOR MP0.60) DN
(2024CCN) RW STPF 3,150,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 0 3,150,000
Green 80358 KY-61 Improve safety by reconstruction and widening bridge ID 044B00008N PL
on KY 61 over Clover Lick Creek at MP 6.03, approximately 2.2 miles DN FBP 148,265
south of intersection with US 68. RW
UT
CN FBP 988,437
Project Cost: 0 0 1,136,702
Total for Green county PL
DN 148,265
RW 4,200,000 3,150,000
UT 3,240,000
CN 8,730,000 988,437
Total Amounts: 8,730,000 4,200,000 7,526,702
Greenup 132 KY-2 RECONSTRUCT KY-2 FROM MP 13.2 TO US-23 (MP 17.2)(08CCN) PL
(14CCR)(16CCR)(18CCN) (2024CCR) DN SPP 750,000
RW SPP 9,350,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 750,000 9,350,000
Greenup 8509 KY-207 IMPROVE KY-207 FROM THE INDUSTRIAL PARKWAY TO THE KY-693 PL
INTERSECTION IN FLATWOODS.(08CCN)(16CCR) (2020CCR) DN
(2022CCR) (2024CCR) RW SPP 17,600,000
UT SPP 12,480,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 17,600,000 12,480,000
Page 82 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Greenup 10109 KY-8 ADDRESS DEFICIENCIES OF BRIDGE ON KY 8S OVER OHIO RV,CSX PL
RR,CO Rd, (045B00064N) DN BRX 528,000
RW
UT
CN BRX 5,280,000
Project Cost: 0 0 5,808,000
Greenup 80352 KY-693 Improve congestion, access and mobility at the KY 693/KY 1488 PL
intersection by constructing a traffic signal (MP 3.384 KY 693) DN
(2024CCN) RW SPP 110,000
UT SPP 210,000
CN SPP 420,000
Project Cost: 0 320,000 420,000
Total for Greenup county PL
DN 750,000 528,000
RW 17,710,000 9,350,000
UT 210,000 12,480,000
CN 5,700,000
Total Amounts: 0 18,670,000 28,058,000
Hancock 197 KY-69, IMPROVE CONNECTION BETWEEN US-60 AND CANNELTON BRIDGE PL
PF-9999 APPROACH AT HAWESVILLE. DN
RW
UT
CN SPP 7,500,000
Project Cost: 0 7,500,000 0
Hancock 10147 KY-69 ADDRESS DEFICIENCIES OF BRIDGE ON KY 69 OVER OHIO RIVER PL
(046B00043N) DN FBP 125,000
RW
UT
CN FBP 750,000
Project Cost: 0 875,000 0
Page 83 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Hancock 80306 US-60 WIDEN US-60 FROM MILE 2.2 IN LEWISPORT TO KY-1957. (2024CCN) PL
DN
RW SPP 250,000
UT SPP 1,000,000
CN SPP 9,000,000
Project Cost: 0 1,250,000 9,000,000
Total for Hancock county PL
DN 125,000
RW 250,000
UT 1,000,000
CN 8,250,000 9,000,000
Total Amounts: 0 9,625,000 9,000,000
Hardin 154.3000 US-31 ADDRESS CONGESTION, SAFETY, AND MOBILITY ALONG US 31W PL
FROM VETERANS WAY IN ELIZABETHTOWN TO THE NORTH WILSON DN SPP 2,500,000
ROAD OVERPASS IN RADCLIFF. (2018BOP) (2022CCR) (2024CCR) RW SPP 8,400,000
UT SPP 4,960,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 2,500,000 13,360,000
Hardin 198 PF-9999 EXTEND RING ROAD FROM THE WESTERN KENTUCKY PARKWAY TO PL
I-65. (REQUIRES RELOCATION OF I-65 SOUTHBOUND COMMERCIAL DN
VEHICLE MONITORING STATION, PROJECT 4-286.10) (12CCR)(14CCR) RW STP2 6,100,000
(2020CCN) (2022CCR) (2024CCR)
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 0 6,100,000
Hardin 201 US-31 Removal of two at-grade CSX Railroad Crossings on Quarry Road PL
(CS-1518) near US31W, and the construction of a single separated DN
grade crossing, in the City of Upton in Hardin County. (2024CCR) RW RRS 790,000
UT RRS 710,000
CN RRS 5,300,000
Project Cost: 790,000 710,000 5,300,000
Page 84 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Hardin 202 PF-9999 CONSTRUCT A BYPASS OF GLENDALE. (2022BOP) (2024CCN) PL
DN
RW SPP 6,400,000
UT SPP 1,500,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 7,900,000 0
Hardin 204 CO-0 College Street Road and US 62 Safety Improvements Project with PL
USDOT SS4A Grant and $800,000 state matching funds. DN
RW
UT
CN KYD 7,000,000
SPP 800,000
Project Cost: 7,800,000 0 0
Hardin 286.1000 I -65 I-65 SOUTHBOUND PORT OF ENTRY FOR A COMMERCIAL VEHICLE PL
MONITORING STATION. (2022CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN NH 15,000,000
Project Cost: 0 0 15,000,000
Hardin 10054 KY-86 BRIDGE PROJECT IN HARDIN COUNTY ON (047B00060N) KY-86 AT PL
VERTRESS CREEK DN BRX 270,484
RW
UT
CN BRX 1,803,229
Project Cost: 0 0 2,073,713
Hardin 20051 BG-9002 ADDRESS CONDITION OF Martha Layne Collins Bluegrass Parkway PL
FROM MILEPOINT 5.853 TO MILEPOINT 8.837 DN STP5 120,000
RW
UT
CN STP5 1,192,960
Project Cost: 0 1,312,960 0
Page 85 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Hardin 80200 US-62 Address safety, mobility, and access management, along with PL
potentially reconfiguring the interchange to I 65. (2022CCN) (2024CCR) DN
RW SPP 6,310,000
UT SPP 1,150,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 6,310,000 1,150,000
Hardin 80250 PF-9999 EXTEND RING ROAD FROM US 31W TO KY 61 (LINCOLN PARKWAY) PL
(2022CCN) (2024CCR) DN
RW SPP 2,200,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 0 2,200,000
Hardin 80301 KY-1600 ADDRESS GEOMETRIC DEFICIENCIES ALONG KY 1600 FROM KY 361 PL
TO THE ROUNDABOUT AT KY 220 IN RINEYVILLE. (2024CCN) DN SPP 730,000
RW SPP 1,880,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 730,000 1,880,000
Hardin 80303 PF-9999 EXTEND COMMERCE DRIVE FROM SPRINGFIELD ROAD TO US 31W AT PL
KY 1136 ON THE SOUTH SIDE OF ELIZABETHTOWN. (2024CCN) DN
RW SPP 2,890,000
UT SPP 1,620,000
CN SPP 5,040,000
Project Cost: 0 4,510,000 5,040,000
Hardin 80310 US-62 IMPROVE THE INTERSECTION OF US 62 AND THE US 31W BYPASS PL
RAMP AT NICHOLAS STREET IN ELIZABETHTOWN. (2024CCN) DN SPP 570,000
RW SPP 2,100,000
UT SPP 2,080,000
CN
Project Cost: 570,000 0 4,180,000
Page 86 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Hardin 80313 US-31 ADD SHOULDERS AND TURN LANES TO US 31W BETWEEN KY 1136 PL
AND KY 222 EAST OF GLENDALE. SEE GLENDALE AREA DN SPP 1,570,000
TRANSPORTATION STUDY. (2024CCN) RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,570,000 0
Hardin 80351 CR-1292 Replace Meeting Creek Bridge (047C00063N) over P&L Railway ( MP PL
4.050 -4.070). DN FBP 182,201
RW
UT
CN FBP 1,214,676
Project Cost: 0 1,396,877 0
Total for Hardin county PL
DN 570,000 5,102,201 270,484
RW 790,000 15,600,000 20,680,000
UT 3,830,000 8,190,000
CN 7,800,000 2,407,636 27,143,229
Total Amounts: 9,160,000 26,939,837 56,283,713
Harlan 4370 KY-987 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-987 IN HARLAN COUNTY (2024CCR) PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 90,000
Project Cost: 90,000 0 0
Harlan 4371 KY-987 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-987 IN HARLAN COUNTY (2024CCR) PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 30,000
Project Cost: 30,000 0 0
Page 87 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Harlan 5012 US-421 Address Slide on US 421 in Harlan County. PL
DN
RW
UT
CN SPP 5,040,000
Project Cost: 0 5,040,000 0
Harlan 10015 KY-2007 BRIDGE PROJECT IN HARLAN COUNTY ON (048B00179N) KY-2007 PL
AT WALLINS CREEK DN BRX 144,955
RW
UT
CN BRX 966,368
Project Cost: 1,111,323 0 0
Harlan 10018 CS-1041 ADDRESS DEFICIENCIES OF BRIDGE ON KENTUCKY AV OVER PL
MARTINS FK CUMBERLAND RV (048C00067N) DN BRZ 1,019,992
RW
UT
CN BRZ 6,799,950
Project Cost: 7,819,942 0 0
Harlan 10233 KY-38 ADDRESS DEFICIENCIES OF BRIDGE ON KY 38 OVER Fanny Wynn PL
Branch (048B00197N) DN
RW
UT
CN BRX 776,000
Project Cost: 0 776,000 0
Harlan 20040 US-119 ADDRESS CONDITION OF US-119 FROM MILEPOINT 6 TO MILEPOINT PL
7.8 DN STP4 272,000
RW
UT
CN STP4 3,128,000
Project Cost: 0 3,400,000 0
Page 88 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Harlan 80257 KY-72 EXTEND KY 72 FROM ALVA/BLACK STAR NEAR HARLAN /BELL PL
COUNTY LINE TO LIGGETT WEST OF HARLAN CITY. DN SPP 1,750,000
APPROXIMATELY 5 MILES OF RECONSTRUCTION (2022CCN) RW SPP 2,000,000
(2024CCR)
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,750,000 2,000,000
Harlan 80259 US-421 SPOT IMPROVEMENTS TO IMPROVE GEOMETRICS AT PARTICULAR PL
LOCATIONS OF US 421 CROSSING OVER PINE MOUNTAIN BETWEEN DN
US 119 AND KY 221 IN HARLAN COUNTY TO ADDRESS SAFETY RW SPP 750,000
CONCERNS. MILEPOINT 17.2 TO MILEPOINT 23.0 (2022CCN)
UT SPP 800,000
CN SPP 13,520,000
Project Cost: 0 1,550,000 13,520,000
Harlan 80260 KY-72 TO IMPROVE ACCESS, CONNECTIVITY AND MOBILITY BY EXTENDING PL
KY 72 FROM ALVA/BLACK STAR NEAR HARLAN/ BELL COUNTY DN SPP 1,000,000
LINE. RECONSTRUCT EXISTING COAL HAUL ROAD TO CONNECT KY RW
72 TO KY 72 (2022CCN) (2024CCR)
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,000,000 0
Harlan 80358 KY-2010 Spot improvements to widen at particular locations along KY 2010 to PL
improve mobility and safety (2024CCN) DN SPP 520,000
RW SPP 110,000
UT
CN SPP 2,000,000
Project Cost: 2,630,000 0 0
Harlan 80359 KY-221 Spot improvements to improve geometrics at particular locations of KY PL
221 to address safety concerns (MP 10 - 17.5) (2024CCN) DN SPP 520,000
RW SPP 200,000
UT SPP 200,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 520,000 400,000
Page 89 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Harlan 80363 US-119 Construct various turn lanes along US 119 at the following highways - PL
Camp O. Cumberlands, Billy G Hollow Road, KY 3467, Shewmaker DN
Hollow, KY 3452 ad Tremont Lane (2024CCN) RW
UT
CN SPP 1,040,000
Project Cost: 1,040,000 0 0
Harlan 80365 KY-221, Improve safety along KY 38, KY 221, KY 987, US 421, and KY 522 by PL
KY-38, removing trees (2024CCN) DN
KY-522, RW
KY-987,
UT
US-421
CN SPP 2,000,000
Project Cost: 0 2,000,000 0
Total for Harlan county PL
DN 1,684,947 3,542,000
RW 110,000 750,000 2,200,000
UT 800,000 200,000
CN 10,926,318 10,944,000 13,520,000
Total Amounts: 12,721,265 16,036,000 15,920,000
Harrison 4307 KY-32 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-32 IN HARRISON COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 50,000
Project Cost: 50,000 0 0
Harrison 8708 US-27 RECONSTRUCT US 27 FROM MP 11.9 TO MP 12.4. (12CCN)(14CCR) PL
(18CCN) (2022CCR) (2024CCR) DN
RW SPP 1,050,000
UT SPP 540,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,050,000 540,000
Page 90 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Harrison 80251 CR-1124, CONSTRUCT A CONNECTOR ROAD BETWEEN OLD LAIR ROAD AND PL
KY-982, KY 982 (NEW LAIR ROAD) NEAR THE HARRISON COUNTY HIGH DN
PF-9999, SCHOOL. (2022CCN) (2024CCR) RW SPP 1,580,000
US-27
UT SPP 200,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,780,000 0
Harrison 80252 CS-1159 CONSTRUCT A ROUNDABOUT AT THE INTERSECTION OF WEBSTER PL
AVENUE (CS-1071) AND EDUCATION DRIVE. (2022CCN) (2024CCR) DN
RW SPP 530,000
UT SPP 100,000
CN SPP 650,000
Project Cost: 0 630,000 650,000
Harrison 80353 KY-982 Provide a two way left turn lane on KY 982 (New Lair Road) (MP 4.4 - PL
5.1) (2024CCN) DN SPP 780,000
RW SPP 600,000
UT SPP 1,500,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 780,000 2,100,000
Total for Harrison county PL
DN 780,000
RW 3,160,000 600,000
UT 300,000 2,040,000
CN 50,000 650,000
Total Amounts: 50,000 4,240,000 3,290,000
Hart 20049 KY-218 ADDRESS CONDITION OF KY-218 FROM MILEPOINT 7.245 TO PL
MILEPOINT 11.528 DN STP5 264,000
RW
UT
CN STP5 3,036,000
Project Cost: 0 0 3,300,000
Page 91 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Total for Hart county PL
DN 264,000
RW
UT
CN 3,036,000
Total Amounts: 0 0 3,300,000
Henderson 383.1000 CS-1372 Improve the intersection of Watson Lane (CS-1372) and US 41. PL
(2022CCR) (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN STP1 4,480,000
Project Cost: 4,480,000 0 0
Henderson 383.2000 CS-1372 Address safety and congestion along Watson Lane (CR-1372). PL
(2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN SPP 3,030,000
Project Cost: 0 3,030,000 0
Henderson 1088.5000 PF-9999 DELIVERY OF I-69 ORX SECTION 2 FROM US 60 NORTH TO SECTION PL
3 SOUTH OF EVANSVILLE. (COSTS SHARED BY KY AND IN) DN
(2024CCR) RW
UT NH 10,000,000
CN NH 39,000,000
Project Cost: 10,000,000 39,000,000 0
Henderson 1088.5200 PF-9999 I-69 Ohio River Crossing (ORX) at Henderson/Evansville (KY Share) - PL
SGF Fund Component "CONTINGENT UPON AWARD OF A FEDERAL DN
MULTIMODAL PROJECT DISCRETIONARY GRANT FOR THIS RW
PROJECT". (2024CCR)
UT
CN SGF 150,000,000
Project Cost: 150,000,000 0 0
Page 92 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Henderson 1088.5300 PF-9999 I-69 OHIO RIVER CROSSING (ORX) AT HENDERSON/EVANSVILLE PL
SECTION 2 TOLLING COMPONENT. (KY SHARE) DN
RW
UT
CN IF 175,000,000
Project Cost: 0 175,000,000 0
Henderson 22333 KY-425 ADDRESS CONDITION OF KY-425 FROM MILEPOINT 0 TO MILEPOINT PL
4.747 DN STP3 480,000
RW
UT
CN STP3 5,520,000
Project Cost: 0 6,000,000 0
Henderson 80309 PF-9999 CONSTRUCT A NEW ROUTE INTO THE PARK FROM WATSON LANE. PL
(2024CCN) DN
RW SPP 300,000
UT SPP 250,000
CN SPP 2,900,000
Project Cost: 300,000 250,000 2,900,000
Henderson 80310 KY-425 IMPROVE LEVEL OF SERVICE ON KY 425 FROM US60 TO US 41. PL
(2024CCN) DN SPP 1,740,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,740,000 0
Henderson 80311 US-60 IMPROVE EASTERN INTERSECTION OF US 60 AND KY 1078. PL
(2024CCN) DN SPP 270,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 270,000 0
Page 93 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Henderson 80350 KY-812 Improve congestion and mobility on KY 812 in the vicinity of sports PL
complex (MP 5.7-6.11). (2024CCN) DN SPP 520,000
RW SPP 300,000
UT SPP 500,000
CN SPP 2,500,000
Project Cost: 0 520,000 3,300,000
Total for Henderson county PL
DN 3,010,000
RW 300,000 300,000
UT 10,000,000 250,000 500,000
CN 154,480,000 222,550,000 5,400,000
Total Amounts: 164,780,000 225,810,000 6,200,000
Henry 572 I -71 IMPROVE SAFETY AND REDUCE CONGESTION ON I-71 FROM KY 153 PL
TO US 421. (2024CCN) DN SPP 4,320,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 4,320,000 0
Henry 8820 KY-55 REHABILITATION-OVERLAY AND WIDENING EXISTING KY-55 FROM PL
KY-22 TO CURVE AT MP 2.210 NORTH OF EMINENCE. INCLUDES DN
REPLACING EXISTING CURB AND GUTTER AND SIDEWALKS, AND RW SPP 1,830,000
RELOCATION OF IMPACT UTILITIES. (MP 1.408 TO 2.210)(14CCN)
UT SPP 1,450,000
(2024CCN)
CN
Project Cost: 0 3,280,000 0
Henry 8822 KY-389 GEOTECH REPAIRS ON KY-389 IN HENRY COUNTY ABOVE THE PL
KENTUCKY RIVER SOUTH OF MARSHALLS BOTTOM ROAD. (14CCN) DN SPP 580,000
(2024CCN) RW SPP 600,000
UT SPP 290,000
CN SPP 2,320,000
Project Cost: 0 580,000 3,210,000
Page 94 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Total for Henry county PL
DN 4,900,000
RW 1,830,000 600,000
UT 1,450,000 290,000
CN 2,320,000
Total Amounts: 0 8,180,000 3,210,000
Hickman 80203 US-51 Correct geometric deficiencies and improve safety, access, and PL
regional connectivity from Clayton Street to KY-703 in Clinton. DN
(2022CCN) (2024CCR) RW SPP 1,580,000
UT SPP 2,600,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,580,000 2,600,000
Hickman 80325 US-51 CORRECT GEOMETRIC DEFICIENCIES AND IMPROVE SAFETY, PL
ACCESS, AND REGIONAL CONNECTIVITY FROM KY-703 IN CLINTON DN SPP 1,770,000
TO .160 MILES SOUTH OF OBION CREEK BRIDGE. (2024CCN) RW SPP 2,500,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,770,000 2,500,000
Hickman 80327 US-51 IMPROVE SAFETY, ACCESS, AND REGIONAL CONNECTIVITY, AND PL
ADDRESS GEOMETRIC DEFICIENCIES FROM HICKMAN C/L TO CANE DN SPP 1,040,000
CREEK BRIDGE. (2024CCN) RW SPP 1,000,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,040,000 1,000,000
Hickman 80328 US-51 CORRECT GEOMETRIC DEFICIENCIES, AND IMPROVE SAFETY, PL
ACCESS AND REGIONAL CONNECTIVITY FROM BAYOU DE CHEIN DN SPP 1,560,000
BRIDGE TO MARTIN ROAD. (2024CCN) RW SPP 1,050,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,560,000 1,050,000
Page 95 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Hickman 80329 KY-307 IMPROVE SAFETY, TRUCK MOBILITY, AND GEOMETRIC DEFICIENCIES PL
AT THE ICR RAILROAD OVERPASS. (2024CCN) DN SPP 800,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 0 800,000
Hickman 80330 US-51 IMPROVE INTERSECTION GEOMETRICS AND ADDRESS SIGHT PL
DISTANCE ISSUES WITH ACCESS TO US 51 FROM KY 1301 AND THE DN SPP 520,000
ENTRANCE OF HARPERS COUNTRY HAMS NEAR CLINTON. RW SPP 150,000
(2024CCN)
UT SPP 350,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 520,000 500,000
Total for Hickman county PL
DN 4,890,000 800,000
RW 1,580,000 4,700,000
UT 2,950,000
CN
Total Amounts: 0 6,470,000 8,450,000
Hopkins 129 US-41 Remove the median on US 41 (South Main Street) from the railroad to PL
MP 15.521 (2024CCN) DN SPP 500,000
RW SPP 385,000
UT SPP 760,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 500,000 1,145,000
Hopkins 384 KY-281 IMPROVE KY-281 FROM ISLAND PARK DRIVE TO 0.25 MI NORTH OF PL
CARRIAGE LANE (KY-2281). DN
RW SPP 2,100,000
UT SPP 1,930,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 2,100,000 1,930,000
Page 96 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Hopkins 804.3000 PF-9999 Extend Midtown Blvd from CSX Railroad to Whittington Drive, 500’ PL
south of Commerce Drive. (2022CCR) (2024CCR) DN
RW SPP 580,000
UT SPP 1,300,000
CN SPP 5,200,000
Project Cost: 0 1,880,000 5,200,000
Hopkins 804.4000 CS-1287 Reconstruct Whittington Drive beginning 500’ south of Commerce Drive PL
and ending at the intersection of Whittington Drive and Island Ford DN
Road (KY 281), including the reconstruction of the KY 281 RW SPP 2,400,000
intersection. (2022CCR) (2024CCR)
UT SPP 1,680,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 2,400,000 1,680,000
Hopkins 8305 US-41 IMPROVE NORTH MAIN STREET FROM HOSPITAL DRIVE TO KY-281. PL
(06CCN)(12CCR)(18CCR) (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN HGC 9,470,000
Project Cost: 0 9,470,000 0
Hopkins 20031 I -69 ADDRESS CONDITION OF I-069 FROM MILEPOINT 124.946 TO PL
MILEPOINT 126.839 DN NHPM 1,100,000
RW
UT
CN NHPM 11,000,000
Project Cost: 0 0 12,100,000
Hopkins 22083 I -69 ADDRESS CONDITION OF I-069 FROM MILEPOINT 89.848 TO PL
MILEPOINT 93.724 DN NHPM 470,000
RW
UT
CN NHPM 4,715,274
Project Cost: 0 0 5,185,274
Page 97 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Hopkins 22087 I -69 ADDRESS CONDITION OF I-069 FROM MILEPOINT 108.994 TO PL
MILEPOINT 114.246 (113.81 NON-CARDINAL) DN NHPM 1,050,000
RW
UT
CN NHPM 10,517,430
Project Cost: 11,567,430 0 0
Hopkins 22337 US-62 ADDRESS CONDITION OF US-62 FROM MILEPOINT 15.4 TO MILEPOINT PL
15.8 DN STP3 100,000
RW
UT
CN STP3 1,150,000
Project Cost: 0 1,250,000 0
Hopkins 80105 US-41 IMPROVE US 41A BEGINNING AT INDUSTRIAL DR AT HOPKINS CO PL
ENDING AT PROVIDENCE (2022CCR) (2024CCR) DN SPP 2,900,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 2,900,000 0
Hopkins 80105.1000US-41 IMPROVE US41A BEGINNING NEAR NEBO AT MP 8.7 AND ENDING AT PL
MP 11.2 IN HOPKINS COUNTY. (2022BOP) (2024CCN) DN
RW SPP 2,630,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 0 2,630,000
Hopkins 80105.2000US-41 IMPROVE US41A BEGINNING NEAR KY 630 AT MP 5.0 AND ENDING PL
AT MP 7.4 IN HOPKINS COUNTY. (2022BOP) DN
RW SPP 1,800,000
UT SPP 1,740,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,800,000 1,740,000
Page 98 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Hopkins 80300 KY-260 IMPROVE SAFETY AND MOBILITY OF KY 260 FROM THE PL
APPROACHES AT THE RAILROAD CROSSING IN HANSON TO THE DN SPP 730,000
SOUTHBOUND ON AND OFF RAMPS OF I69. (2024CCN) RW SPP 2,000,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 730,000 2,000,000
Total for Hopkins county PL
DN 1,050,000 4,230,000 1,570,000
RW 6,880,000 5,015,000
UT 1,300,000 6,110,000
CN 10,517,430 10,620,000 20,915,274
Total Amounts: 11,567,430 23,030,000 33,610,274
Jackson 4404 KY-89 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-89 IN JACKSON COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 40,000
Project Cost: 40,000 0 0
Jackson 10041 KY-89 BRIDGE PROJECT IN JACKSON COUNTY ON (055B00028N) KY-89 AT PL
HORSE LICK CREEK DN
RW BRZ 2,000
UT BRZ 5,000
CN BRZ 1,056,128
Project Cost: 7,000 0 1,056,128
Jackson 10198 US-421 BRIDGE PROJECT IN JACKSON COUNTY ON (055B00001N) US-421 PL
AT INDIAN CREEK DN
RW
UT
CN FBP 1,540,000
Project Cost: 1,540,000 0 0
Page 99 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Jackson 80104 US-421 ADDRESS SUBSTANDARD HORIZONTAL AND VERTICAL ALIGNMENT PL
OF US 421 IN THE CLOVER BOTTOM AREA NEAR THE STONE DN
QUARRY. (2020CCN) RW SPP 1,395,500
UT SPP 400,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,395,500 400,000
Jackson 80105 US-421 ADDRESS SAFETY ISSUES WITH VERTICAL AND HORIZONTAL PL
ALIGNMENT ON US 421 FROM MP 11.6 EAST OF PILGRIMS REST RD DN
TO MP 12.6 (2020CCN) (2024CCR) RW
UT
CN SPP 13,000,000
Project Cost: 0 13,000,000 0
Jackson 80261 KY-578 MOVE KY 578 OVER 10FT FOR IMPROVED SIGHT DISTANCE AND PL
CREATE A BETTER APPROACH FOR MOORE CREEK GREEN HILL DN
ROAD (2022CCN) RW SPP 60,000
UT SPP 340,000
CN SPP 1,400,000
Project Cost: 0 400,000 1,400,000
Jackson 80313 KY-290 Improve the existing geometric alignments at two spot locations (MP PL
4.7-6.3 and 8.0-8.5) by realigning curves in high crash cluster areas DN SPP 1,040,000
and widening. Improve design speed to 45 mph along these two RW
sections. (2024CCN)
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,040,000 0
Total for Jackson county PL
DN 1,040,000
RW 2,000 1,455,500
UT 5,000 340,000 400,000
CN 1,580,000 13,000,000 2,456,128
Total Amounts: 1,587,000 15,835,500 2,856,128
Page 100 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Jefferson 21.2000 I -265 SNYDER FREEWAY; RECONSTRUCT 2 RAMPS AT I-265/I-64 PL
INTERCHANGE EAST OF LOUISVILLE. (DESIGNED WITH 5-41) DN NH 3,000,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 0 3,000,000
Jefferson 323.0100 KY-1931 WIDEN GREENWOOD ROAD FROM GREENBELT HWY TO DIXIE HWY PL
(US-31W) (3-LANE IMPROVEMENT) FROM MP 0.54 TO MP 3.148. DN
(98CCR)(R-04DEOB)(04CCR)(BOP2006P)(10CCR)(12CCR) (2020CCR) RW
(2022CCR) (2024CCR)
UT
CN HGC 32,940,000
Project Cost: 0 0 32,940,000
Jefferson 373.2000 KY-1819 RECONSTRUCT AND WIDEN KY 1819 (WATTERSON TRAIL) - PL
PLANTSIDE DRIVE TO BLUEGRASS PARKWAY. (98CCR) (2024CCN) DN SPP 470,000
RW
UT SPP 2,110,000
CN SPP 9,830,000
Project Cost: 0 470,000 11,940,000
Jefferson 478.3000 US-31 IMPROVE DIXIE HIGHWAY BETWEEN GREENWOOD ROAD (KY 1931) PL
AND STONESTREET ROAD (CR 1003). (14CCN) (2024CCN) DN NH 630,000
RW SPP 510,000
UT SPP 1,390,000
CN
Project Cost: 630,000 1,900,000 0
Jefferson 554 I -265 IMPROVE SAFETY AND REDUCE CONGESTION ON I-265 FROM I-65 TO PL
US-31E. (2024CCR) DN NH 1,500,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 0 1,500,000
Page 101 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Jefferson 555 KY-1747 REDUCE CONGESTION AND IMPROVE SAFETY ALONG KY-1747 PL
(HURSTBOURNE PARKWAY) FROM STONY BROOK DRIVE TO I-64. DN SPP 7,660,000
(2024CCN) RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 7,660,000 0
Jefferson 558 I -265 IMPROVE SAFETY AND REDUCE CONGESTION ON I-265 FROM PL
US-31E (BARDSTOWN RD) TO KY-155 (TAYLORSVILLE RD). DN NH 7,500,000
(2024CCR) RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 7,500,000 0
Jefferson 559 I -65 IMPROVE SAFETY AND REDUCE CONGESTION AT THE I-65/I-264 PL
(WATTERSON EXPRESSWAY) INTERCHANGE. (2024CCR) DN NH 3,480,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 3,480,000 0 0
Jefferson 587 PF-9999 Reconnecting West Louisville to the Ohio Riverfront throughout the PL
Riverside Expressway (I-64) Corridor USDOT Grant project (Louisville DN KYD 1,927,000
Metro to provide $100,000 toward the cost of project). RW
UT KYD 1,575,000
CN KYD 24,839,000
STPF 1,387,000
Project Cost: 29,728,000 0 0
Jefferson 607 I -264, I -64 INSTALLATION OF SOLAR LIGHTING AT I-64/I-264 INTERCHANGE AT PL
SHERMAN MINTON BRIDGE; I-264/RIVER PARK-ALI; I-264/BELLS DN
LANE; I-264/VIRGINA/DUMESNIL; AND I-264/RALPH AVE-CANE RUNE RW
INTERSECTIONS IN JEFFERSON COUNTY KENTUCKY. (2024BOP)
UT
CN CARB 2,080,000
Project Cost: 2,080,000 0 0
Page 102 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Jefferson 965.1900 CO-0 DEDICATED FEDERAL AID STP FUNDS EARMARKED FOR LOUISVILLE PL
URBANIZED AREA AND SUBJECT TO MPO CONTROL FOR FY DN
2026-2032. (FUNDING SUBJECT TO FISCAL CONSTRAINT PENDING RW
MPO TIP). (2020CCR) (2022CCR) (2024CCR)
UT
CN SLO 26,800,000 26,800,000 26,800,000
Project Cost: 26,800,000 26,800,000 26,800,000
Jefferson 1070 CS-1017 ADDRESS DEFICIENCIES OF BRIDGE ON E KENTUCKY ST (CS 1017G) PL
OVER SOUTH FORK BEARGRASS CREEK 0.01 MILE E OF SCHILLER DN FBP2 356,881
AVE (CS 1138G) 056C00083N (2020CCR) RW
UT
CN FBP2 2,379,206
Project Cost: 0 2,736,087 0
Jefferson 1079 CR-1001 BRIDGE PROJECT IN JEFFERSON COUNTY ON (056C00130N) RIVER PL
RD AT GOOSE CREEK DN BRZ 1,210,368
RW
UT
CN BRZ 8,069,119
Project Cost: 0 0 9,279,487
Jefferson 8205.1000 KY-2053 IMPROVE AND WIDEN MT WASHINGTON ROAD FROM PRESTON PL
HIGHWAY TO PENN RUN CREEK BRIDGE. (10CCN)(SAME AS DN
5-8611.00) (2024CCN) RW SPP 5,080,000
UT SPP 9,510,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 5,080,000 9,510,000
Jefferson 8810 KY-1931 THREE LANE WIDENING ALONG KY-1931 FROM THE DOSS HIGH PL
SCHOOL ENTRANCE TO PALATKA ROAD, INCLUDING INTERSECTION DN
IMPROVEMENTS WITH PALATKA ROAD AND TURN LANES. (14CCN) RW
(2020CCR) (2024CCR)
UT
CN HGC 6,070,000
Project Cost: 0 0 6,070,000
Page 103 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Jefferson 8905 KY-1747, EXTEND THE LEFT TURN LANE ON HURSTBOURNE LANE AT PL
PF-9999 INTERSECTION WITH SIX MILE LANE. (16CCN) (2024CCN) DN
RW
UT
CN SPP 210,000
Project Cost: 0 210,000 0
Jefferson 8908 KY-155 WIDEN TAYLORSVILLE ROAD FROM I-265 TO KY-148. (18CCN) PL
(2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN STPF 23,760,000
Project Cost: 23,760,000 0 0
Jefferson 8954.1000 KY-155 Improve safety and traffic operations on KY 155 from MP 2.0 in PL
Spencer County to Floyds Fork In Jefferson County (total length 6.247 DN STPF 2,080,000
miles) (Portion of 5-8954.0). (2024CCN) RW STPF 3,540,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 2,080,000 0 3,540,000
Jefferson 9026 CR-1013, SAFETY IMPROVEMENTS AT CR 1013F AT CRUMS LANE PL
KY-1934 ELEMENTARY. (2020BOP)(2021SCHSAF) (2024CCN) DN SPP 420,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 420,000 0
Jefferson 10008 CS-1079 ADDRESS DEFICIENCIES OF OLD WESTPORT RD BRIDGE OVER PL
GOOSE CREEK. (056C00113N) (2020CCR) DN BRX 165,331
RW
UT
CN BRX 1,102,206
Project Cost: 0 0 1,267,537
Page 104 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Jefferson 10016 I -64 BRIDGE PROJECT IN JEFFERSON COUNTY ON (056B00142N) I-64 AT PL
KY 3077 (RIVER RD). (BRIDGE PAINTING OF I-64 RIVERSIDE DN
EXPRESSWAY BRIDGES) RW
UT
CN BRX 8,000,000
Project Cost: 8,000,000 0 0
Jefferson 10064 I -65 BRIDGE PROJECT IN JEFFERSON COUNTY ON (056B00179N) I-65 AT PL
HILL, CSX RR & BURNETT (POTENTIAL CMGC DELIVERY PROJECT) DN
RW
UT
CN BRO 43,000,000
FBP 6,304,783
Project Cost: 49,304,783 0 0
Jefferson 10065 I -65 BRIDGE PROJECT IN JEFFERSON COUNTY ON (056B00180N) I-65 AT PL
US 60A (EASTERN PKWY) DN BRO 5,340,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 0 5,340,000
Jefferson 10066 I -65 BRIDGE PROJECT IN JEFFERSON COUNTY ON (056B00183N) I-65 AT PL
E KENTUCKY & S BROOK ST (POTENTIAL CMGC DELIVERY PROJECT) DN
RW
UT
CN BRO 47,000,000
BRX 7,000,000
FBP 17,971,591
Project Cost: 0 0 71,971,591
Jefferson 10068 I -65 BRIDGE PROJECT IN JEFFERSON COUNTY ON (056B00191N) I-65 AT PL
JACOB, BROADWAY, GRAY ST DN FBP 10,612,000
RW
UT
CN BRO 52,616,706 52,616,706
Project Cost: 0 63,228,706 52,616,706
Page 105 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Jefferson 10069 I -65 BRIDGE PROJECT IN JEFFERSON COUNTY ON (056B00192N) I-65 AT PL
E CHESTNUT ST DN BRO 819,705
RW
UT
CN BRO 5,464,700
Project Cost: 0 6,284,405 0
Jefferson 10075 I -264 BRIDGE PROJECT IN JEFFERSON COUNTY ON (056B00250N) I-264 AT PL
P&L RAILWAY DN
RW
UT
CN FBP 35,367,503
Project Cost: 35,367,503 0 0
Jefferson 10099 I -65 BRIDGE PROJECT IN JEFFERSON COUNTY ON (056B00193N) I-65 AT PL
BROOK/MUHAMMAD ALI. (POTENTIAL CMGC DELIVERY PROJECT) DN FBP 10,545,062
RW FBP 50,000 50,000
UT FBP 75,000 75,000
CN FBP 70,300,410 6,500,000
Project Cost: 0 80,970,472 6,625,000
Jefferson 10100 I -65 BRIDGE PROJECT IN JEFFERSON COUNTY ON (056B00194N) I-65 AT PL
MUHAMMAD ALI SB ON-RAMP. (POTENTIAL CMGC DELIVERY DN FBP 154,954
PROJECT) RW
UT
CN FBP 1,033,024
Project Cost: 0 0 1,187,978
Jefferson 10101 I -65 BRIDGE PROJECT IN JEFFERSON COUNTY ON (056B00195R) I-65 NB PL
AT FLOYD STREET. (POTENTIAL CMGC DELIVERY PROJECT) DN BRX 611,386
RW
UT
CN BRX 4,075,906
Project Cost: 0 4,687,292 0
Page 106 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Jefferson 10102 I -65 BRIDGE PROJECT IN JEFFERSON COUNTY ON (056B00197R) I-65 NB PL
AT E. LIBERTY STREET. (POTENTIAL CMGC DELIVERY PROJECT) DN BRX 1,408,057
RW
UT
CN BRX 9,387,049
Project Cost: 0 10,795,106 0
Jefferson 10104 I -65 BRIDGE PROJECT IN JEFFERSON COUNTY ON (056B00182N) I-65 AT PL
BRANDIES AVE. (POTENTIAL CMGC DELIVERY PROJECT) DN FBP 2,330,669
RW FBP 50,000
UT FBP 75,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 0 2,455,669
Jefferson 10105 I -65 BRIDGE PROJECT IN JEFFERSON COUNTY ON (056B00181N) I-65 AT PL
UNIVERSITY BLVD. (POTENTIAL CMGC DELIVERY PROJECT) DN FBP 2,624,670
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 0 2,624,670
Jefferson 10106 I -65 BRIDGE PROJECT IN JEFFERSON COUNTY ON (056B00212N) I-65 AT PL
BRADLEY AVE. (POTENTIAL CMGC DELIVERY PROJECT) DN
RW
UT
CN FBP2 14,287,927
Project Cost: 14,287,927 0 0
Jefferson 10115 US-31 ADDRESS DEFICIENCIES OF BRIDGE ON US 31 OVER OHIO RIVER PL
(056B00136N) DN FBP 1,050,000
RW
UT
CN FBP 7,000,000
Project Cost: 8,050,000 0 0
Page 107 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Jefferson 20016 I -264 ADDRESS CONDITION OF I-264 FROM MILEPOINT 12.7 TO MILEPOINT PL
18.41 DN NHPM 2,730,000
RW
UT
CN NHPM 27,270,000
Project Cost: 30,000,000 0 0
Jefferson 20024 KY-913 ADDRESS CONDITION OF KY-913 FROM MILEPOINT 2.38 TO PL
MILEPOINT 3.07 DN STP5 60,000
RW
UT
CN STP5 690,000
Project Cost: 0 0 750,000
Jefferson 20025 KY-1020 ADDRESS CONDITION OF KY-1020 FROM MILEPOINT 2.67 TO PL
MILEPOINT 3.66 DN STP5 80,000
RW
UT
CN STP5 920,000
Project Cost: 0 0 1,000,000
Jefferson 20027 KY-1932 ADDRESS CONDITION OF KY-1932 FROM MILEPOINT 3.21 TO PL
MILEPOINT 3.8 DN STP5 80,000
RW
UT
CN STP5 920,000
Project Cost: 0 0 1,000,000
Jefferson 20028 KY-1934 ADDRESS CONDITION OF KY-1934 FROM MILEPOINT 0 TO MILEPOINT PL
4.44 DN NHPM 340,000
RW
UT
CN NHPM 3,910,000
Project Cost: 0 0 4,250,000
Page 108 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Jefferson 20029 KY-1934 ADDRESS CONDITION OF KY-1934 FROM MILEPOINT 4.44 TO PL
MILEPOINT 9.74 DN STP3 480,000
RW
UT
CN STP3 5,520,000
Project Cost: 0 0 6,000,000
Jefferson 20060 KY-2052 ADDRESS PAVEMENT CONDITION ON KY-2052 FROM MP 0.0 TO MP PL
4.205. DN SPP 360,000
RW
UT
CN SPP 3,600,000
Project Cost: 0 360,000 3,600,000
Jefferson 20069 I -265 ADDRESS CONDITION OF I-265 FROM MILEPOINT 18.8 TO MILEPOINT PL
23.364 DN NHPM 770,000
RW
UT
CN NHPM 7,680,738
Project Cost: 8,450,738 0 0
Jefferson 22024 I -64 ADDRESS CONDITION OF I-064 FROM MILEPOINT 13.124 (13.206 PL
NON-CARDINAL) TO MILEPOINT 19.44 DN NHPM 1,820,000
RW
UT
CN NHPM 18,180,000
Project Cost: 0 0 20,000,000
Jefferson 22069 I -65 ADDRESS CONDITION OF I-065 FROM MILEPOINT 123.18 TO PL
MILEPOINT 127.57 DN NHPM 3,600,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 0 3,600,000
Page 109 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Jefferson 22070 I -65 ADDRESS CONDITION OF I-065 FROM MILEPOINT 131.24 TO PL
MILEPOINT 136.338 DN NHPM 1,400,000
RW
UT
CN NHPM 14,000,000
Project Cost: 15,400,000 0 0
Jefferson 80001 US-60 IMPROVE OPERATIONS ALONG US-60 FROM OLD SHELBYVILLE PL
ROAD TO NORTH ENGLISH STATION ROAD. (18CCN) (2020CCR) DN
(2024CCR) RW NH 650,000
UT NH 700,000
CN NH 4,680,000
Project Cost: 1,350,000 4,680,000 0
Jefferson 80003 PF-9999 EXTEND PLANTSIDE DRIVE FROM REHL ROAD TO TAYLORSVILLE PL
ROAD. (18CCN)(2020CCR) (2022CCR) (2024CCR) DN
RW SPP 230,000
UT SPP 900,000
CN SPP 10,800,000
Project Cost: 0 230,000 11,700,000
Jefferson 80006 I -65, CONSTRUCT NEW INTERCHANGE ON KY-841 AT THE RENAISSANCE PL
KY-1065, SOUTH BUSINESS PARK(18CCN) (FUNDED WITH LOCAL FUNDS) DN
KY-841, (2024CCN) RW
PF-9999
UT
CN SPP 16,330,000
Project Cost: 0 0 16,330,000
Jefferson 80108 CR-1015 WIDEN AND IMPROVE RANGELAND RD FROM POLAR LEVEL RD TO PL
SHEPHERDSVILLE RD (2020CCN) (2022CCR) (2024CCR) DN
RW SPP 1,380,000
UT SPP 1,150,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 2,530,000 0
Page 110 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Jefferson 80110 KY-2055 CONSTRUCT A SIDEWALK ALONG MT HOLLY RD FROM CHARLENE PL
DR TO FOX AVE FOR CORAL RIDGE ELEMENTARY (2020CCN) DN
RW SPP 40,000
UT SPP 40,000
CN SPP 330,000
Project Cost: 0 80,000 330,000
Jefferson 80200 KY-2050 Reduce congestion, improve safety, and enhance mobility on KY 2050 PL
(Herr Lane) from Prince Valiant Drive/Westmar Terrace to Bedford DN
Lane. (2022CCN) (2024CCR) RW SPP 580,000
UT SPP 2,030,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 580,000 2,030,000
Jefferson 80203 KY-1065 Improve safety and reduce congestion on KY 1065 (Outer Loop) from PL
I-65 to KY 2052 (Shepherdsville Road). Project will evaluate the DN SPP 2,450,000
addition of one travel lane in each direction and consider RW
accommodations for bicyclists and pedestrians (2022CCN) (2024CCR)
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 0 2,450,000
Jefferson 80204 KY-1931 Improve safety and reduce congestion on KY 1931 (Manslick Road) PL
from KY 1931 (St. Andrews Church Road) to I-264 (Henry Watterson DN
Expressway). Project will evaluate 3-lane widening and consider RW SPP 6,650,000
accommodations for bicyclists and pedestrians. (2022CCN)
UT SPP 12,030,000
(2024CCR)
CN
Project Cost: 0 0 18,680,000
Jefferson 80250 CR-1006 DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION OF A REALIGNED OLD BARDSTOWN PL
ROAD TO ALIGN WITH THE ENTRANCE TO WALGREENS AT HILLOCK. DN
(MILEPOINT 0.0 TO MILEPOINT 0.01) WITH A MEMORANDUM OF RW
AGREEMENT WITH THE LOUISVILLE METRO GOVERNMENT.
UT
(2022CCN)
CN SPP 440,000
Project Cost: 0 0 440,000
Page 111 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Jefferson 80258 KY-1819 REDUCE CONGESTION, IMPROVE SAFETY, AND ENHANCE MOBILITY PL
ON KY 1819 (WATTERSON TRAIL) FROM BLUEGRASS PARKWAY TO DN
BLANKENBAKER PARKWAY (KY 913) (2022CCN) (2024CCR) RW SPP 530,000
UT SPP 1,600,000
CN SPP 12,480,000
Project Cost: 2,130,000 12,480,000 0
Jefferson 80259 US-31 RIGHT SIZING AND PEDESTRIAN ACCESS IMPROVEMENTS ON US 31E PL
FROM MILEPOINT 14.625 TO MILEPOINT 13.125 (2022CCN) DN
RW
UT
CN SPP 2,240,000
Project Cost: 2,240,000 0 0
Jefferson 80261 US-31 Reduce congestion, improve safety and enhance mobility along the US PL
31E (Bardstown Road) corridor from the Bullitt/Jefferson County line to DN SPP 5,830,000
KY 1065 (Beulah Church/Seatonville Road). (MP 0.0 – MP 5.6) RW
(2022CCN) (2024CCR)
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 5,830,000 0
Jefferson 80300 US-31 TRANSPORTATION SYSTEM MANAGEMENT & TRANSPORTATION PL
DEMAND MANAGEMENT ACTIVITIES ON US 31E (BARDSTOWN DN SPP 500,000
ROAD) BETWEEN DOUGLASS BOULEVARD & HIKES LANE. RW SPP 500,000
TRANSPORTATION SYSTEM MANAGEMENT (TSMO) PROJECTS ARE
UT SPP 500,000
INTENDED TO IMPROVE THE OPERATION CAPACITY OF EXISTING.
CN SPP 5,000,000
Project Cost: 0 1,500,000 5,000,000
Jefferson 80302 US-31 TRANSPORTATION SYSTEM MANAGEMENT IMPROVEMENTS ON US PL
31W FROM KY 841 TO KY 44 IN SOUTHERN JEFFERSON COUNTY; TO DN SPP 3,710,000
INCLUDE THE CONSIDERATION OF ACCESS MANAGEMENT AND RW
SAFETY IMPROVEMENTS. (2024CCN)
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 3,710,000 0
Page 112 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Jefferson 80303 KY-1065 IMPROVE SAFETY AND REDUCE CONGESTION AT THE KY 1065 AND PL
KY 61 INTERSECTION. PROJECT WILL CONSIDER ADDING A RIGHT DN SPP 200,000
TURN LANE ON WESTBOUND KY 1065 (OUTER LOOP) AT KY 61 RW SPP 240,000
(PRESTON HIGHWAY). (2024CCN)
UT SPP 240,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 200,000 480,000
Jefferson 80304 KY-1531 RELOCATE & RECONSTRUCT KY 1531 (JOHNSON ROAD) WITH PL
IMPROVED GEOMETRY FROM US 60 (SHELBYVILLE ROAD) TO AIKEN DN SPP 970,000
ROAD. PROJECT WILL CONSIDER A 2 LANE ROAD (NO ADDITIONAL RW SPP 470,000
LANES) AND A 4 TO 6 FOOT SHOULDER. (2024CCN)
UT SPP 240,000
CN SPP 10,190,000
Project Cost: 0 970,000 10,900,000
Jefferson 80306 CR-1001 IMPROVE SAFETY AND REDUCE CONGESTION ON GRADE LANE PL SPP 185,000
FROM KY 1065 (OUTER LOOP) TO KY 1631 (FERN VALLEY ROAD). DN SPP 1,200,000
PROJECT DESIGN WILL EVALUATE 3-LANE WIDENING WITH RW SPP 700,000
TWO-WAY CENTER TURN LANE AND CONSIDER BICYCLE AND
UT
PEDESTRIAN FACILITIES. (2024CCN)
CN
Project Cost: 185,000 1,200,000 700,000
Jefferson 80310 KY-22 IMPROVE TRAFFIC OPERATIONS ON KY 22 FROM JUST EAST OF PL
MURPHY LANE TO HAUNZ LANE. PROJECT DESIGN WILL EVALUATE DN SPP 650,000
3-LANE WIDENING WITH TWOWAY CENTER TURN LANE AND RW SPP 420,000
CONSIDER BICYCLE AND PEDESTRIAN FACILITIES. (2024CCN)
UT SPP 630,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 650,000 1,050,000
Jefferson 80311 CS-1005 WEST KENTUCKY STREET (CS 1005) MASTER PLAN PROJECT FROM PL
18TH STREET TO 4TH STREET. PROJECT WILL CONSIDER SIDEWALK DN SPP 520,000
IMPROVEMENTS, BICYCLE FACILITIES, IMPROVEMENTS TO THE RAIL RW SPP 300,000
CROSSING AT 15TH STREET, AND THE ADDITION OF STREET TREES.
UT SPP 300,000
(2024CCN)
CN
Project Cost: 0 520,000 600,000
Page 113 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Jefferson 80321 KY-1932 ADDRESS CONGESTION AND SAFETY ISSUES IN THE VICINITY OF PL
THE BRECKENRIDGE LANE (KY 1932) AND DUTCHMANS LANE DN STPF 500,000
INTERSECTION. (2024CCN) RW STPF 300,000
UT STPF 400,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 500,000 700,000
Jefferson 80324 CS-1046, THIS PROJECT IS A MAJOR COMPLETE STREET RE-DESIGN OF 9TH PL
CS-1176 STREET JUST WEST OF THE CENTRAL BUSINESS DISTRICT OF DN SPP 2,990,000
LOUISVILLE FROM THE OHIO RIVER SOUTH TO ITS INTERSECTION RW SPP 220,000
WITH BROADWAY. NINTH STREET WAS ORIGINALLY DESIGNED TO
UT SPP 390,000
SERVE AS A FREIGHT ROUTE WITH (2024CCN)
CN
Project Cost: 0 2,990,000 610,000
Jefferson 80330 KY-3222 SAFETY ANALYSIS OF THE KY 3222 (ROSE ISLAND ROAD) PL SPP 220,000
BEGINNING IN JEFFERSON COUNTY MILE POINT 0.0-1.0 AND OLDHAM DN
COUNTY FROM 0.0 TO 3.1 (INTERSECTION OF KY 1793). (2024CCN) RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 220,000 0
Jefferson 80331 CR-1003 IMPROVE SAFETY AND OPERATIONS ON ARNOLDTOWN ROAD PL SPP 250,000
FROM KY 1931 TO KY 907. PROJECT DESIGN WILL EVALUATE 2 DN SPP 2,170,000
LANE ROAD (NO ADDED LANES).KIPDA ID# 249 (2024CCN) RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 250,000 2,170,000
Jefferson 80334 I -64 IMPROVEMENTS WITHIN THE I-64 CORRIDOR FROM THE KENNEDY PL
INTERCHANGE TO I-264 (WATTERSON EXPRESSWAY) ADDRESSING DN NH 2,550,000
SAFETY AND CONGESTION ISSUES. THE IMPROVEMENTS MAY RW
INCLUDE BUT ARE NOT LIMITED TO: CONSIDERATION OF
UT
ALTERNATIVE TRANSPORTATION MODES, DEPLOYMENT (2024CCN)
CN
Project Cost: 0 2,550,000 0
Page 114 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Jefferson 80340 KY-1819 ENHANCE MOBILITY AND PROVIDE SAFE ACCESS TO COMMUNITY PL
FACILITIES ALONG KY 1819 (WATTERSON TRAIL) FROM SKYVIEW DN SPP 470,000
PARK (MP 10.43) TO PLANTSIDE DRIVE (MP 10.79). (2024CCN) RW SPP 40,000
UT SPP 50,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 470,000 90,000
Jefferson 80342 US-42 ROADWAY RECONFIGURATION, ONE-WAY TO TWO-WAY PL
CONVERSION. (2024CCN) (POSSIBLE SLO FUNDING) DN SPP 500,000
RW
UT SPP 2,200,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 500,000 2,200,000
Jefferson 80352 KY-1865 Safety improvements on KY 1865 (New Cut Road)/Taylor Boulevard PL
from MP 0.5 (just south of Old New Cut Road) to MP 5.766 (just north DN NH 4,000,000
of the I-264 ramp). (2024CCN) RW NH 4,000,000
UT NH 4,000,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 4,000,000 8,000,000
Jefferson 80355 US-60 Improvements from Eastern Parkway Transportation Study between PL
Bardstown Road to Cherokee Park entrance (MP 6.82 -0.322) with a DN SPP 1,130,000
Memorandum of Agreement with the Louisville Metro Government. RW
(2024CCN)
UT SPP 450,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,130,000 450,000
Jefferson 80356 US-60 Improvements from Eastern Parkway Transportation Study between PL
Hahn Street to Concord Drive (MP 3.84-4.15) with a Memorandum of DN SPP 990,000
Agreement with the Louisville Metro Government. (2024CCN) RW SPP 130,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 990,000 130,000
Total for Jefferson county PL 185,000 470,000
DN 14,067,000 67,473,091 27,405,992
RW 1,180,000 8,370,000 17,110,000
UT 3,875,000 3,155,000 35,630,000
CN 244,016,951 188,393,977 293,762,646
Total Amounts: 263,323,951 267,862,068 373,908,638
Page 115 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Jessamine 87.3500 KY-169, COMPLETE EAST NICHOLASVILLE BYPASS WITH AT GRADE PL
PF-9999, INTERSECTION AT US 27. DN
US-27 RW
UT
CN NH 30,000,000
Project Cost: 0 0 30,000,000
Jessamine 414 KY-1980 IMPROVE ROADWAY GEOMETRICS, TYPICAL SECTION, AND PL
ROADWAY HAZARDS ON KY 1980 (BRANNON RD) FROM US 68 DN
(HARRODSBURG RD) TO US 27 (NICHOLASVILLE RD)(12CCR) RW
(18CCN) (2022CCR) (2024CCR)
UT
CN HGC 29,000,000
Project Cost: 29,000,000 0 0
Jessamine 430.1000 US-27 NICHOLASVILLE - MAN-O-WAR BLVD; ACCESS MANAGEMENT ON PL
US-27 (NICHOLASVILLE RD) FROM NICHOLASVILLE BYPASS TO DN
JUST SOUTH OF KOHL'S DRIVE. RW SPP 4,400,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 0 4,400,000
Jessamine 440 KY-169 IMPROVE KY-169 FROM NORTH OF CLEAR CREEK RD IN JESSAMINE PL
COUNTY TO NORTH OF KY-1967 IN WOODFORD COUNTY. DN SPP 910,000
(2024CCN) RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 0 910,000
Jessamine 8906 KY-169 RECONSTRUCT KY 169 FROM US 68 TO 0.54 MILES NORTH OF PL
CLEAR CREEK RD (MP 14.448 TO MP 19.00). (16CCN) (2024CCN) DN SPP 3,720,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 3,720,000 0
Page 116 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Jessamine 80108 KY-169 IMPROVE KY-169 FROM NORTH OF CLEAR CREEK RD IN JESSAMINE PL
COUNTY TO NORTH OF KY-1967 IN WOODFORD COUNTY. DN
(2020CCN) (2024CCR) RW SPP 5,640,000
UT SPP 5,550,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 0 11,190,000
Jessamine 80324 KY-169 IMPROVE SAFETY AND MOBILITY ON NORTH 3RD STREET/KEENE PL
ROAD FROM OAK ST TO US 27 (NICHOLASVILLE BYPASS) IN DN SPP 1,250,000
NICHOLASVILLE (2024CCN) RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,250,000 0
Jessamine 80325 KY-169 Reconstruct KY 169 (Richmond Ave) from proposed East Nicholasville PL
Byp to US 27X (North Main St). (2024CCN) DN SPP 1,250,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,250,000 0
Total for Jessamine county PL
DN 6,220,000 910,000
RW 10,040,000
UT 5,550,000
CN 29,000,000 30,000,000
Total Amounts: 29,000,000 6,220,000 46,500,000
Johnson 149 KY-40 IMPROVE ROADWAY GEOMETRICS AND CAPACITY FROM GARBAGE PL
HOLLOW TO EAST OF MILL STREET. (2020CCR) (2022CCR) DN
(2024CCR) RW SPP 1,500,000
UT SPP 1,400,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,500,000 1,400,000
Page 117 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Johnson 4391 KY-1092 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-1092 IN JOHNSON COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 120,000
Project Cost: 120,000 0 0
Johnson 4392 KY-201 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-201 IN JOHNSON COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 100,000
Project Cost: 100,000 0 0
Johnson 4393 KY-40 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-40 IN JOHNSON COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 110,000
Project Cost: 110,000 0 0
Johnson 4394 KY-580 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-580 IN JOHNSON COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 120,000
Project Cost: 120,000 0 0
Johnson 4433 KY-3387 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-3387 IN JOHNSON COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 64,000
Project Cost: 64,000 0 0
Page 118 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Johnson 80100 KY-40 IMPROVE ROADWAY GEOMETRICS AND CAPACITY ON KY 40 FROM PL
KY 321 TO GARBAGE HOLLOW (2020CCN) (2022CCR) (2024CCR) DN SPP 910,000
RW SPP 670,000
UT SPP 7,870,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 910,000 8,540,000
Johnson 80101 US-460 IMPROVE US 460 FROM THE INTERSECTION WITH KY 114 TO THE PL
INTERCHANGE WITH US 23 (2020CCR) (2022CCR) (2024CCR) DN
RW SPP 1,240,000
UT SPP 540,000
CN SPP 43,500,000
Project Cost: 0 1,780,000 43,500,000
Johnson 80116 KY-321 ADDRESS CONGESTION AND SAFETY ISSUES ON KY 321 FROM THE PL
6TH STREET TO THE JUNCTION OF KY 321 AND KY 40 (2020CCN) DN SPP 220,000
(SAME AS 12-8102 IN 2020 HIGHWAY PLAN) (2022CCR) RW
UT SPP 230,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 220,000 230,000
Johnson 80250 KY-40, CONSTRUCT ACCESS ROAD TO PROPOSED JOHNSON COUNTY HIGH PL
PF-9999 SCHOOL AND MIDDLE SCHOOL CAMPUS. TO INTERSECT WITH KY 40 DN
AT MILEPOINT 8.85 (2022CCN) (2024CCR) RW
UT
CN SPP 8,700,000
Project Cost: 8,700,000 0 0
Total for Johnson county PL
DN 1,130,000
RW 2,740,000 670,000
UT 540,000 9,500,000
CN 9,214,000 43,500,000
Total Amounts: 9,214,000 4,410,000 53,670,000
Page 119 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Kenton 17.3100 CO-0 CONSTRUCT A COMPANION BRIDGE TO THE EXISTING I-71/75 BRENT PL
SPENCE BRIDGE OVER THE OHIO RIVER BETWEEN COVINGTON, KY DN
AND CINCINNATI, OH. (DEDICATED ADDITIONAL STATE GENERAL RW
FUNDS) (2024CCR)
UT
CN SGF 125,000,000
Project Cost: 0 125,000,000 0
Kenton 392 KY-371 CONSTRUCTION OF ROADWAY SAFETY IMPROVEMENTS ON KY 371 PL
AT CHAMBERS OFFICE PARK AND BUTTERMILK SQUARE IN KENTON DN
COUNTY, KENTUCKY. (2024BOP) RW SPP 530,000
UT SPP 210,000
CN SPP 1,200,000
Project Cost: 0 740,000 1,200,000
Kenton 449 KY-17 IMPROVE SAFETY AND REDUCE CONGESTION ON KY-17 AT THE PL
I-275 INTERCHANGE. (18CCR) (2020CCR) (2024CCR) DN
RW STPF 530,000
UT STPF 2,080,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 2,610,000 0
Kenton 450.1000 KY-1303 Reduce Congestion along KY 1303 from Dudley Road to I-275. PL
(2024BOP) DN
RW STPF 4,400,000
UT STPF 2,160,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 6,560,000 0
Kenton 450.2000 KY-1303 Reduce Congestion along KY 1303 from I-275 to US 25. (2024BOP) PL
DN
RW SPP 1,100,000
UT SPP 540,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,100,000 540,000
Page 120 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Kenton 8951 US-25 IMPROVE EXISTING ALIGNMENT WITH BUTTERMILK PIKE, PL
ORPHANAGE ROAD, AND US 25. FT. MITCHELL WILL PAY $50,000 DN
TOWARD DESIGN. (16CCN)(18CCN) (2020CCR) (2022CCR) RW SPP 18,900,000
(2024CCR)
UT SPP 2,500,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 18,900,000 2,500,000
Kenton 10044 KY-17 BRIDGE PROJECT IN KENTON COUNTY ON (059B00048N) KY 17 AT PL
OHIO RIVER DN FBP 1,920,000
RW
UT
CN FBP 12,000,000
Project Cost: 13,920,000 0 0
Kenton 20044 KY-236 ADDRESS CONDITION OF KY-236 FROM MILEPOINT 2.13 TO PL
MILEPOINT 2.62 DN STP5 48,000
RW
UT
CN STP5 552,000
Project Cost: 0 600,000 0
Kenton 22130 I -75 ADDRESS CONDITION OF I-075 NON-CARDINAL DIRECTION FROM PL
MILEPOINT 184.708 TO MILEPOINT 186.95 DN NHPM 1,600,000
RW
UT
CN NHPM 8,400,000
Project Cost: 0 0 10,000,000
Kenton 80002 KY-236 RECONSTRUCT KY 236 (STEVENSON ROAD) FROM ALICE STREET PL
TO JACQUELINE DRIVE.(18CCN) (2020CCR) Kenton Co. government DN
will allocate $250,000 to sanitary sewer and waterline relocation. The RW HGC 8,500,000
City of Erlanger up to $350,000. The City of Erlanger is es eligible to
UT HGC 5,500,000
apply to SD1 for up to 50% of the total cost of storm water
CN HGC 20,000,000
Project Cost: 0 14,000,000 20,000,000
Page 121 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Kenton 80105 KY-2373 WIDEN KENTON LANDS ROAD FROM US 25 TO RIGGS ROAD PL
(2020CCN) (2022CCR) (2024CCR) DN SPP 3,360,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 3,360,000 0
Kenton 80203.1000KY-536 Reconstruct KY 536 from KY 16 to Staffordsburg Road. (2024BOP) PL
DN
RW SPP 9,200,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 0 9,200,000
Kenton 80203.2000KY-536 Reconstruct KY 536 from Staffordsburg Road to KY 177. (2024BOP) PL
DN
RW SPP 15,530,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 0 15,530,000
Kenton 80217 KY-536 Provide connectivity, improve mobility, and reduce congestion along PL
KY 536 from KY 17 to KY 16; include multi-modes. (2022CCN) DN
(2024CCR) RW SPP 6,830,000
UT SPP 1,560,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 6,830,000 1,560,000
Kenton 80254 US-25 REHABILITATE/RECONSTRUCT US 25 FROM BUTTERMILK PIKE PL
(KY371) TO I-75 (MP 8.58 TO MP 9.86) (2022CCN) (2024CCR) DN
RW SPP 880,000
UT SPP 2,800,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 880,000 2,800,000
Page 122 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Kenton 80300 KY-16 IMPROVE SAFETY AND REDUCE CONGESTION ALONG KY 16 PL
(TAYLOR MILL RD) FROM KY 2047 (SENOUR RD) TO KY 536 (HARRIS DN SPP 5,400,000
PIKE); INCLUDE MULTIMODAL NEEDS. (2024CCN) RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 5,400,000 0
Kenton 80305.1000KY-2373 Address safety and mobility along KY 2373 from west intersection of PL
Amsterdam Road to east intersection of Amsterdam Road. (2024BOP) DN SPP 1,300,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,300,000 0
Kenton 80305.2000KY-2373 Address safety and mobility along KY 273 from east intersection of PL
Amsterdam Road to Hightower Road. (2024BOP) DN SPP 2,600,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 2,600,000 0
Kenton 80307 KY-1501 ADDRESS SAFETY AND GEOMETRIC DEFICIENCIES ALONG KY 1501 PL
(HANDS PIKE) FROM EDWIN DRIVE TO KY 16. (2024CCN) DN SPP 970,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 970,000 0
Kenton 80308 KY-1501 ADDRESS SAFETY AND GEOMETRIC DEFICIENCIES ALONG KY 1501 PL
(HANDS PIKE) FROM OTTER TO EDWIN DRIVES. (2024CCN) DN SPP 1,380,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,380,000 0
Page 123 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Kenton 80309 I -75 RECONSTRUCT I-75 INTERCHANGE AT KY 236 (DONALDSON PL
HIGHWAY). (2024CCN) DN NH 3,240,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 0 3,240,000
Total for Kenton county PL
DN 1,920,000 15,058,000 4,840,000
RW 41,670,000 24,730,000
UT 9,950,000 7,400,000
CN 12,000,000 125,552,000 29,600,000
Total Amounts: 13,920,000 192,230,000 66,570,000
Knott 158 KY-80 Eliminate rockfall hazards from kY 2029 to Rock Fork Road. PL
DN
RW PROT 250,000
UT PROT 710,000
CN PROT 6,090,000
Project Cost: 960,000 6,090,000 0
Knott 4323 KY-1088 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-1088 IN KNOTT COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 90,000
Project Cost: 90,000 0 0
Knott 4324 KY-1088 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-1088 IN KNOTT COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 70,000
Project Cost: 70,000 0 0
Page 124 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Knott 4357 KY-160 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-160 IN KNOTT COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 10,000
Project Cost: 10,000 0 0
Knott 4375 KY-1088 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-1088 IN KNOTT COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 70,000
Project Cost: 70,000 0 0
Knott 4376 KY-3391 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-3391 IN KNOTT COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 90,000
Project Cost: 90,000 0 0
Knott 4377 KY-550 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-550 IN KNOTT COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 40,000
Project Cost: 40,000 0 0
Knott 4378 KY-582 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-582 IN KNOTT COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 90,000
Project Cost: 90,000 0 0
Page 125 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Knott 4395 KY-2102 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-2102 IN KNOTT COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 200,000
Project Cost: 200,000 0 0
Knott 4396 KY-2102 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-2102 IN KNOTT COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 140,000
Project Cost: 140,000 0 0
Knott 4397 KY-7 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-7 IN KNOTT COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 110,000
Project Cost: 110,000 0 0
Knott 4398 KY-7 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-7 IN KNOTT COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 100,000
Project Cost: 100,000 0 0
Knott 4434 KY-3391 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-3391 IN KNOTT COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 52,000
Project Cost: 52,000 0 0
Page 126 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Knott 4435 KY-582 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-582 IN KNOTT COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 22,000
Project Cost: 22,000 0 0
Knott 8200 KY-1231 NEW CONSTRUCTION OF ONE MILE STRETCH OF KY-1231 BEGINNING PL
AT BRIDGE AFTER LEAVING KY-550. (04CCN)(06CCR)(08CCR) DN
(10CCR)(12CCR) (2020CCN) RW
UT
CN SPP 5,320,000
Project Cost: 0 5,320,000 0
Knott 20011 HR-9006 ADDRESS CONDITION OF HAL ROGERS PARKWAY FROM MILEPOINT PL
72.184 TO MILEPOINT 75.113. DN STP4 60,000
RW
UT
CN STP4 1,100,000
Project Cost: 0 1,160,000 0
Knott 20012 HR-9006 ADDRESS CONDITION OF HAL ROGERS PARKWAY FROM MILEPOINT PL
80.340 TO MILEPOINT 83.166. DN STP4 60,000
RW
UT
CN STP4 1,150,000
Project Cost: 0 1,210,000 0
Knott 80301 KY-80 Eliminate rockfall hazards 0.2 mile west of Intersection of KY 1087 & PL
KY 80. (2024CCN) DN SPP 540,000
RW SPP 180,000
UT SPP 730,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 540,000 910,000
Page 127 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Knott 80302 KY-899 Improve roadway geometrics along KY 899 from end of prior PL
construction near Pippa Passes to the bottom of the hill at Short DN SPP 590,000
Branch. (2024CCN) RW SPP 350,000
UT SPP 380,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 590,000 730,000
Knott 80303 KY-15 Improvements to the visibility at the intersection of KY 15 and KY 1231 PL
(Big Branch Rd.) around Carr Fork Lake. (2024CCN) DN SPP 40,000
RW
UT SPP 100,000
CN SPP 100,000
Project Cost: 0 40,000 200,000
Knott 80304 KY-160 Address safety, congestion, and geometrics from KY 899 to KY 3391. PL
(2024CCN) DN SPP 1,190,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,190,000 0
Knott 80305 KY-1087 Curve revision 3.654 miles east of intersection of KY 3209 & KY 1087. PL
(2024CCN) DN SPP 240,000
RW SPP 240,000
UT SPP 120,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 240,000 360,000
Knott 80350 KY-1098 Improve horizontal and vertical roadway geometry to eliminate the PL
substandard curve and increase sight distance on KY 1098 (MP DN SPP 420,000
10.5-11.0) (2024CCN) RW SPP 100,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 420,000 100,000
Page 128 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Knott 80354 HR-9006 Eliminate rockfall hazards along Hal Rogers Parkway (old KY-80) from PL
MP 78.27 to 79.59. (2024CCN) DN SPP 500,000
RW SPP 150,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 500,000 150,000
Total for Knott county PL
DN 3,640,000
RW 250,000 1,020,000
UT 710,000 1,330,000
CN 1,084,000 13,660,000 100,000
Total Amounts: 2,044,000 17,300,000 2,450,000
Knox 182 KY-312 Drainage Improvements along KY 312 (Master Street) from MP 0 to MP PL
0.90 in Know County at Corbin, Kentucky. (2022BOP) (2024CCN) DN
RW SPP 750,000
UT SPP 1,000,000
CN SPP 4,160,000
Project Cost: 0 1,750,000 4,160,000
Knox 4373 KY-11 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-11 IN KNOX COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 30,000
Project Cost: 30,000 0 0
Knox 4379 KY-3438 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-3438 IN KNOX COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 20,000
Project Cost: 20,000 0 0
Page 129 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Knox 4405 KY-11 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-11 IN KNOX COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 29,000
Project Cost: 29,000 0 0
Knox 8857 KY-3439 IMPROVE SAFETY OF INTERSECTION AT US 25E AND KY 3439 AND PL
PROVIDE SIDEWALKS TO AN AREA FREQUENTED BY PEDESTRIANS DN
(MP 0.0 - MP 0.9) (2022CCR) (2024CCR) RW
UT
CN SPP 2,920,000
Project Cost: 0 2,920,000 0
Knox 10205 CR-1532 BRIDGE PROJECT IN KNOX COUNTY ON (061C00073N) CR-1532 AT PL
STINKING CREEK DN
RW FBP2 10,000
UT FBP2 10,000
CN FBP2 894,355
Project Cost: 0 0 914,355
Knox 80155 KY-1487 IMPROVE SAFETY, ADDRESS GEOMETRIC DEFICIENCIES AND PL
PROVIDE FLOOD MITIGATION ON KY 1487 (MANCHESTER STREET) DN
FROM JUDGE STREET TO US 25E (2020CCN) (2022CCR) (2024CCR) RW
UT
CN SPP 7,800,000
Project Cost: 0 7,800,000 0
Knox 80156 KY-830 IMPROVE SAFETY AND ADDRESS GEOMETRIC DEFICIENCIES ALONG PL
N KY 830 FROM US 25E TO KY 1629 INCLUDING WIDENING AND NEW DN
TURNING LANES (2020CCN) (2024CCR) RW SPP 350,000
UT SPP 1,250,000
CN SPP 2,080,000
Project Cost: 0 1,600,000 2,080,000
Page 130 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Knox 80203 KY-11 Improve safety and access along KY 11 by raising roadway above PL
Flood X elevation. (2022CCN) (2024CCR) DN
RW PROT 210,000
UT PROT 1,400,000
CN PROT 4,890,000
Project Cost: 1,610,000 4,890,000 0
Knox 80311 CR-1311 Widen Richland Creek Road from US 25E a distance of 0.70 miles PL
(2024CCN) DN SPP 780,000
RW SPP 250,000
UT SPP 1,500,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 780,000 1,750,000
Knox 80361 PF-9999 Construct a new route north off of CS 2054 (Opportunity Drive) along PL
the former RR track bed approximately 0.7 miles to KY 830 (2024CCN) DN
RW
UT
CN SPP 1,400,000
Project Cost: 0 1,400,000 0
Total for Knox county PL
DN 780,000
RW 210,000 1,100,000 260,000
UT 1,400,000 2,250,000 1,510,000
CN 79,000 17,010,000 7,134,355
Total Amounts: 1,689,000 21,140,000 8,904,355
Larue 8909 KY-84 ADDRESS SAFETY AND GEOMETRIC DEFICIENCIES ALONG KY 84 PL
FROM KY 357 TO KY 61 (LINCOLN PARKWAY) NEAR HODGENVILLE DN SPP 840,000
(2020CCR) (2022CCR) (2024CCR) RW SPP 790,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 840,000 790,000
Page 131 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Total for Larue county PL
DN 840,000
RW 790,000
UT
CN
Total Amounts: 0 840,000 790,000
Laurel 147 US-25 REDUCE CONGESTION ON US-25 FROM KY-1006 TO KY-2069; PL
IMPROVE CONNECTIVITY FROM US-25 NEAR KY-2069 TO KY-229; DN
IMPROVE KY-229 FROM THE NEW CONNECTOR NORTH TO KY-192; RW
AND IMPROVE ACCESS TO THE SCHOOL FROM KY-192 BYPASS.
UT
(06CCR)(10CCR)(12CCR)(14CCR) (2020CCR) (2022CCR) (2024CCR)
CN HGC 66,215,000
Project Cost: 66,215,000 0 0
Laurel 169 CO-0 Improve Rudy Bear Road and KY 3007 from KY 80 South to KY 3432 PL
West of I-75. (2022CCR) (2024CCR) DN SPP 250,000
RW SPP 2,500,000
UT SPP 1,500,000
CN SPP 7,600,000
Project Cost: 250,000 4,000,000 7,600,000
Laurel 179 I -75 EXPAND TRUCK PARKING AT I-75 NB TRUCK REST HAVEN. PL
DN
RW
UT
CN NH 1,160,000
Project Cost: 1,160,000 0 0
Laurel 180 I -75 EXPAND TRUCK PARKING AT I-75 SB TRUCK REST HAVEN. PL
DN
RW
UT
CN NH 1,160,000
Project Cost: 1,160,000 0 0
Page 132 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Laurel 4380 KY-2041 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-2041 IN LAUREL COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 30,000
Project Cost: 30,000 0 0
Laurel 4381 KY-312 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-312 IN LAUREL COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 20,000
Project Cost: 20,000 0 0
Laurel 4382 KY-312 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-312 IN LAUREL COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 20,000
Project Cost: 20,000 0 0
Laurel 4383 KY-312 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-312 IN LAUREL COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 10,000
Project Cost: 10,000 0 0
Laurel 4407 KY-363 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-363 IN LAUREL COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 142,000
Project Cost: 142,000 0 0
Page 133 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Laurel 8515 US-25 IMPROVE CONNECTIVITY BETWEEN CORBIN AND LONDON FROM PL
KY-1006 TO US-25E. (08CCN) (2024CCR) DN
RW STP1 2,000,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 0 2,000,000
Laurel 8811 CR-1221 REPLACE BRIDGE LOCATED ON LILY ROAD (CR 1221) (MP 1.045) PL
(AREA ADJACENT TO FARISTON INDUSTRIAL PARK WITH NEW DN
ROADWAY ALIGNMENT). (14CCN)(18CCN) RW
UT
CN SPP 1,830,000
Project Cost: 0 1,830,000 0
Laurel 8909 HR-9006 IMPROVE THE HAL ROGERS PARKWAY TO INTERSTATE PL
STANDARDS FROM 4.0 MI EAST OF KY 192 TO LAUREL/CLAY CO. DN NH 1,170,000
LINE. (I-75 TO HAZARD) (16CCN)(18CCR) (2024CCR) RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 0 1,170,000
Laurel 10042 KY-490 BRIDGE PROJECT IN LAUREL COUNTY ON (063B00004N) KY-490 AT PL
ROCKCASTLE RIVER DN BRZ 482,051
RW
UT
CN BRZ 3,213,675
Project Cost: 0 3,695,726 0
Laurel 20038 KY-192 ADDRESS CONDITION OF KY-192 FROM MILEPOINT 20.2 TO PL
MILEPOINT 22.041 DN STP4 440,000
RW
UT
CN STP4 5,060,000
Project Cost: 5,500,000 0 0
Page 134 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Laurel 80154 HR-9006 ADDRESS ACCESS AND SAFETY ISSUES AT THE INTERSECTION OF PL
KY 80 AND PAYNE TRAIL AND BUSH ELEMENTARY SCHOOL BY DN SPP 120,000
CONSTRUCTING A CONNECTOR ROAD FROM HAL ROGERS RW SPP 890,000
PARKWAY (HR 9006) TO KY 6264 (PAYNE TRAIL). (2020CCN)
UT SPP 40,000
(2022CCN)
CN
Project Cost: 0 120,000 930,000
Laurel 80205 US-25 Construct 3 new left turn lanes between milepoints 7.615 and 7.994. PL
(2022CCN) DN
RW
UT
CN SPP 370,000
Project Cost: 370,000 0 0
Laurel 80312 KY-638 Improve the geometrics of a curve, widen a drainage structure, and PL
provide turn lanes to Johnson Elementary School on KY 638 DN SPP 210,000
(2024CCN) RW SPP 1,060,000
UT SPP 710,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 210,000 1,770,000
Laurel 80357 KY-192 Widen KY 192 from Mallard Drive to Esquire Lane, address horizontal PL
and vertical alignment as needed (MP 16.61 - 18.08) (2024CCN) DN SPP 1,300,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,300,000 0
Total for Laurel county PL
DN 690,000 2,112,051 1,170,000
RW 2,500,000 3,950,000
UT 1,500,000 750,000
CN 74,187,000 5,043,675 7,600,000
Total Amounts: 74,877,000 11,155,726 13,470,000
Page 135 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Lawrence 156 KY-32 Improve KY-32 from Elliott C/L to Yatesville Lake reconstruction PL
section for better access to Yatesville Lake and to improve safety. DN SPP 1,760,000
See Elliott County listing for continuation of project to KY-7 @ Sandy RW
Hook. (2024CCN)
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,760,000 0
Lawrence 4399 KY-644 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-644 IN LAWRENCE COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 80,000
Project Cost: 80,000 0 0
Lawrence 4400 KY-644 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-644 IN LAWRENCE COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 100,000
Project Cost: 100,000 0 0
Lawrence 4436 KY-1690 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-1690 IN LAWRENCE COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 74,000
Project Cost: 74,000 0 0
Lawrence 10016 KY-644 BRIDGE PROJECT IN LAWRENCE COUNTY ON (064B00038N) KY-644 PL
AT LEVISA FORK DN BRX 683,372
RW
UT
CN BRX 4,555,811
Project Cost: 0 0 5,239,183
Page 136 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Lawrence 22352 KY-201 ADDRESS CONDITION OF KY-201 FROM MILEPOINT 5 TO MILEPOINT PL
10.9 DN NHPM 80,000
RW
UT
CN NHPM 640,000
Project Cost: 0 0 720,000
Lawrence 80103 KY-201 REPAVE KY 201 FROM MP 5.0 TO 10.9 (2020CCN) PL
DN
RW
UT
CN STP4 675,000
Project Cost: 675,000 0 0
Lawrence 80104 KY-32 REPAVE KY 32 FROM MP 21.0 TO 23.0 (2020CCN) PL
DN
RW
UT
CN STP4 340,000
Project Cost: 340,000 0 0
Lawrence 80105 KY-3 REPAVE ROUTE 3 SOUTH FROM MP 12.58 TO MP 0 AND PLACE PL
GUARD RAILS ON FALLS HILL (2020CCN) (2022CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN SPP 1,700,000
Project Cost: 0 1,700,000 0
Lawrence 80107 KY-1690 REPAVE KY 1690 FROM MP 4.3 TO MP 6.3 AND PLACE GUARD RAILS PL
ON RICHARDSON HILL (2020CCN) DN
RW
UT
CN SPP 200,000
Project Cost: 0 200,000 0
Page 137 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Lawrence 80108 KY-644 PLACE LIGHTING AT INTERSECTION OF KY 644 AND KY 2565 PL
(2020CCN) (2024CCN) DN SPP 30,000
RW
UT SPP 20,000
CN SPP 200,000
Project Cost: 0 30,000 220,000
Lawrence 80306 KY-1 Improve KY-1 from the Johnson C/L to KY-3 to eliminate dangerous PL
curves and address safety. (2024CCN) DN SPP 1,000,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 0 1,000,000
Lawrence 80307 KY-201 Correct substandard roadway geometrics and address safety issues PL
on KY-201/KY-32 from Johnson C/L to KY-1 for safety. (2024CCN) DN SPP 7,280,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 0 7,280,000
Lawrence 80310 KY-3398 IMPROVE/WIDEN KY-3398 FROM KY-3 @ FALLSBURG TO US-23 @ PL
FULLERS TO IMPROVE SAFETY AND TO ACCOMMODATE DN SPP 840,000
RESIDENTIAL GROWTH AND RECREATIONAL VEHICLES IN THIS RW
AREA. (2024CCN)
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 840,000 0
Total for Lawrence county PL
DN 2,630,000 9,043,372
RW
UT 20,000
CN 1,269,000 1,900,000 5,395,811
Total Amounts: 1,269,000 4,530,000 14,459,183
Page 138 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Lee 5017 KY-52 Rockfall Mitigation on KY 52 near Beattyville from MP 12.8 to MP 13.4 in PL
Lee County. (To seek future federal Protect funds) DN
RW PROT 870,000
UT PROT 120,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 990,000 0
Lee 10051 CS-1005 BRIDGE PROJECT IN LEE COUNTY ON (065C00024N) SILVER CREEK PL
RD AT SILVER CREEK DN BRX 70,910
RW
UT
CN BRX 472,731
Project Cost: 0 0 543,641
Lee 80104 KY-399 RECONSTRUCT ALONG KY 399 BETWEEN MP 5.75 AND 6.2 PL
(2020CCN) (2022CCR) DN
RW SPP 220,000
UT SPP 110,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 330,000 0
Lee 80351 KY-11 Reconstruct KY 11 from 0.5 miles south of KY 587 to 0.65 miles north PL
of KY 52 in Beattyville (MP 1.082 - 4.798) (2024CCN) DN STPF 2,700,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 0 2,700,000
Total for Lee county PL
DN 2,770,910
RW 1,090,000
UT 230,000
CN 472,731
Total Amounts: 0 1,320,000 3,243,641
Page 139 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Leslie 4320 US-421 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON US-421 IN LESLIE COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 50,000
Project Cost: 50,000 0 0
Leslie 4408 US-421 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON US-421 IN LESLIE COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 99,000
Project Cost: 99,000 0 0
Leslie 8516 KY-1482 CONSTRUCT A NEW APPROACH FROM KY-1482 ONTO THE HAL PL
ROGERS PARKWAY AT MP 39. (08CCN)(10CCR)(2011BOPP)(18CCN) DN SPP 320,000
(2020CCR) (2022CCR) (2024CCR) RW SPP 1,230,000
UT SPP 520,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 320,000 1,750,000
Leslie 8951 US-421 CONSTRUCT RIGHT TURN LANE ON US 421 AT INTERSECTION WITH PL
KY 80. (16CCN)(18CCN) (2022CCR) DN
RW SPP 140,000
UT SPP 310,000
CN SPP 1,360,000
Project Cost: 0 450,000 1,360,000
Leslie 10254 KY-1780 ADDRESS DEFICIENCIES OF BRIDGE ON KY-1780 OVER MID-FK KY PL
RVR (066B00026N) DN BRZ 205,820
RW
UT
CN BRZ 1,372,134
Project Cost: 0 0 1,577,954
Page 140 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Leslie 80002 KY-3424 SAFETY IMPROVEMENTS ON KY 3424 FROM MP 1.1 TO MP 1.5. PL
(18CCN) DN
RW
UT
CN SPP 1,360,000
Project Cost: 0 1,360,000 0
Leslie 80003 KY-2009 INSTALL NEW GUARDRAIL ON KY 2009 FROM MP 13.418 TO MP PL
14.767.(18CCN) DN
RW
UT
CN SPP 560,000
Project Cost: 0 560,000 0
Leslie 80004 KY-1482 INSTALL NEW GUARDRAIL ON KY 1482 FROM MP 0 TO MP 1.9. PL
(18CCN) DN
RW
UT
CN SPP 120,000
Project Cost: 0 120,000 0
Leslie 80005 KY-257 INSTALL NEW GUARDRAIL ON KY 257 FROM MP 5.723 TO MP 5.853. PL
(18CCN) DN
RW
UT
CN SPP 40,000
Project Cost: 0 40,000 0
Leslie 80006 KY-1807 INSTALL NEW GUARDRAIL ON KY 1807 FROM MP 0.914 TO MP 1.256. PL
(18CCN) DN
RW
UT
CN SPP 60,000
Project Cost: 0 60,000 0
Page 141 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Leslie 80108 KY-1482 GUARD RAIL INSTALLATION ON BULL SKIN RD MP 1.582 TO MP 2 PL
(2020CCN) (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN GR 60,000
Project Cost: 60,000 0 0
Leslie 80109 KY-1807 GUARD RAIL INSTALLATION ON WOOTEN RD FROM MP 0.089 TO MP PL
3.567 AS NEEDED (2020CCN) (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN GR 180,000
Project Cost: 180,000 0 0
Total for Leslie county PL
DN 320,000 205,820
RW 140,000 1,230,000
UT 310,000 520,000
CN 389,000 2,140,000 2,732,134
Total Amounts: 389,000 2,910,000 4,687,954
Letcher 199.1500 US-119 IMPROVE US-119 FROM KY-2034/COUGAR DRIVE TO BRASS DRIVE PL
(MP 16.731 TO 17.740). THROUGH MAYKING (MP 19.925 TO 20.6) DN
AND AUXILIARY LANE (MP 22.0 TO 22.75) (16CCN)(SEE 12-199.10 RW
FOR D, R, U) (18CCR) (2022CCR) (2024CCR)
UT
CN NH 17,400,000
Project Cost: 17,400,000 0 0
Letcher 311.8000 PF-9999, RECONSTRUCTION OF US-119 FROM 0.15 MILE WEST OF KY-806 TO PL
US-119 KY-932. 2012BOP (2024CCN) DN
RW APD 3,420,000
UT APD 400,000
CN APD 46,000,000
Project Cost: 0 3,820,000 46,000,000
Page 142 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Letcher 311.9000 US-119 Improve safety along US 119 from bottom (North side) of Pine Mountain PL
to intersection with KY 15 at Whitesburg (MP 14.1-15.8) (2024CCN) DN APD 1,560,000
RW APD 1,500,000
UT APD 2,000,000
CN APD 15,000,000
Project Cost: 1,560,000 3,500,000 15,000,000
Letcher 4327 KY-931 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-931 IN LETCHER COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 90,000
Project Cost: 90,000 0 0
Letcher 4344 KY-588 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-588 IN LETCHER COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 110,000
Project Cost: 110,000 0 0
Letcher 4345 KY-7 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-7 IN LETCHER COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 50,000
Project Cost: 50,000 0 0
Letcher 4358 KY-1103 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-1103 IN LETCHER COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 120,000
Project Cost: 120,000 0 0
Page 143 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Letcher 4359 KY-1103 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-1103 IN LETCHER COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 120,000
Project Cost: 120,000 0 0
Letcher 4360 KY-7 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-7 IN LETCHER COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 170,000
Project Cost: 170,000 0 0
Letcher 4361 KY-931 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-931 IN LETCHER COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 60,000
Project Cost: 60,000 0 0
Letcher 4362 KY-931 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-931 IN LETCHER COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 20,000
Project Cost: 20,000 0 0
Letcher 4380 KY-588 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-588 IN LETCHER COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 100,000
Project Cost: 100,000 0 0
Page 144 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Letcher 4402 KY-1103 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-1103 IN LETCHER COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 90,000
Project Cost: 90,000 0 0
Letcher 4403 KY-931 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-931 IN LETCHER COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 90,000
Project Cost: 90,000 0 0
Letcher 4404 KY-932 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-932 IN LETCHER COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 30,000
Project Cost: 30,000 0 0
Letcher 4437 KY-317 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-317 IN LETCHER COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 107,000
Project Cost: 107,000 0 0
Letcher 4438 KY-317 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-317 IN LETCHER COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 88,000
Project Cost: 88,000 0 0
Page 145 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Letcher 4439 KY-317 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-317 IN LETCHER COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 57,000
Project Cost: 57,000 0 0
Letcher 4440 KY-7 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-7 IN LETCHER COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 94,000
Project Cost: 94,000 0 0
Letcher 4441 KY-7 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-7 IN LETCHER COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 67,000
Project Cost: 67,000 0 0
Letcher 4442 KY-7 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-7 IN LETCHER COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 53,000
Project Cost: 53,000 0 0
Letcher 4443 KY-931 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-931 IN LETCHER COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 59,000
Project Cost: 59,000 0 0
Page 146 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Letcher 4444 KY-931 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-931 IN LETCHER COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 66,000
Project Cost: 66,000 0 0
Letcher 4445 KY-931 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-931 IN LETCHER COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 41,000
Project Cost: 41,000 0 0
Letcher 4446 KY-931 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-931 IN LETCHER COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 75,000
Project Cost: 75,000 0 0
Letcher 4447 KY-931 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-931 IN LETCHER COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 54,000
Project Cost: 54,000 0 0
Letcher 4448 KY-931 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-931 IN LETCHER COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 25,000
Project Cost: 25,000 0 0
Page 147 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Letcher 8702 KY-805 IMPROVE THE EXISTING ROADWAY TO MEET CURRENT STANDARDS PL
AND IMPROVE CONGESTION INTO AND OUT OF JENKINS BETWEEN DN
MP 9.176 AND MP 9.247. RW
UT
CN STP2 1,250,000
Project Cost: 0 1,250,000 0
Letcher 8702.1000 KY-805 IMPROVE THE EXISTING ROADWAY TO MEET CURRENT STANDARDS PL
AND IMPROVE CONGESTION INTO AND OUT OF JENKINS BETWEEN DN SPP 250,000
MP 8.554 AND MP 9.176. (2024CCN) RW SPP 2,090,000
UT SPP 530,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 250,000 2,620,000
Letcher 10119 KY-931 BRIDGE PROJECT IN LETCHER COUNTY ON (067B00053N) KY-931 AT PL
N FORK KENTUCKY RIVER DN
RW FBP2 75,000
UT FBP2 250,000
CN FBP2 1,777,613
Project Cost: 0 2,102,613 0
Letcher 10122 KY-2036 BRIDGE PROJECT IN LETCHER COUNTY ON (067B00094N) KY-2036 PL
AT ROCKHOUSE CREEK DN
RW BRX 54,000
UT BRX 164,000
CN BRX 1,574,580
Project Cost: 0 0 1,792,580
Letcher 80114 KY-3401 INSTALL A LEFT TURN AT INTERSECTION OF KY 15 AND KY 3401 PL
(2020CCN) (2022CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN SPP 1,250,000
Project Cost: 0 1,250,000 0
Page 148 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Letcher 80115 KY-463 INSTALL A GUARD RAIL ON KY 463 NEAR GORDON PARK PL
(2020CCN) DN
RW
UT
CN GR 11,000
Project Cost: 11,000 0 0
Letcher 80200 KY-113 Spot improvements along KY 113 from KY 2545 to Landfill Rd where PL
the Letcher County Transfer Station is located. (2022CCN) DN
RW STP2 390,000
UT STP2 370,000
CN STP2 1,410,000
Project Cost: 390,000 370,000 1,410,000
Total for Letcher county PL
DN 1,560,000 250,000
RW 390,000 4,995,000 2,144,000
UT 3,020,000 694,000
CN 19,247,000 4,277,613 63,984,580
Total Amounts: 21,197,000 12,542,613 66,822,580
Lewis 231 KY-59 NEW ROUTE FROM VANCEBURG TO KY-59 FROM POLLITT LANE IN PL
VANCEBURG (ALT. 5B1-2 PER PLANNING STUDY). (2020CCR) DN
(2022CCR) (2024CCR) RW SPP 3,450,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 0 3,450,000
Lewis 8806.1000 KY-8 RECONSTRUCT KY-8 FROM KY-8C IN GARRISON TO SCAFFOLD LICK PL
ROAD.(16CCN)(18CCN) DN SPP 2,800,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 0 2,800,000
Page 149 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Lewis 8807 KY-57 RECONSTRUCT KY-57 FROM KY-9 TO FLEMING/LEWIS COUNTY LINE PL
(14CCN) (16CCR) (18CCN) (2020CCR) (2022CCR) (2024CCR) DN
RW SPP 7,480,000
UT SPP 4,480,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 7,480,000 4,480,000
Lewis 10099 KY-1068 ADDRESS DEFICIENCIES OF BRIDGE ON KY 1068 OVER LAUREL PL
FORK (068B00058N) DN BRZ 135,373
RW
UT
CN BRZ 902,486
Project Cost: 0 1,037,859 0
Lewis 80251 KY-9 CONSTRUCT RIGHT AND LEFT TURN LANES AT THE INTERSECTION PL
OF KY 989 (MP18.553) TO IMPROVE SAFETY AND DECREASE DN SPP 270,000
COLLISIONS. (2022CCN) RW SPP 280,000
UT SPP 380,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 270,000 660,000
Lewis 80354 KY-10 Construct left and right turning lanes from KY 10 (AA Highway) onto PL
KY 1306 (MP 11.9 - 12.3) (2024CCN) DN SPP 330,000
RW SPP 240,000
UT
CN SPP 2,100,000
Project Cost: 0 330,000 2,340,000
Total for Lewis county PL
DN 735,373 2,800,000
RW 7,480,000 3,970,000
UT 4,860,000
CN 902,486 2,100,000
Total Amounts: 0 9,117,859 13,730,000
Page 150 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Lincoln 10055 KY-3246 BRIDGE PROJECT IN LINCOLN COUNTY ON (069B00068N) KY-3246 PL
AT FALL LICK CREEK DN BRX 113,937
RW
UT
CN BRX 759,580
Project Cost: 0 0 873,517
Lincoln 20016 US-27 ADDRESS CONDITION OF US-27 FROM MILEPOINT 17.526 TO PL
MILEPOINT 18.155 DN STP5 120,000
RW
UT
CN STP5 1,380,000
Project Cost: 0 1,500,000 0
Lincoln 80000 US-127 NEW TURNING LANE AT ARCADIA VIEW DRIVE(18CCN) (2020CCR) PL
DN SPP 350,000
RW SPP 210,000
UT SPP 300,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 350,000 510,000
Lincoln 80110 CR-1043 INSTALL GUARD RAIL ON GOSHEN RD AT DIX RIVER BRIDGE PL
(2020CCN) (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN GR 30,000
Project Cost: 30,000 0 0
Lincoln 80201 US-27 Continue ongoing improvements to US 27 Corridor from Somerset to PL NH 400,000
Lexington. Improve Level of Service and safety on US 27 from KY 328 DN NH 2,680,000
to KY 501 in Lincoln County. (2022CCN) (2024CCR) RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 400,000 0 2,680,000
Page 151 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Lincoln 80202 KY-300 RECONSTRUCTION TO MITIGATE ROCKSLIDE DAMAGE ON KY 300 PL
(2022CCN) (2024CCR) DN SPP 700,000
RW SPP 530,000
UT SPP 320,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 700,000 850,000
Lincoln 80300 US-150 Improve Safety and Access Control along US 150 from Danville to PL
Stanford. (2024CCN) DN NH 1,500,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,500,000 0
Total for Lincoln county PL 400,000
DN 2,670,000 2,793,937
RW 740,000
UT 620,000
CN 30,000 1,380,000 759,580
Total Amounts: 430,000 4,050,000 4,913,517
Livingston 330 US-60 PADUCAH-HENDERSON; RELOCATE US-60 FROM EAST OF THE PL
TENNESSEE RIVER BRIDGE TO EAST OF RUDD-SPEES ROAD (00CCR) DN
(12CCR)(14CCR) (2020CCR) (2024CCR) RW
UT SPP 3,240,000
CN SPP 12,960,000
Project Cost: 0 3,240,000 12,960,000
Total for Livingston county PL
DN
RW
UT 3,240,000
CN 12,960,000
Total Amounts: 0 3,240,000 12,960,000
Page 152 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Logan 8908 KY-2349 IMPROVE SAFETY BY IMPROVING SIGHT LINES CROSSING PL
RAILROAD BETWEEN STOCKYARDS AND INDUSTRIAL PARK. DN SPP 100,000
(16CCN)(18CCN) (2020CCR) RW SPP 120,000
UT SPP 170,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 100,000 290,000
Logan 80050 US-79 WIDEN US-79 FROM TODD COUNTY LINE TO INTERSECTION WITH PL
RUSSELLVILLE BYPASS.(18CCN) (2020CCR) (2022CCR) (2024CCN) DN NH 11,370,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 11,370,000 0
Logan 80314 US-431 IMPROVE SAFETY AT THE INTERSECTION OF US 431 AND KY 663. PL
(2024CCN) DN SPP 400,000
RW SPP 200,000
UT SPP 250,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 400,000 450,000
Total for Logan county PL
DN 11,870,000
RW 320,000
UT 420,000
CN
Total Amounts: 0 11,870,000 740,000
Lyon 7 I -24 ADD RESTROOM FACILITY TO I-24 EASTBOUND & WESTBOUND PL
WEIGH STATIONS IN LYON COUNTY (DESIGN FUNDS AUTHORIZED DN
UNDER ITEM NO. 99-44.00) RW
UT
CN NH 2,060,000
Project Cost: 2,060,000 0 0
Page 153 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Lyon 187.5000 US-62, RELOCATE US-641 FROM US-62 NEAR EDDYVILLE TO SOUTH OF PL
US-641 THE LYON/CALDWELL COUNTY LINE (2020CCR) (2022CCR) DN
(2024CCR) RW
UT STPF 2,080,000
CN STPF 5,000,000
Project Cost: 2,080,000 0 5,000,000
Lyon 10158 KY-903 BRIDGE PROJECT IN LYON COUNTY ON (072B00047N) KY-903 AT I PL
24 @ MP. 51.718 DN FBP2 74,852
RW
UT
CN FBP2 499,016
Project Cost: 0 0 573,868
Lyon 10197 KY-819 ADDRESS DEFICIENCIES ON BRIDGE ON KY-819 OVER PANTHER PL
CREEK (072B00031N) DN FBP 137,213
RW
UT
CN FBP 914,756
Project Cost: 0 1,051,969 0
Lyon 22077 I -69 ADDRESS CONDITION OF I-069 FROM MILEPOINT 68.084 (68.116 PL
NON-CARDINAL) TO MILEPOINT 71.818 (71.786 CARDINAL) DN NHPM 310,000
RW
UT
CN NHPM 3,151,869
Project Cost: 0 3,461,869 0
Lyon 22078 I -69 ADDRESS CONDITION OF I-069 FROM MILEPOINT 71.786 (71.818 PL
NON-CARDINAL) TO MILEPOINT 73.694 DN NHPM 410,000
RW
UT
CN NHPM 4,090,000
Project Cost: 4,500,000 0 0
Page 154 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Lyon 80312 US-62 ON US 62 WHERE THE P&L RAIL OVERPASS MEETS THE TWO (2) KY PL
810 INTERSECTIONS, RECONSTRUCT US 62/KY 810 (NORTH AND DN SPP 780,000
SOUTH) INTERSECTIONS WITH TURN LANES OR OTHER MEASURE TO RW SPP 450,000
IMPROVE LINE OF SIGHT AND SAFETY ISSUES. (2024CCN)
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 780,000 450,000
Total for Lyon county PL
DN 410,000 1,227,213 74,852
RW 450,000
UT 2,080,000
CN 6,150,000 4,066,625 5,499,016
Total Amounts: 8,640,000 5,293,838 6,023,868
Madison 4702 KY-876 Intersection Improvements at Barnes Mill Road (KY 876) and Goggins PL
Lane (CR 1303). DN
RW SPP 240,000
UT SPP 480,000
CN SPP 1,352,000
Project Cost: 240,000 480,000 1,352,000
Madison 8853 CR-1236, PROPOSED ROADWAY IMPROVEMENTS FROM DUNCANNON RD TO PL
KY-2877, THE MADISON CO AIRPORT TO INCLUDE CALEAST RD (KY 2881 DN
KY-2881 MP.783-MP 2.780), JOHN BALLARD RD (KY 2877 MP0-MP.806 & CR RW
1236 MP0-MP.429) FROM MENELAUS TO AIRPORT RD, & A NEW
UT
BRIDGE OVER SILVER CR.(14CCN)(16CCR) (2020CCR) (2022CCR)
CN HGC 17,830,000
Project Cost: 0 17,830,000 0
Madison 80110 CR-1200, EXTEND BOGGS LN TO CONNECT TO PAVILION WAY (2020CCN) PL
CS-1526 (2022CCR) (2024CCR) DN SPP 330,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 0 330,000
Page 155 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Madison 80201 KY-1983, New road that extends from Menelaus Road (KY 1983) at existing MP PL
PF-9999 2.851 to Mayde Road in Berea. (2022CCN) (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN SPP 4,330,000
Project Cost: 4,330,000 0 0
Madison 80314 KY-21 Reconstruct KY 21 from KY 1617 to US 421. (2024CCN) PL
DN SPP 1,560,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,560,000 0
Madison 80315 KY-876 Improve capacity on Barnes Mill Road between Goggins Lane and the PL
I-75 interchange. Improvements to also include the intersection with DN SPP 1,820,000
Goggins Lane (2024CCN) RW SPP 1,000,000
UT SPP 1,600,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,820,000 2,600,000
Madison 80316 I -75 New construction/modification of the I-75 exit 87 interchange as PL
referenced in the West Richmond Small Urban Area Study (2024CCN) DN
RW NH 193,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 0 193,000
Madison 80356 PF-9999 SCOPING STUDY TO EVALUATE THE FEASIBILITY OF EXTENDING THE PL SPP 320,000
BEREA BYPASS FROM KY 21 IN EASTERN BEREA TO US 25 SOUTH DN
OF BEREA IN MADISON COUNTY. (2024CCN) RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 320,000 0
Page 156 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Madison 80362 CR-1303 Relieve congestion and safety improvements on CR 1303 (Goggins PL
Lane) between KY 169 and US 25 at Victory Drive (MP 0.979 to DN SPP 480,000
0.363). (2024CCN) RW SPP 350,000
UT SPP 1,260,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 480,000 1,610,000
Total for Madison county PL 320,000
DN 3,860,000 330,000
RW 240,000 1,543,000
UT 480,000 2,860,000
CN 4,330,000 17,830,000 1,352,000
Total Amounts: 4,570,000 22,490,000 6,085,000
Magoffin 213 KY-40 ROADWAY IMPROVEMENTS AND SIDEWALK CONSTRUCTION ALONG PL
KY 40 (MP 0.145-0.660) TO BETTER FACILITATE ALTERNATIVE DN
TRANSPORTATION METHODS (2018BOP). (2020CCR) (2024CCR) RW
UT STPF 1,560,000
CN STPF 3,780,000
Project Cost: 1,560,000 3,780,000 0
Magoffin 80302 KY-7 RECONSTRUCT KY 7 FROM WILL BAILEY BRANCH ROAD TO KY PL
1090. (2024CCN) DN SPP 1,260,000
RW SPP 2,750,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,260,000 2,750,000
Magoffin 80303 CR-1265 Reconstruct CR 1265 from the intersection with KY 3337 (MP 0.0) to PL
KY 3050 (MP 0.547) (2024CCN) DN SPP 730,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 730,000 0
Page 157 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Total for Magoffin county PL
DN 1,990,000
RW 2,750,000
UT 1,560,000
CN 3,780,000
Total Amounts: 1,560,000 5,770,000 2,750,000
Marion 3025 KY-52 Construct Phase 2 of the Loretto Sidewalk Project consisting on 3,900 PL
LF of 5-foot wide sidewalk along St. Francis Highway (KY 52) from DN
near Schoolhouse Drive to the intersection of KY 49 and HWY 52, RW
northern terminus of the Phase 1 project, in the City of Loretto.
UT
(2024CCN)
CN SPP 177,000
Project Cost: 0 177,000 0
Marion 10059 KY-152 BRIDGE PROJECT IN MARION COUNTY ON (078B00037N) KY-152 AT PL
COLEMANS RUN CREEK DN BRX 234,738
RW
UT
CN BRX 1,564,920
Project Cost: 0 0 1,799,658
Marion 80259 KY-2154, IMPROVE CONNECTIVITY AND CONGESTION BETWEEN US 68 AND PL
KY-55, KY 55 ON THE EAST SIDE OF LEBANON (APPROXIMATELY 2 MILES) DN
PF-9999, (2022CCN) (2024CCR) RW STPF 5,000,000
US-68
UT STPF 1,560,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 5,000,000 1,560,000
Marion 80312 CR-1129 RECONSTRUCT BILL SAMUEL'S JR RD (CR1129) AND MAKER'S MARK PL
RD (CR1309) FROM NEAR BURK SPRING RD (CR1307) INTERSECTION DN
TO HICKORY CAMP RD (CR1224) INTERSECTION TO IMPROVE RW
ACCESS, SAFETY, AND CONNECTIVITY AND MOBILITY (DESIGN,
UT
RIGHT OF WAY, AND UTILITY PHASES TO BE PAID FOR OR DONATED
CN SPP 9,720,000
Project Cost: 0 0 9,720,000
Page 158 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Total for Marion county PL
DN 234,738
RW 5,000,000
UT 1,560,000
CN 177,000 11,284,920
Total Amounts: 0 5,177,000 13,079,658
Marshall 398 US-62 IMPROVE ACCESS AND REDUCE CONGESTION ON US-62 FROM PL
KY-95 TO THE EXISTING FOUR-LANE HIGHWAY AT LONE VALLEY DN
RD NEAR I-24 INTERCHANGE AND FUTURE I-69 CONNECTION. RW
(2020CCR) (2024CCR)
UT SPP 1,080,000
CN SPP 8,400,000
Project Cost: 0 1,080,000 8,400,000
Marshall 10171 KY-795 BRIDGE PROJECT IN MARSHALL COUNTY ON (079B00014N) KY-795 PL
AT CHESTNUT CREEK DN BRZ 199,072
RW
UT
CN BRZ 1,327,146
Project Cost: 1,526,218 0 0
Marshall 20013 I -24 ADDRESS CONDITION OF I-024 FROM MILEPOINT 17.32 TO MILEPOINT PL
26.558 DN NHPM 1,200,000
RW
UT
CN NHPM 12,000,000
Project Cost: 0 0 13,200,000
Marshall 22074 I -69 ADDRESS CONDITION OF I-069 FROM MILEPOINT 40.088 TO PL
MILEPOINT 50.547 DN NHPM 800,000
RW
UT
CN NHPM 7,953,756
Project Cost: 0 8,753,756 0
Page 159 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Marshall 80311 US-641 CORRECT GEOMETRIC DEFICIENCIES AND ADDRESS SAFETY, PL
SERVICE, AND CONGESTION ISSUES FROM BENTON BAPTIST TEMPLE DN SPP 1,560,000
ROAD / HAPPY HOLLOW RD TO US 68 IN DRAFFENVILLE. (2024CCN) RW SPP 1,750,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,560,000 1,750,000
Marshall 80314 KY-348 IMPROVE GEOMETRIC ALIGNMENTS AND ADDRESS ACCESS ISSUES PL
AND SAFETY CONCERNS FROM KY 2206 TO THE ENTRANCE OF DN SPP 1,040,000
MARSHALL COUNTY HOSPITAL IN BENTON. (2024CCN) RW SPP 1,000,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,040,000 1,000,000
Total for Marshall county PL
DN 199,072 3,400,000 1,200,000
RW 2,750,000
UT 1,080,000
CN 1,327,146 7,953,756 20,400,000
Total Amounts: 1,526,218 12,433,756 24,350,000
Martin 154.1100 KY-40, INEZ TO WARFIELD (SECTION 2-1): FROM LITTLE BLACKLOG TO PL
PF-9999 BOOTH FORK. [STA. 190+00 TO STA. 298+00 (ENGLISH)] (2002BOP) DN
(12CCR)(AR/W)(16CCR) (2022CCN) (2024CCR) RW
UT SPP 2,320,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 0 2,320,000
Martin 192 KY-40 IMPROVE ALIGNMENT AND GEOMETRICS OF THE CURVE LOCATED PL
JUST BEFORE THE JUNCTION OF KY-2031 AND KY-40 TO .1 MILES DN
BEFORE GORDON HOLLOW ROAD, AND IMPROVE THE RW
CULVERT/SAFETY DESIGN TO INCREASE MOTORIST AND
UT
PEDESTRIAN SAFETY. (12CCR) (2020CCR) (2022CCR) (2024CCR)
CN SPP 1,974,646
Project Cost: 0 1,974,646 0
Page 160 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Martin 4333 KY-3 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-3 IN MARTIN COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 50,000
Project Cost: 50,000 0 0
Martin 4335 KY-3 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-3 IN MARTIN COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 100,000
Project Cost: 100,000 0 0
Martin 4347 KY-292 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-292 IN MARTIN COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 50,000
Project Cost: 50,000 0 0
Martin 4348 KY-292 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-292 IN MARTIN COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 30,000
Project Cost: 30,000 0 0
Martin 4349 KY-292 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-292 IN MARTIN COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 10,000
Project Cost: 10,000 0 0
Page 161 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Martin 4405 KY-2031 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-2031 IN MARTIN COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 90,000
Project Cost: 90,000 0 0
Martin 4449 KY-1439 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-1439 IN MARTIN COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 64,000
Project Cost: 64,000 0 0
Martin 4454 KY-292 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-292 IN MARTIN COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 31,000
Project Cost: 31,000 0 0
Martin 4480 KY-908 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-908 IN MARTIN COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 110,000
Project Cost: 110,000 0 0
Martin 10127 KY-40 BRIDGE PROJECT IN MARTIN COUNTY ON (080B00005N) KY-40 AT PL
ROCKCASTLE CREEK DN
RW FBP2 50,000
UT FBP2 200,000
CN FBP2 4,472,753
Project Cost: 0 0 4,722,753
Page 162 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Martin 10151 KY-3407 ADDRESS DEFICIENCIES OF BRIDGE ON KY 3407 OVER Wolf Creek PL
(080B00028N) DN
RW BRX 50,000
UT BRX 135,000
CN BRX 1,921,219
Project Cost: 0 0 2,106,219
Total for Martin county PL
DN
RW 100,000
UT 2,655,000
CN 535,000 1,974,646 6,393,972
Total Amounts: 535,000 1,974,646 9,148,972
Mason 4325 KY-10 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-10 IN MASON COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 74,000
Project Cost: 74,000 0 0
Mason 20030 KY-9 ADDRESS CONDITION OF KY-9 FROM MILEPOINT 7.147 TO MILEPOINT PL
10.256 DN NHPM 400,000
RW
UT
CN NHPM 4,600,000
Project Cost: 0 0 5,000,000
Total for Mason county PL
DN 400,000
RW
UT
CN 74,000 4,600,000
Total Amounts: 74,000 0 5,000,000
Page 163 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
McCracken 142 US-62 Address issues with service, congestion and safety from US 45 to PL
I-24 in Paducah. See March, 2002 Paducah-McCracken County DN
Transportation Study. (2024CCN) RW STP1 5,500,000
UT STP1 2,800,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 5,500,000 2,800,000
McCracken 153.2000 KY-1286 Extend KY 1286 from KY 998 (MP 6.916) to US 60. (Priority Section 2) PL
(2022CCR) (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN STP1 7,800,000
Project Cost: 7,800,000 0 0
McCracken 153.3000 KY-1286 Improve KY 1286 from US 62(MP 5.000) to Perkins Creek Bridge (MP PL
5.896, B00167N). (Priority Section 3) (2022CCN) (2024CCR) DN
RW STP1 2,750,000
UT STP1 2,160,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 4,910,000 0
McCracken 153.4000 KY-1286 Improve KY 1286 from Perkins Creek Bridge (MP 5.896, B00167N) to PL
KY 998 (MP 6.916). (Priority Section 4) (2022CCN) (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT STP1 2,160,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 2,160,000 0
McCracken 222 US-60 IMPROVE THE US-60 INTERSECTION AT COLEMAN ROAD EAST OF PL
THE I-24 DOUBLE CROSSOVER DIAMOND (DCD). DN
RW
UT
CN NH 4,900,000
Project Cost: 0 0 4,900,000
Page 164 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
McCracken 223 US-60 WIDEN US-60 FROM NEW HOLT ROAD TO NEAR OLIVET CHURCH PL
ROAD. DN
RW
UT
CN NH 4,300,000
Project Cost: 0 0 4,300,000
McCracken 1115.1000 US-60 RELOCATION AND MINOR WIDENING OF US-60 FROM CLARKS RIVER PL
TO US-62 JCT.(10CCR)(14CCR)(LET W/ 1-1115.20)(16CCR) DN NH 560,000
RW NH 4,030,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 560,000 0 4,030,000
McCracken 4903 US-45 Upgrade navigational lighting for the US 45 (Irvin S Cobb) Bridge. PL
073B00001N DN SPP 70,000
RW
UT
CN SPP 900,000
Project Cost: 970,000 0 0
McCracken 10162 KY-3520 BRIDGE PROJECT IN MCCRACKEN COUNTY ON (073B00030N) PL
KY-3520 AT P&L RAILWAY DN BRZ 456,086
RW
UT
CN BRZ 3,040,571
Project Cost: 0 3,496,657 0
McCracken 10166 I -24 BRIDGE PROJECT IN MCCRACKEN COUNTY ON (073B00100N) I-24 AT PL
OHIO RIVER DN
RW
UT
CN BRX 23,100,000
Project Cost: 0 23,100,000 0
Page 165 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
McCracken 10261 I -24 Planning and Phase I Engineering for the future expansion or PL
replacement of the I-24 Ohio River Bridge. (Shared Cost w/ Illinois) DN
(073B00100N) RW
UT
CN BRO 1,375,000 1,375,000
Project Cost: 0 1,375,000 1,375,000
McCracken 20017 I -24 ADDRESS CONDITION OF I-024 FROM MILEPOINT 16.172 TO PL
MILEPOINT 17.32 DN STP3 80,000
RW
UT
CN STP3 800,000
Project Cost: 0 880,000 0
McCracken 80305 I -24 ADDRESS SAFETY, CONGESTION, AND FUTURE CAPACITY ISSUES PL
FROM US 60 TO US 68 IN PADUCAH. SEE MARCH, 2002 DN NH 2,080,000
PADUCAH-MCCRACKEN COUNTY TRANSPORTATION STUDY. RW NH 550,000
(2024CCN)
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 2,080,000 550,000
McCracken 80315 KY-998 IMPROVE MOBILITY, SAFETY AND ADDRESS GEOMETRIC PL
DEFICIENCIES ON KY 998 (OLIVET CHURCH ROAD) FROM KY 1286 DN SPP 1,560,000
(FRIENDSHIP ROAD) TO US 62. (2024CCN) RW SPP 2,750,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,560,000 2,750,000
McCracken 80317 KY-731 BASED ON THE 2019 PADUCAH SUA, ID "Q". RECONFIGURE THE PL
INTERSECTION OF KY 731 AND LABELLE AVE. A ROUNDABOUT DN
SHOULD BE CONSIDERED. THIS IS BASED ON 33 CRASHES IN 3 RW SPP 2,000,000
YEARS AND COMPLAINTS FROM LOCALS ABOUT POOR DRAINAGE
UT SPP 3,500,000
RUN OFF GOING INTO THE STREET. (2024CCN)
CN
Project Cost: 0 2,000,000 3,500,000
Total for McCracken county PL
DN 630,000 4,176,086
RW 10,250,000 7,330,000
UT 4,320,000 6,300,000
CN 8,700,000 28,315,571 10,575,000
Total Amounts: 9,330,000 47,061,657 24,205,000
Page 166 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
McCreary 10059 KY-1470 BRIDGE PROJECT IN MCCREARY COUNTY ON (074B00020N) KY-1470 PL
AT MARSH CREEK DN BRX 156,474
RW
UT
CN BRX 1,043,159
Project Cost: 0 0 1,199,633
McCreary 80004 KY-92 PRELIMINARY ENGINEERING AND ENVIRONMENTAL CORRIDOR PL SPP 500,000
STUDY FOR IMPROVING SAFETY AND MAKING KY-92 A SCENIC DN
ROUTE FROM MONTICELLO TO STEARNS (FLEXIBLE SOLUTIONS) RW
(18CCN) (2020CCR) (2024CCR)
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 500,000 0
McCreary 80102 US-27 PROVIDE CONNECTIVITY, IMPROVE MOBILITY AND RESPONSE FROM PL
US 27 TO MCCREARY COUNTY HIGH SCHOOL (2020CCN) (2022CCR) DN
(2024CCR) RW SPP 10,000
UT SPP 160,000
CN SPP 3,120,000
Project Cost: 10,000 160,000 3,120,000
McCreary 80103 CR-1199 Improve mobility and safety RR crossing elimination by constructing PL
bridge and realigning KY 1470, approx 0.177 miles west of CR1199A DN
(Dick Wilson Rd) and extending easterly to US 27. (2020CCN) RW SPP 750,000
(2022CCR) (2024CCR)
UT SPP 720,000
CN SPP 8,420,000
Project Cost: 0 1,470,000 8,420,000
Total for McCreary county PL 500,000
DN 156,474
RW 10,000 750,000
UT 880,000
CN 12,583,159
Total Amounts: 10,000 2,130,000 12,739,633
Page 167 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
McLean 8400 US-431 SPOT IMPROVEMENTS AT THE INTERSECTION OF US-431 AND PL
KY-250. (08CCN)(12CCR)(18CCN) (2020CCR) (2022CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN SPP 1,770,000
Project Cost: 1,770,000 0 0
McLean 8812 KY-136 REPLACE, IMPROVE ALIGNMENTS AND APPROACHES, AND PL
ADDRESS SAFETY ISSUES WITH BRIDGES ON KY-136 IN MCLEAN DN
COUNTY FROM KY-56 TO OHIO COUNTY LINE. (075B00034N, RW
075B00011N, 075B00009N, 075B00010N) (2022CCN) (2024CCN)
UT
CN SPP 7,560,000
Project Cost: 0 0 7,560,000
McLean 10111 KY-81 BRIDGE PROJECT IN MCCLEAN COUNTY ON (075B00028N) KY-81 AT PL
UNNAMED STREAM DN BRX 133,805
RW
UT
CN BRX 892,032
Project Cost: 0 0 1,025,837
McLean 10116 KY-140 BRIDGE PROJECT IN MCCLEAN COUNTY ON (075B00040N) KY-140 PL
AT BR OF LONG FALLS CREEK DN BRX 224,659
RW
UT
CN BRX 1,497,726
Project Cost: 0 0 1,722,385
Total for McLean county PL
DN 358,464
RW
UT
CN 1,770,000 9,949,758
Total Amounts: 1,770,000 0 10,308,222
Page 168 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Meade 8705 KY-79 RECONSTRUCT KY 79 FROM KY 144 TO KY 1051. (12CCN)(14CCR) PL
(18CCN) (2020CCR) (2022CCR) (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN SPP 17,280,000
Project Cost: 0 17,280,000 0
Meade 10078 KY-313 ADDRESS DEFICIENCIES OF BRIDGE ON KY 313 OVER OHIO RIVER PL
AND CO ROAD (082B00021N) DN BRX 475,000
RW
UT
CN BRX 3,525,000
Project Cost: 0 0 4,000,000
Meade 80309 KY-313 ADDRESS SAFETY AND MOBILITY ALONG KY 313 (BRANDENBURG PL
BYPASS) FROM KY 448 TO KY 228 IN BRANDENBURG. (2024CCN) DN SPP 2,000,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 2,000,000 0
Total for Meade county PL
DN 2,000,000 475,000
RW
UT
CN 17,280,000 3,525,000
Total Amounts: 0 19,280,000 4,000,000
Menifee 250 US-460 Reconstruction of US 460 from Lucky Stop to KY 713 @ Means. PL
(2024CCN) DN SPP 600,000
RW SPP 3,750,000
UT SPP 12,730,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 600,000 16,480,000
Page 169 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Menifee 8805 US-460 WIDEN EXISTING ROADWAY AND IMPROVE VERTICAL AND PL
HORIZONTAL CURVES. NEW CONSTRUCTION. COMPLETES US 460 DN SPP 3,930,000
UPGRADES IN MENIFEE COUNTY FROM MP 14.35 TO 19.39 AND IN RW
MORGAN COUNTY FROM MP 0 TO MP 0.8. (14CCN)(16CCR)
UT
(2024CCN)
CN
Project Cost: 0 3,930,000 0
Menifee 80200 US-460 IMPROVE SAFETY, CORRECT GEOMETRICS, AND ENHANCE PL
REGIONAL CONNECTIVITY ON US 460 FROM THE INTERSECTION OF DN
KY 1240 TO 0.7 MILES EAST OF THE MORGAN COUNTY LINE RW SPP 7,500,000
(2022CCN) (2024CCR)
UT SPP 3,600,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 11,100,000 0
Menifee 80201 US-460 Improve safety, correct geometrics, and enhance regional connectivity PL
on US 460 from the bridge over Dog Trot Fork (MP 3.3) to Rothwell (MP DN
4.8). (2022CCN) (2024CCR) RW
UT SPP 1,985,000
CN SPP 13,220,000
Project Cost: 0 1,985,000 13,220,000
Total for Menifee county PL
DN 4,530,000
RW 7,500,000 3,750,000
UT 5,585,000 12,730,000
CN 13,220,000
Total Amounts: 0 17,615,000 29,700,000
Mercer 417 CS-1237 IMPROVE SYSTEM MOBILITY ALONG MOBERLY ROAD FROM KY 390 PL
TO KY 1989 IN NORTHWEST HARRODSBURG. (12CCR) (2020CCN) DN
(2024CCR) RW SPP 420,000
UT SPP 390,000
CN SPP 2,760,000
Project Cost: 0 810,000 2,760,000
Page 170 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Mercer 80355 US-127 Improve level of safety and access at and around the intersection of PL
US 127 and KY 598 (Sparrow Lane). (MP 2.676 - 2.776) (2024CCN) DN
RW SPP 40,000
UT SPP 170,000
CN SPP 750,000
Project Cost: 0 210,000 750,000
Total for Mercer county PL
DN
RW 460,000
UT 560,000
CN 3,510,000
Total Amounts: 0 1,020,000 3,510,000
Metcalfe 112.1000 KY-90 SUMMER SHADE BYPASS. (06CCR)(2006BOPC)(08CCR)(12CCR) PL
(14CCR) (2024CCN) DN SPP 2,240,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 2,240,000 0
Metcalfe 8859 KY-163 RECONSTRUCT KY 163 AS A NEW ROUTE ON WEST SIDE OF PL
EDMONTON FROM KY 163 AT GARY BELL RD (MP 10.0) S OF DN
EDMONTON CROSSING US 68 (STOCKTON ST) 2000 FT WEST OF THE RW SPP 3,660,000
COURTHOUSE SQ, TO US 68 (GREENSBURG ST) AT I-CHNG WITH
UT SPP 2,570,000
NUNN PKWY (MP 9.8).(14CCN)(16CCR)(18CCN) (2020CCR)
CN
Project Cost: 0 6,230,000 0
Metcalfe 80306 US-68 INTERSECTION IMPROVEMENTS AT US-68 AND KY-80. OPTIONS PL
INCLUDE REALIGNMENT OF NORTH APPROACH, WIDENING FOR TURN DN SPP 330,000
LANES, AND A ROUNDABOUT. (2024CCN) RW SPP 310,000
UT SPP 310,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 330,000 620,000
Page 171 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Metcalfe 80309 LN-9008 IMPROVE SAFETY AND ADDRESS GEOMETRIC DEFICIENCIES ON THE PL
LB NUNN CUMBERLAND EXPRESSWAY AT EXIT 27 INTERCHANGE. DN SPP 1,940,000
(2024CCN) RW SPP 330,000
UT SPP 380,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,940,000 710,000
Metcalfe 80325 KY-163 PE & ENVIRONMENTAL FOR KY-163 FROM KY-90 TO PROPOSED PL
WEST EDMONTON BYPASS. (2024CCN) DN SPP 3,000,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 0 3,000,000
Total for Metcalfe county PL
DN 4,510,000 3,000,000
RW 3,660,000 640,000
UT 2,570,000 690,000
CN
Total Amounts: 0 10,740,000 4,330,000
Monroe 128.1100 KY-214 OPERATION OF TURKEY NECK BEND FERRY FOR FY 2027-2032. PL
(12CCR) (2020CCR) (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN SPP 1,250,000 1,250,000
Project Cost: 0 1,250,000 1,250,000
Monroe 10044 KY-678 BRIDGE PROJECT IN MONROE COUNTY ON (086B00040N) KY-678 AT PL
SKAGGS CREEK DN BRX 301,224
RW
UT
CN BRX 2,008,159
Project Cost: 0 0 2,309,383
Page 172 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Total for Monroe county PL
DN 301,224
RW
UT
CN 1,250,000 3,258,159
Total Amounts: 0 1,250,000 3,559,383
Montgomery 240 KY-1991 WIDEN KY-1991 FROM MAYSVILLE ROAD TO MIDLAND TRAIL PL
INDUSTRIAL PARK, MONTGOMERY COUNTY. (SEE 7-8501.00 FOR DN
"SPB" FUNDS) (2005HPP-KY129) (2022CCR) (2024CCR) RW
UT
CN STP1 3,050,000
Project Cost: 3,050,000 0 0
Montgomery 411 KY-1991 UPGRADE HINKSTON PIKE IN MT. STERLING FROM NEW MIDLAND PL
TRAIL TO THE NEW INDUSTRIAL PARK ENTRANCE (INCLUDES DN
EXTENSION OF INDUSTRIAL ACCESS ROAD TO HINKSTON PIKE). RW SPP 620,000
(12CCR)(18CCN) (2022CCR) (2024CCR)
UT SPP 980,000
CN SPP 9,050,000
Project Cost: 0 1,600,000 9,050,000
Montgomery 8810 US-60 WIDEN EXISTING PAVEMENT & IMPROVE VERTICAL & HORIZONTAL PL
CURVES FROM EXISTING MT STERLING BYPASS (KY 686) TO 500' W DN
OF BENTBROOK SUBDIVISION. ADD FULL WIDTH SHOULDERS & A RW
CENTER TURNING LANE IN CONGESTION AREAS FROM MP 2.2 TO
UT SPP 5,730,000
4.311.(14CCN)(16CCR)(18CCN) (2020CCR) (2024CCR)
CN
Project Cost: 0 5,730,000 0
Total for Montgomery county PL
DN
RW 620,000
UT 6,710,000
CN 3,050,000 9,050,000
Total Amounts: 3,050,000 7,330,000 9,050,000
Page 173 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Morgan 8004 PF-9999 WEST LIBERTY BYPASS - CONSTRUCT NEW ROUTE FROM US 460 @ PL
KY 2498 TO US 460 @ KY 172. (00CCN) DN SPP 1,800,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,800,000 0
Morgan 8804 KY-2498 IMPROVE KY-2498 FROM US-460 TO THE ARH HOSPITAL. (14CCN) PL
(16CCN) (2022CCR) (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN SPP 8,790,000
Project Cost: 8,790,000 0 0
Morgan 20033 KY-1260 ADDRESS CONDITION OF KY-1260 FROM MILEPOINT 0 TO MILEPOINT PL
2.8 DN STP4 160,000
RW
UT
CN STP4 1,840,000
Project Cost: 0 0 2,000,000
Morgan 80202 US-460 Improve safety and substandard geometrics on US 460 from the PL
Menifee County Line to approximately milepoint 0.8. (2022CCN) DN SPP 580,000
(2024CCR) RW SPP 500,000
UT SPP 180,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 580,000 680,000
Morgan 80307 US-460 Improve safety and reliability of US 460 from the intersection of KY PL
1081 to the Magoffin County line (2024CCN) DN SPP 1,200,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,200,000 0
Total for Morgan county PL
DN 3,580,000 160,000
RW 500,000
UT 180,000
CN 8,790,000 1,840,000
Total Amounts: 8,790,000 3,580,000 2,680,000
Page 174 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Muhlenberg 8802 KY-181 WIDEN KY-181 BY FOUR FEET ON EACH SIDE FROM INTERSECTION PL
601 TO WENDELL FORD CENTER. (14CCN)(18CCN) (2022CCR) DN
(2024CCR) RW
UT
CN STPF 6,320,000
Project Cost: 0 6,320,000 0
Muhlenberg 8803 KY-2533 STRAIGHTEN DEAN ROAD INTERSECTION OF 189 BYPASS TO KY PL
181 NORTH NEAR THE INTERSECTION WITH THE WKY PARKWAY, DN
WENDELL FORD NATIONAL GUARD CENTER, AND JOB CORP. RW SPP 1,730,000
(14CCN)(18CCN) (2020CCR) (2022CCR) (2024CCR)
UT SPP 1,120,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 2,850,000 0
Muhlenberg 10122 KY-181 BRIDGE PROJECT IN MUHLENBERG COUNTY ON (089B00031N) PL
KY-181 AT BAT EAST CREEK DN BRX 215,380
RW
UT
CN BRX 1,435,867
Project Cost: 1,651,247 0 0
Muhlenberg 22162 WK-9001 ADDRESS CONDITION OF Wendell H. Ford Western KY Parkway PL
FROM MILEPOINT 45.95 TO MILEPOINT 52.535 DN NHPM 870,000
RW
UT
CN NHPM 8,730,000
Project Cost: 0 0 9,600,000
Muhlenberg 22165 WK-9001 ADDRESS CONDITION OF Wendell H. Ford Western KY Parkway PL
FROM MILEPOINT 59.92 TO MILEPOINT 65.375 DN NHPM 410,000
RW
UT
CN NHPM 4,150,380
Project Cost: 0 4,560,380 0
Page 175 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Muhlenberg 80201 WK-9001 WESTERN KENTUCKY PKY - RECONSTRUCT INTERCHANGE AT US PL
431 AT CENTRAL CITY (2022CCN) (2024CCR) DN
RW SPP 1,380,000
UT SPP 2,090,000
CN SPP 15,600,000
Project Cost: 0 3,470,000 15,600,000
Total for Muhlenberg county PL
DN 215,380 410,000 870,000
RW 3,110,000
UT 3,210,000
CN 1,435,867 10,470,380 24,330,000
Total Amounts: 1,651,247 17,200,380 25,200,000
Nelson 396.1000 US-150 IMPROVE SAFETY, MOBILITY, AND GEOMETRICS ON US-150 FROM PL
THE BLUEGRASS PARKWAY TO THE NELSON/WASHINGTON DN
COUNTY LINE. (2016BOP)(18CCR)(D-Auth under 4-396) (2022CCR) RW
(2024CCR)
UT
CN STPF 4,000,000 5,000,000
Project Cost: 0 4,000,000 5,000,000
Nelson 4319 KY-458 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-458 IN NELSON COUNTY (2024CCR) PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 311,000
Project Cost: 311,000 0 0
Nelson 8308.1000 US-150 WIDEN US-150 FROM KY-49 TO NEAR KY-245/WAL-MART WIDENING. PL
(06CCN) (2022CCN) (2024CCR) DN
RW STP1 3,500,000
UT STP1 2,080,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 3,500,000 2,080,000
Page 176 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Nelson 20052 BG-9002 ADDRESS CONDITION OF Martha Layne Collins Bluegrass Parkway PL
FROM MILEPOINT 8.837 TO MILEPOINT 10.172 DN STP5 50,000
RW
UT
CN STP5 537,400
Project Cost: 0 587,400 0
Nelson 22176 BG-9002 ADDRESS CONDITION OF Martha Layne Collins Bluegrass Parkway PL
FROM MILEPOINT 35.15 TO MILEPOINT 39.267 DN NHPM 730,000
RW
UT
CN NHPM 7,270,000
Project Cost: 0 0 8,000,000
Nelson 80356 KY-55 Address geometric deficiencies along KY 55 near pleasant view road PL
in Bloomfield. (2024CCN) DN SPP 340,000
RW SPP 1,000,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 340,000 1,000,000
Nelson 80366 KY-247 Address condition of KY 247 (Monks Road) between KY 52 and US PL
31E (Approx. 7.64 miles in length). (2024CCN) DN
RW
UT
CN STP5 1,080,000
Project Cost: 1,080,000 0 0
Total for Nelson county PL
DN 390,000 730,000
RW 3,500,000 1,000,000
UT 2,080,000
CN 1,391,000 4,537,400 12,270,000
Total Amounts: 1,391,000 8,427,400 16,080,000
Page 177 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Nicholas 205 KY-36 IMPROVE THE KY-36/KY-32 INTERSECTION NEAR THE NICHOLAS PL
COUNTY SCHOOL PROPERTY (12CCR)(16CCR)(2020CCR) (2022CCR) DN
(2024CCR) RW SPP 2,100,000
UT SPP 1,620,000
CN SPP 6,720,000
Project Cost: 0 2,100,000 8,340,000
Nicholas 8811 KY-36 RECONSTRUCT KY 36/KY 928 INTERSECTION. (14CCN)(16CCR) PL
(18CCN) (2024CCR) DN
RW SPP 440,000
UT
CN SPP 1,680,000
Project Cost: 0 440,000 1,680,000
Nicholas 10094 KY-32 BRIDGE PROJECT IN NICHOLAS COUNTY ON (091B00012N) KY-32 AT PL
FLEMING CREEK DN FBP2 327,888
RW
UT
CN FBP2 2,185,920
Project Cost: 0 2,513,808 0
Nicholas 10103 KY-32 ADDRESS DEFICIENCIES OF BRIDGE ON KY 32 OVER PL
TRIB-HOOKTOWN BRANCH (091B00031N) DN BRX 58,818
RW
UT
CN BRX 392,122
Project Cost: 0 450,940 0
Nicholas 22360 US-68 ADDRESS CONDITION OF US-68 FROM MILEPOINT 10.73 TO PL
MILEPOINT 12.13 DN STP4 121,600
RW
UT
CN STP4 1,398,400
Project Cost: 0 1,520,000 0
Page 178 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Nicholas 80306 KY-36 Improve safety, geometric deficiencies, and promote connectivity PL
along KY-36 between US-68 (mile-point 0.864) and KY-13 (mile-point DN SPP 2,430,000
3.910). (2024CCN) RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 2,430,000 0
Total for Nicholas county PL
DN 2,938,306
RW 2,540,000
UT 1,620,000
CN 3,976,442 8,400,000
Total Amounts: 0 9,454,748 10,020,000
Ohio 127 US-62 Address Drainage Issues on US 62 in Ohio County PL
DN
RW
UT
CN SPP 2,400,000
Project Cost: 0 2,400,000 0
Ohio 4302 KY-69 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-69 IN OHIO COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 40,000
Project Cost: 40,000 0 0
Ohio 4303 KY-69 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-69 IN OHIO COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 50,000
Project Cost: 50,000 0 0
Page 179 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Ohio 8951 KY-54 IMPROVE SAFETY ON KY 54 BY UPGRADING MP 7.0 TO MP 8.0 TO PL
THREE LANES INCLUDING CURB AND GUTTER AND ADDRESSING DN
TWO SHARP TURNS. (16CCN)(18CCN) (2020CCR) (2022CCR) RW SPP 2,020,000
(2024CCR)
UT SPP 2,640,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 2,020,000 2,640,000
Ohio 80303 US-231 ADDRESS LEFT TURN LANE ISSUES ON US-231 AT BOTH PERDUE PL
ENTRANCES. (2024CCN) DN SPP 850,000
RW SPP 910,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 850,000 910,000
Total for Ohio county PL
DN 850,000
RW 2,020,000 910,000
UT 2,640,000
CN 90,000 2,400,000
Total Amounts: 90,000 5,270,000 3,550,000
Oldham 234 KY-146, KY-393 RECONSTRUCT FROM 140FEET SOUTH OF RAILROAD PL
KY-393 CROSSING (CSX) EXTENDING NORTHWEST TOWARDS KY 146 DN
ENDING AT STATION 12+00 (DESIGN UNDER 5-230.00). RW
(CONSTRUCTION SEQ.#2) (2020CCN) (2022CCR) (2024CCR)
UT
CN STPF 5,000,000 18,490,000 10,000,000
Project Cost: 5,000,000 18,490,000 10,000,000
Oldham 304.1000 KY-22 RECONSTRUCT KY-22 FROM KY-329 TO ABBOTT LANE. PL
(2004BOPC)(08CCR)(10CCR)(12CCR) (2024CCN) DN SPP 1,040,000
RW SPP 4,200,000
UT SPP 2,500,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,040,000 6,700,000
Page 180 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Oldham 483.1000 I -71 WIDEN I-71 FROM FOUR TO SIX LANES FROM KY-329 (MP 14.1) TO PL
KY-393 (MP 18.0). (2022CCR) (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT NH 2,090,000
CN NH 21,000,000
Project Cost: 2,090,000 0 21,000,000
Oldham 483.2000 I -71 WIDEN I-71 FROM FOUR TO SIX LANES FROM KY-393 (MP 18.0) TO PL
KY-53 (MP 22.4). (16CCN) (2024CCR) DN NH 6,160,000
RW NH 2,420,000
UT NH 1,040,000
CN
Project Cost: 6,160,000 0 3,460,000
Oldham 483.4000 I -71 Addition of soundwall on I-71 SB along Darby Pointe Neighborhood PL
(MP 16.7-17.4) (To be let with 5-483.1 I-71 Widening). (2024CCN) DN SPP 220,000
RW
UT
CN SPP 6,225,000
Project Cost: 0 220,000 6,225,000
Oldham 8852 KY-53 DESIGN FOR IMPROVING KY-53 FROM ZHALE SMITH ROAD TO KY-22 PL
(TOTAL 3.2 MILES). (14CCN)(18CCN) (2022CCR) (2024CCR) DN
RW SPP 1,790,000
UT SPP 730,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,790,000 730,000
Oldham 22098 I -71 ADDRESS CONDITION OF I-071 CARDINAL DIRECTION FROM PL
MILEPOINT 14.38 TO MILEPOINT 18.07 DN NHPM 750,000
RW
UT
CN NHPM 7,550,000
Project Cost: 0 8,300,000 0
Page 181 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Oldham 80005 I -71 IMPROVE THE INTERCHANGE OF I 71 AND KY 329. (18CCN) PL
(2020CCR) (DESIGNED UNDER 5-483.10) (2022CCR) (2024CCR) DN NH 430,000
RW NH 1,160,000
UT NH 1,050,000
CN NH 9,840,000
Project Cost: 430,000 2,210,000 9,840,000
Oldham 80211 KY-524 Landslide repair on Westport Road (KY-524) from JCT. US-42 West, PL
north 1.0 mile. (2002BOPC)(NOT REQUIRED) (2022CCN) DN SPP 650,000
RW SPP 530,000
UT SPP 500,000
CN SPP 4,000,000
Project Cost: 0 650,000 5,030,000
Oldham 80307 US-42 IMPROVE TRAFFIC FLOW, MINIMIZE CONGESTION, AND ADDRESS PL
SAFETY ISSUES ON US 42 BETWEEN RIDGMOOR DRIVE AND KY DN SPP 3,500,000
1694 (GUM STREET). INCLUDES CONSIDERATION OF A THREE LANE RW
WIDENING AND BIKE/PED ACCOMMODATIONS. (2024CCN)
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 3,500,000 0
Oldham 80314 KY-362 IMPROVE SAFETY, ACCESS, AND ADDRESS GEOMETRIC PL SPP 210,000
DEFICIENCIES ALONG KY 362 FROM THE OLDHAM/SHELBY COUNTY DN SPP 1,960,000
LINE TO KY 146 (IN AND SOUTH OF PEWEE VALLEY). INCLUDES RW
CONSIDERATION OF A 3 LANE WIDENING WITH A TWO WAY LEFT
UT
TURN LANE AND BIKE/PED ACCOMMODATIONS. (2024CCN)
CN
Project Cost: 0 210,000 1,960,000
Oldham 80325 KY-146 REDUCE CONGESTION, IMPROVE SAFETY AND ENHANCE MOBILITY PL
ON KY 146 IN BUCKNER FROM KY 1817 (NEW CUT ROAD) (MP 6.81) DN SPP 510,000
TO KY 393 (MP 7.42). (2024CCN) RW SPP 1,140,000
UT SPP 1,130,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 510,000 2,270,000
Page 182 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Oldham 80344 I -71 ADDITION OF SOUNDWALL ON I 71 NB ALONG SPRING HILL PL
SUBDIVISION. (As a part of the I-MOVE Expansion Project on I 71). DN SPP 210,000
(NOTE: Does not meet required noise wall environmental noise RW
analysis abatement eligibility requirements for federal funding.)
UT
(2024CCN)
CN SPP 3,400,000
Project Cost: 0 210,000 3,400,000
Oldham 80345 KY-22 IMPROVE SAFETY AND REDUCE CONGESTION, ALONG US 22 FROM PL
HAUNZ LANE TO KY 329. (2024CCN) DN SPP 330,000
RW SPP 840,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 330,000 840,000
Total for Oldham county PL 210,000
DN 6,590,000 7,210,000 1,960,000
RW 2,950,000 9,130,000
UT 2,090,000 1,050,000 5,900,000
CN 5,000,000 26,040,000 54,465,000
Total Amounts: 13,680,000 37,460,000 71,455,000
Owen 8702 KY-22 WIDEN KY 22 FROM INTERSECTION WITH KY 845 TO THE PL
OWEN/GRANT COUNTY LINE.(12CCN)(14CCR)(16CCR) DN
(2024CCN) RW SPP 3,300,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 0 3,300,000
Owen 80319 KY-355 RECONSTRUCTION KY 355 FROM KY 22 IN GRATZ TO KY 1982 NEAR PL
PERRY PARK. (2024CCN) DN SPP 4,860,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 4,860,000 0
Page 183 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Total for Owen county PL
DN 4,860,000
RW 3,300,000
UT
CN
Total Amounts: 0 4,860,000 3,300,000
Owsley 80105 KY-11 RECONSTRUCT THE INTERSECTION OF KY 11 AND KY 846 (2020CCN) PL
(2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN SPP 3,490,000
Project Cost: 3,490,000 0 0
Owsley 80304 KY-3504 Improvements to the intersection of KY 3504 and Old KY 11 (CR PL
1346K) (2024CCN) DN
RW
UT
CN SPP 240,000
Project Cost: 240,000 0 0
Total for Owsley county PL
DN
RW
UT
CN 3,730,000
Total Amounts: 3,730,000 0 0
Pendleton 8508.1000 KY-22, RELOCATE KY 22 FROM THE INTERSECTION OF FRYER ROAD AND PL
PF-9999 KY 330 TO US 27 (ALIGNMENT H FROM 1988 STUDY) (2022CCN) DN SPP 3,440,000
(2024CCR) RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 3,440,000 0
Page 184 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Pendleton 80253 US-27 IMPROVE SAFETY AND MOBILITY ON US 27 AT THE KY PL
INTERSECTION (MILEPOINT 11.6 TO MILEPOINT 12) (2022CCN) DN STPF 420,000
(2024CCR) RW STPF 550,000
UT STPF 190,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 420,000 740,000
Pendleton 80258 KY-177 RECONSTRUCTION FROM KY 3185 IN BUTLER TO KY 467 (2022CCN) PL
DN SPP 2,240,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 2,240,000 0
Pendleton 80306 US-27 IMPROVE SAFETY AND MOBILITY ON US 27 AT THE KY 22 PL
INTERSECTION. (2024CCN) DN STPF 870,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 0 870,000
Pendleton 80310 KY-177 RECONSTRUCT KY 177 FROM LICKING RIVER BRIDGE IN BUTLER TO PL
KY 3185. (2024CCN) DN SPP 2,170,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 2,170,000 0
Total for Pendleton county PL
DN 8,270,000 870,000
RW 550,000
UT 190,000
CN
Total Amounts: 0 8,270,000 1,610,000
Page 185 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Perry 178 KY-7 Address roadway slide on KY 7 from MP 9.8 to MP 10.0. (2024CCR) PL
DN
RW
UT
CN PROT 4,270,000
Project Cost: 4,270,000 0 0
Perry 209.1000 KY-476 IMPROVE KY 476 FROM BRIDGE OVER NORTH FORK KY RIVER (MP. PL
0.45) TO NORTH OF WALKER CORNETT ROAD IN WABACO. DN SPP 160,000
(SECTION 1) RW
UT SPP 580,000
CN SPP 3,780,000
Project Cost: 0 740,000 3,780,000
Perry 209.2000 KY-476 IMPROVE KY 476 FROM KY-15X IN WALKERTOWN TO BRIDGE OVER PL
NORTH FORK KY RIVER. DN SPP 330,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 330,000 0
Perry 269.2000 KY-15 RECONSTRUCTION OF KY 15 FROM BONNYMAN TO NEAR KY 28. PL
(14CCN) (2020CCN) (2022CCR) (2024CCR) DN
RW SPP 13,750,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 0 13,750,000
Perry 4317 KY-7 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-7 IN PERRY COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 64,000
Project Cost: 64,000 0 0
Page 186 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Perry 8903 HR-9006 NEW INTERCHANGE OFF OF A NEW EXIT 55 HAL ROGERS PL
PARKWAY. (16CCN)(18CCN) (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN NH 12,000,000
Project Cost: 0 0 12,000,000
Perry 22204 HR-9006 ADDRESS CONDITION OF Hal Rogers Daniel Boone Parkway FROM PL
MILEPOINT 57.185 TO MILEPOINT 59.088 DN NHPM 600,000
RW
UT
CN NHPM 6,000,000
Project Cost: 0 6,600,000 0
Perry 80100 CR-1365 NEW IMPROVED ACCESS TO WENDALL FORD AIRPORT (2020CCN) PL
(2022CCR) (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN HGC 18,200,000
Project Cost: 18,200,000 0 0
Perry 80305 KY-1440 Reconstruct roadway to eliminate flooding beginning at the intersection PL
with KY 550. (2024CCN) DN SPP 710,000
RW SPP 830,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 710,000 830,000
Perry 80306 KY-550 Improve drainage issues and construct sidewalk on KY 550 from MP PL
1.2 to MP 1.7 near the Galen College of Nursing. (2024CCN) DN SPP 680,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 680,000 0
Page 187 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Perry 80308 PF-9999 Construct a new access road to East Perry Sports Complex PL
development and a connector to Nautilus Drive (2024CCN) DN SPP 360,000
RW SPP 60,000
UT SPP 110,000
CN SPP 1,080,000
Project Cost: 360,000 170,000 1,080,000
Total for Perry county PL
DN 360,000 2,480,000
RW 60,000 14,580,000
UT 690,000
CN 22,534,000 6,000,000 16,860,000
Total Amounts: 22,894,000 9,230,000 31,440,000
Pike 147 KY-1426 MITIGATE OR ELIMINATE ROCKFALL HAZARDS AND IMPROVE PL
ROADWAY FOR BETTER FLOW AND EFFICIENCY IN ORDER TO DN
HANDLE THE EXPECTED CONGESTION ARISING FROM EVENTS AT RW PROT 2,600,000
THE EXPO CENTER. IDENTIFIED IN THE 1999 PIKEVILLE URBAN STUDY,
UT PROT 1,500,000
FROM BILL KING RD. TO US 119. (2020CCR) ($7 MILLION
CN PROT 7,000,000
Project Cost: 4,100,000 0 7,000,000
Pike 182 CO-0 Pikeville Corridor Access and Safety Improvement Project with USDOT PL
SS4A Grant and $1,900,000 state matching funds. DN
RW
UT
CN KYD 7,400,000
SPP 1,900,000
Project Cost: 9,300,000 0 0
Pike 198 KY-194 IMPROVE KY 194 FROM US 119 RAMP NEAR SMITH FARMS BOTTOM PL
(CR 1458) TO NEAR DESKINS BRANCH CULVERT. (18CCR) DN
(2020CCR) RW
UT
CN STPF 9,000,000 5,538,000
Project Cost: 9,000,000 5,538,000 0
Page 188 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Pike 346 US-460 IMPROVE SAFETY AND REDUCE CONGESTION AT THE US-460 AND PL
KY-1460 INTERSECTION. (2020CCR) (2022CCR) (2024CCR) DN
RW NH 872,000
UT NH 860,000
CN NH 6,060,000
Project Cost: 872,000 860,000 6,060,000
Pike 4410 KY-1056 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-1056 IN PIKE COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 70,000
Project Cost: 70,000 0 0
Pike 4411 KY-1469 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-1469 IN PIKE COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 50,000
Project Cost: 50,000 0 0
Pike 4412 KY-1469 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-1469 IN PIKE COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 70,000
Project Cost: 70,000 0 0
Pike 4413 KY-1499 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-1499 IN PIKE COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 150,000
Project Cost: 150,000 0 0
Page 189 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Pike 4414 KY-194 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-194 IN PIKE COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 120,000
Project Cost: 120,000 0 0
Pike 4415 KY-197 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-197 IN PIKE COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 100,000
Project Cost: 100,000 0 0
Pike 4416 KY-197 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-197 IN PIKE COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 60,000
Project Cost: 60,000 0 0
Pike 4417 KY-197 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-197 IN PIKE COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 60,000
Project Cost: 60,000 0 0
Pike 4418 KY-197 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-197 IN PIKE COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 90,000
Project Cost: 90,000 0 0
Page 190 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Pike 4419 KY-197 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-197 IN PIKE COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 20,000
Project Cost: 20,000 0 0
Pike 4421 KY-197 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-197 IN PIKE COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 40,000
Project Cost: 40,000 0 0
Pike 4455 KY-122 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-122 IN PIKE COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 32,000
Project Cost: 32,000 0 0
Pike 4456 KY-122 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-122 IN PIKE COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 93,000
Project Cost: 93,000 0 0
Pike 4457 KY-1469 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-1469 IN PIKE COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 36,000
Project Cost: 36,000 0 0
Page 191 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Pike 4458 KY-1469 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-1469 IN PIKE COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 22,000
Project Cost: 22,000 0 0
Pike 4459 KY-1499 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-1499 IN PIKE COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 45,000
Project Cost: 45,000 0 0
Pike 4460 KY-194 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-194 IN PIKE COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 39,000
Project Cost: 39,000 0 0
Pike 4461 KY-194 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-194 IN PIKE COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 11,000
Project Cost: 11,000 0 0
Pike 4462 KY-194 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-194 IN PIKE COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 17,000
Project Cost: 17,000 0 0
Page 192 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Pike 4463 KY-610 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-610 IN PIKE COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 60,000
Project Cost: 60,000 0 0
Pike 10131 KY-308 BRIDGE PROJECT IN PIKE COUNTY ON (098B00009N) KY-308 AT PL
ROAD FK.ROAD CREEK DN
RW BRX 50,000
UT BRX 76,000
CN BRX 757,000
Project Cost: 0 0 883,000
Pike 10132 KY-1426 BRIDGE PROJECT IN PIKE COUNTY ON (098B00013N) KY-1426 AT PL
BENT BRANCH DN
RW
UT
CN BRX 1,375,883
Project Cost: 0 0 1,375,883
Pike 10139 KY-1441 BRIDGE PROJECT IN PIKE COUNTY ON (098B00235N) KY-1441 AT PL
RACCOON CREEK DN BRX 225,423
RW
UT
CN BRX 1,502,820
Project Cost: 1,728,243 0 0
Pike 10152 US-119 ADDRESS DEFICIENCIES OF BRIDGE ON US 119 OVER Tug Fork PL
(098B00001N) DN BRX 30,000
RW
UT
CN BRX 1,500,000
Project Cost: 0 1,530,000 0
Page 193 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Pike 10154 KY-610 ADDRESS DEFICIENCIES OF BRIDGE ON KY 610 OVER Shelby Creek PL
(098B00071N) DN
RW BRX 75,000
UT BRX 130,000
CN BRX 2,237,153
Project Cost: 2,442,153 0 0
Pike 10156 CR-1766 ADDRESS DEFICIENCIES OF BRIDGE ON Petty Fork OVER Left Fork PL
Long Fork (098C00121N) DN BRZ 106,626
RW
UT
CN BRZ 710,838
Project Cost: 817,464 0 0
Pike 20003 US-119 ADDRESS CONDITION OF US-119 FROM MILEPOINT 12.23 TO PL
MILEPOINT 16.85 DN STP4 184,800
RW
UT
CN STP4 2,125,200
Project Cost: 2,310,000 0 0
Pike 80308 KY-1469 Improve substandard geometrics in the curve near Marshall Branch. PL
(2024CCN) DN
RW SPP 130,000
UT SPP 250,000
CN SPP 1,890,000
Project Cost: 0 380,000 1,890,000
Pike 80309 US-23 Make template changes to improve sight distance, drainage, and PL
ingress/egress through this commercial section of US 23 (2024CCN) DN NH 680,000
RW NH 230,000
UT NH 1,320,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 680,000 1,550,000
Total for Pike county PL
DN 516,849 710,000
RW 3,547,000 130,000 280,000
UT 1,630,000 1,110,000 1,396,000
CN 26,061,011 7,038,000 17,082,883
Total Amounts: 31,754,860 8,988,000 18,758,883
Page 194 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Powell 163.2000 KY-213 IMPROVE SAFETY, UPGRADE GEOMETRICS, AND ADDRESS PL
CAPACITY ISSUES FOR KY 213 FROM KY 615 TO BOTTOM OF DN
MOUNTAIN. (PRIORITY SECTION 2)(2018BOP) (2022CCN) (2024CCR) RW SPP 3,600,000
UT SPP 1,740,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 5,340,000 0
Powell 170 KY-11 Improve safety and traffic operations along KY 11/KY 15 in Stanton PL
from east of Halls Lane to west of Stonegate Drive by widening and DN
providing a two-way left-turn lane. (2024CCN) RW
UT
CN SPP 3,920,000
Project Cost: 0 3,920,000 0
Powell 176 KY-15 Minor widening to improve redundancy of Regional Travel. PL
DN
RW PROT 290,000
UT PROT 280,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 570,000 0
Powell 194 KY-9000 MOUNTAIN PARKWAY AT EXIT 16: INSTALL ROADWAY LIGHTING AS PL
A SAFETY MEASURE DUE TO FLOODING CONCERNS. DN NH 110,000
RW
UT
CN NH 1,000,000
Project Cost: 0 110,000 1,000,000
Powell 210 KY-213 IMPROVE SAFETY AND LEVEL OF SERVICE ON KY-213 IN POWELL PL
COUNTY FROM SONS ROAD TO REED COURT. (2024CCN) DN
RW
UT
CN SPP 3,280,000
Project Cost: 0 0 3,280,000
Page 195 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Powell 4318 KY-82 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-82 IN POWELL COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 32,000
Project Cost: 32,000 0 0
Powell 20005 KY-9000 ADDRESS CONDITION OF Bert T. Combs Mountain Parkway FROM PL
MILEPOINT 19.228 TO MILEPOINT 22.307 DN STP4 270,000
RW
UT
CN STP4 2,645,726
Project Cost: 0 0 2,915,726
Powell 20035 KY-213 ADDRESS CONDITION OF KY-213 FROM MILEPOINT 1.691 TO PL
MILEPOINT 2.244 DN STP4 28,000
RW
UT
CN STP4 322,000
Project Cost: 0 350,000 0
Powell 20042 KY-9000 ADDRESS CONDITION OF Bert T. Combs Mountain Parkway FROM PL
MILEPOINT 22.307 TO MILEPOINT 27.376 DN STP5 200,000
RW
UT
CN STP5 2,000,000
Project Cost: 0 2,200,000 0
Powell 22158 KY-9000 ADDRESS CONDITION OF Bert T. Combs Mountain Parkway FROM PL
MILEPOINT 27.376 TO MILEPOINT 32.787 DN NHPM 410,000
RW
UT
CN NHPM 4,102,360
Project Cost: 0 0 4,512,360
Page 196 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Powell 80250 KY-11 CONSTRUCT A BRIDGE ON KY 11 (CAMPTON RD MP 3.4 TO 3.85) PL
ACROSS THE BERT T. COMBS MOUNTAIN PARKWAY DN
RW SPP 5,000,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 0 5,000,000
Total for Powell county PL
DN 338,000 680,000
RW 3,890,000 5,000,000
UT 2,020,000
CN 32,000 6,242,000 11,028,086
Total Amounts: 32,000 12,490,000 16,708,086
Pulaski 59.5000 KY-80, SOMERSET NORTHERN BYPASS SECTION 3; FROM WEST OF THE PL
PF-9999 BRIDGE OVER US-27 AND THE SOUTHERN RR, E TO KY-39 N OF DN
BROYLES RD. (INCLUDES I-CHNG AT KY-39). (CONST SEQ. 3) RW
(2002BOP)(04KYD)(05KYD) (2024CCN)
UT
CN IF 42,000,000 42,000,000
NH 11,000,000
Project Cost: 0 53,000,000 42,000,000
Pulaski 59.6000 KY-80, Somerset Northern Bypass Section 4; From East of the KY 39 PL
PF-9999 Interchange, to KY 461 / KY 80 Interchange (8-59.25 - BUILD Grant DN
Project)(Congressional KYD Earmark - $45M) RW
(2024CCN)
UT
CN IF 42,000,000
Project Cost: 0 0 42,000,000
Pulaski 59.7000 CO-0, KY-80 SOMERSET NORTHERN BYPASS (I-66) FROM WEST OF THE BRIDGE PL
OVER US-27 TO KY 461/KY 80 INTERCHANGE. (REMAINING DN
ALLOCATED FY 24 CONGRESSIONAL EARMARK KYD FUNDING, RW
INCLUDING REQUIRED 20% STATE MATCHING FUNDS)
UT KYD 1,310,000
CN KYD 54,950,000
Project Cost: 56,260,000 0 0
Page 197 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Pulaski 121 KY-196 HORIZONTAL AND VERTICAL REALIGNMENT OF KY-196 AT WHITE PL
OAK CREEK FROM 1.0 MILE E OF WARNER ROAD TO 0.3 MILE W OF DN SPP 600,000
SIEVERS ROAD.(10CCR)(14CCR) (2024CCN) RW SPP 530,000
UT SPP 520,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 600,000 1,050,000
Pulaski 169 KY-39 IMPROVE SAFETY AND MOBILITY ALONG KY 39 BETWEEN KY 80 PL
AND OAK LEAF LANE. (2020CCR) (2024CCR) DN STP1 710,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 710,000 0
Pulaski 272 US-27 Reduce congestion and improve safety and mobility along US 27 PL
between General Burnside Island and Cumberland River Bridge. DN
(2024CCN) RW NH 6,330,500
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 0 6,330,500
Pulaski 10069 KY-196 BRIDGE PROJECT IN PULASKI COUNTY ON (100B00102N) KY-196 AT PL
LITTLE WHITE OAK CREEK DN BRX 140,588
RW
UT
CN BRX 937,250
Project Cost: 0 0 1,077,838
Pulaski 22366 KY-39 ADDRESS CONDITION OF KY-39 FROM MILEPOINT 6.47 TO MILEPOINT PL
10.673 DN STP5 140,000
RW
UT
CN STP5 1,610,000
Project Cost: 1,750,000 0 0
Page 198 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Pulaski 80104 KY-90 REDUCE CONGESTION AND IMPROVE SAFETY, CAPACITY AND PL
MOBILITY ALONG KY 90 BETWEEN WAYNE COUNTY LINE AND NEW DN SPP 2,500,000
CUMBERLAND RIVER BRIDGE (2020CCN) (2022CCR) (2024CCR) RW SPP 6,300,000
UT SPP 2,270,000
CN
Project Cost: 2,500,000 0 8,570,000
Pulaski 80302 KY-461 Address safety, capacity and access issues along KY-461 from PL
south of Buck Creek extending northerly to Pulaski/Rockcastle Line (as DN SPP 2,976,000
a continuation of 8-59.25). (2024CCN) RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 2,976,000 0
Pulaski 80310 KY-914 Minor widening along KY-914 by adding turning lanes and relocating PL
an existing entrance into adjacent property. (2024CCN) DN SPP 100,000
RW
UT SPP 180,000
CN SPP 1,100,000
Project Cost: 100,000 180,000 1,100,000
Pulaski 80312 KY-3262 Improve geometrics and safety along KY 3262 from Baker Road to PL
approximately 0.5mi northeast of Baker Road (2024CCN) DN SPP 514,800
RW SPP 640,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 514,800 640,000
Pulaski 80350 KY-1642 Improve safety and congestion along KY 1642 at KY 1577 (MP 13.4 PL
-13.7) (2024CCN) DN
RW SPP 1,200,000
UT SPP 1,500,000
CN SPP 3,640,000
Project Cost: 0 2,700,000 3,640,000
Page 199 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Pulaski 80353 US-27 Improve sight distance at the left turn lanes along US 27 at KY 635 PL
traffic light (MP 22.5 -22.8) (2024CCN) DN SPP 100,000
RW
UT SPP 150,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 100,000 150,000
Total for Pulaski county PL
DN 2,740,000 4,900,800 140,588
RW 1,200,000 13,800,500
UT 1,310,000 1,680,000 2,940,000
CN 56,560,000 53,000,000 89,677,250
Total Amounts: 60,610,000 60,780,800 106,558,338
Robertson 8711 KY-616 IMPROVE CURVE ON KY 616 AND IMPROVE ROADWAY FROM THE PL
NEW ROBERTSON COUNTY SCHOOL TO MT OLIVET. (12CCN) DN
(14CCR)(18CCN) (2020CCR) (2022CCR) (2024CCR) RW SPP 530,000
UT SPP 320,000
CN SPP 4,480,000
Project Cost: 0 850,000 4,480,000
Robertson 80312 US-62 IMPROVE THE INTERSECTION OF US 62 AND KY 165 IN MOUNT PL
OLIVET. (2024CCN) DN SPP 390,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 390,000 0
Total for Robertson county PL
DN 390,000
RW 530,000
UT 320,000
CN 4,480,000
Total Amounts: 0 1,240,000 4,480,000
Page 200 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Rockcastle 10071 CR-1086 BRIDGE PROJECT IN ROCKCASTLE COUNTY ON (102C00067N) PL
MARET CEMETERY RD AT ROUND STONE CREEK DN FBP2 136,244
RW
UT
CN FBP2 908,293
Project Cost: 0 1,044,537 0
Rockcastle 22111 I -75 ADDRESS CONDITION OF I-075 FROM MILEPOINT 64.5 (65.22 PL
NON-CARDINAL) TO MILEPOINT 68.78 DN NHPM 530,000
RW
UT
CN NHPM 5,293,808
Project Cost: 0 0 5,823,808
Rockcastle 80303 KY-461 Address capacity and access issues along KY-461 from PL
Pulaski/Rockcastle County Line to KY 1250. (2024CCN) DN SPP 2,527,800
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 0 2,527,800
Rockcastle 80304 KY-461 Address safety, capacity and access issues along KY-461 from KY PL
1250 to US 150. (2024CCN) DN SPP 1,672,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,672,000 0
Rockcastle 80305 US-25 Planning study on US 25 to address Connectivity for future PL SPP 250,000
development in Mt. Vernon on the western side of I-75 between exit DN
59 and exit 62. (2024CCN) RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 250,000 0
Total for Rockcastle county PL 250,000
DN 1,808,244 3,057,800
RW
UT
CN 908,293 5,293,808
Total Amounts: 0 2,966,537 8,351,608
Page 201 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Rowan 204 KY-32 IMPROVE KY-32 FROM PARK HILLS DRIVE TO VIKING DRIVE NORTH. PL
(12CCR)(18CCR) (2020CCR) (2022CCR) (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN HGC 27,460,000
Project Cost: 27,460,000 0 0
Rowan 234 KY-801 Extend KY 801 from its intersection with KY 158 at Sharkey to KY 32 PL SPP 320,000
near the Fleming/Rowan county line. (2024CCR) DN SPP 3,920,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 320,000 3,920,000
Rowan 3029 I -64 Rowan County East & West Bound Renovation located on I-64. PL
(2024BOP) DN
RW
UT
CN NH 5,100,000
Project Cost: 5,100,000 0 0
Rowan 4312 US-60 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON US-60 IN ROWAN COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 10,000
Project Cost: 10,000 0 0
Rowan 4315 US-60 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON US-60 IN ROWAN COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 90,000
Project Cost: 90,000 0 0
Page 202 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Rowan 4319 KY-3319 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-3319 IN ROWAN COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 60,000
Project Cost: 60,000 0 0
Rowan 4320 US-60 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON US-60 IN ROWAN COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 10,000
Project Cost: 10,000 0 0
Rowan 4321 US-60 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON US-60 IN ROWAN COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 40,000
Project Cost: 40,000 0 0
Rowan 8406.1000 KY-377 IMPROVE SAFETY AND CONNECTIVITY AND REDUCE CONGESTION PL
ON KY-377 FROM KY-32 TO JUST SOUTH OF CLEAR FORK ROAD. DN
(2022BOP) (2024CCN) RW
UT
CN SPP 50,760,000
Project Cost: 0 0 50,760,000
Rowan 8406.2000 KY-377 IMPROVE SAFETY AND CONNECTIVITY AND REDUCE CONGESTION PL
ON KY-377 FROM JUST SOUTH OF CLEARK FORK ROAD TO JUST DN
NORTH OF KY 799 (BIG PERRY ROAD). (2024CCN) RW STP2 6,600,000
UT STP2 11,760,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 6,600,000 11,760,000
Page 203 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Rowan 22048 I -64 ADDRESS CONDITION OF I-064 FROM MILEPOINT 134.75 TO PL
MILEPOINT 138.3 DN NHPM 800,000
RW
UT
CN NHPM 8,000,000
Project Cost: 0 8,800,000 0
Rowan 22050 I -64 ADDRESS CONDITION OF I-064 FROM MILEPOINT 147.9 TO MILEPOINT PL
148.665 DN NHPM 230,000
RW
UT
CN NHPM 2,259,115
Project Cost: 0 0 2,489,115
Rowan 80108 CR-1391 WIDEN AND SOFTEN CURVE ON CR 1391 (BRATTON BRANCH RD) AT PL
WALMART (2020CCN) DN SPP 25,000
RW SPP 60,000
UT SPP 80,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 25,000 140,000
Rowan 80307 KY-32 Improve safety and reduce congestion on KY 32 (Flemingsburg Road) PL
between the intersections of CS 1203 (Trademore Drive) and CS1001 DN
(Fraley Drive) and in the vicinity of the I-64 interchange. (2024CCN) RW NH 3,000,000
UT NH 7,540,000
CN NH 15,000,000
Project Cost: 0 10,540,000 15,000,000
Rowan 80308 KY-32 Reduce congestion and improve mobility on KY 32 (Flemingsburg PL
Road) between the intersections with KY 3531 (Viking Drive) and DN SPP 1,820,000
CS1020 (Mabry Drive). (2024CCN) RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,820,000 0
Page 204 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Rowan 80309 KY-32, US-60 Improve safety and reduce congestion at the intersection of US 60 PL
(West Wilkinson Blvd.) and KY 32 (Flemingsburg Road). (2024CCN) DN
RW STP1 440,000
UT STP1 600,000
CN STP1 4,350,000
Project Cost: 0 1,040,000 4,350,000
Total for Rowan county PL 320,000
DN 2,645,000 4,150,000
RW 10,040,000 60,000
UT 8,140,000 11,840,000
CN 32,770,000 8,000,000 72,369,115
Total Amounts: 32,770,000 29,145,000 88,419,115
Russell 156 US-127 Reduce congestion and improve capacity, safety and mobility on US PL
127 between the west bypass of Jamestown to the Cumberland DN
Parkway. See segment 12 in June 1998 Advance (2024CCR) RW NH 5,490,000
UT NH 3,880,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 5,490,000 3,880,000
Russell 10072 KY-379 BRIDGE PROJECT IN RUSSELL COUNTY ON (104B00003N) KY-379 AT PL
CROCUS CREEK DN BRZ 77,042
RW
UT
CN BRZ 513,615
Project Cost: 590,657 0 0
Russell 80250 US-127 IMPROVE CONGESTION AND SAFETY ALONG US 127 AT KY 1381 PL
(VOILS ROAD) AND SK LANE IN RUSSELL SPRINGS (MILEPOINT 17.2 DN SPP 260,000
TO MILEPOINT 17.45) (2022CCN) RW SPP 1,050,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 260,000 1,050,000
Page 205 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Russell 80316 KY-3278 IMPROVE GEOMETRICS ALONG KY 3278. (2024CCN) PL
DN SPP 225,000
RW SPP 200,000
UT SPP 400,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 225,000 600,000
Total for Russell county PL
DN 77,042 485,000
RW 5,490,000 1,250,000
UT 4,280,000
CN 513,615
Total Amounts: 590,657 5,975,000 5,530,000
Scott 10013 CR-1020 BRIDGE PROJECT IN SCOTT COUNTY ON (105R00605N) HINTON RD PL
AT NS (CNO&TP) SYSTEM DN BRZ 263,149
RW
UT
CN BRZ 1,754,325
Project Cost: 0 2,017,474 0
Scott 10059 CR-1206 BRIDGE PROJECTS IN SCOTT AND WOODFORD COUNTIES ON PL
(105B00082N) CANE RUN RD, (120B00024L&R) OVER ELKHORN DN
CREEK, AND (120B00022L&R) OVER US 421 ALONG I-64 RW
UT
CN FBP 3,000,000
Project Cost: 0 0 3,000,000
Scott 20049 I -64 ADDRESS CONDITION OF I-064 FROM MILEPOINT 67.106 TO PL
MILEPOINT 71 DN NHPM 780,000
RW
UT
CN NHPM 7,786,800
Project Cost: 8,566,800 0 0
Page 206 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Scott 22119 I -75 ADDRESS CONDITION OF I-075 FROM MILEPOINT 136.758 TO PL
MILEPOINT 138.424 DN NHPM 490,000
RW
UT
CN NHPM 4,910,000
Project Cost: 0 0 5,400,000
Scott 80102 KY-2906 IMPROVE CAPACITY AND ACCESS ON KY 2906 FROM US 460 TO US PL
62 (2020CCN) (2022CCR) (2024CCR) DN
RW SPP 5,700,000
UT SPP 1,750,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 5,700,000 1,750,000
Scott 80317 US-62 Improve safety and driver expectancy at the intersection of US 62 PL
(Paynes Depot Road), US 421 (Leestown Road), and Weisenberger DN SPP 520,000
Mill Road. (2024CCN) RW SPP 500,000
UT SPP 700,000
CN SPP 3,000,000
Project Cost: 520,000 1,200,000 3,000,000
Scott 80318 PF-9999 Provide a safe and efficient connection between KY 32 (Long Lick PL
Pike) and KY 1143 (Georgetown Bypass). (2024CCN) DN SPP 690,000
RW SPP 650,000
UT SPP 380,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 690,000 1,030,000
Scott 80319 CS-1010, Address safety issues on KY 1962 (Lemon's Mill Road) From Military PL
CS-1115, Street in Georgetown to Lisle Road at I-75. (2024CCN) DN SPP 1,000,000
KY-1962 RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,000,000 0
Total for Scott county PL
DN 1,300,000 1,953,149 490,000
RW 6,200,000 650,000
UT 700,000 2,130,000
CN 7,786,800 1,754,325 10,910,000
Total Amounts: 9,086,800 10,607,474 14,180,000
Page 207 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Shelby 579 I -64 EXPAND TRUCK PARKING AT I-64 EB WELCOME CENTER. PL
DN
RW
UT
CN NH 1,160,000
Project Cost: 1,160,000 0 0
Shelby 8713 US-60 CONSTRUCT A THIRD LANE ON US-60 FROM THE MASONIC HOME TO PL
ROCKET LANE. (12CCN)(14CCR)(2020CCR) (2022CCR) (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN SPP 3,220,000
Project Cost: 0 3,220,000 0
Shelby 8958 KY-55 WIDEN KY 55X FROM TWO TO FIVE LANES FROM US 60 (MP 0.0) PL
NORTH TO KY 43 (MP 1.354).(16CCN) (2024CCN) DN SPP 1,650,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,650,000 0
Shelby 10086 US-60 BRIDGE PROJECT IN SHELBY COUNTY ON (106B00007R) US 60 EB PL
AT CLEAR CREEK DN FBP 598,605
RW
UT
CN FBP 3,990,701
Project Cost: 4,589,306 0 0
Shelby 22029 I -64 ADDRESS CONDITION OF I-064 FROM MILEPOINT 43.77 TO MILEPOINT PL
46.303 DN NHPM 490,000
RW
UT
CN NHPM 4,910,000
Project Cost: 0 0 5,400,000
Page 208 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Shelby 80308 KY-55 ADDRESS ACCESS MANAGEMENT AND SAFETY ISSUES ALONG KY PL SPP 250,000
55X FROM KY 43 TO THE ENTRANCE OF THE SHELBYVILLE BYPASS DN SPP 2,090,000
(KY 55). (2024CCN) RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 250,000 2,090,000 0
Shelby 80312 PF-9999 IMPROVE CONNECTIVITY FROM KY 53 AT THE OLD SEVEN MILE PIKE PL
INTERSECTION TO US 60/ROCKET LANE INTERSECTION. (2024CCN) DN SPP 1,800,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,800,000 0
Shelby 80318 KY-55 ADDRESS SAFETY AND IMPROVE TRAFFIC FLOW WITH PL
OPERATIONAL IMPROVEMENTS ON KY 55 AT OLD BRUNERSTOWN DN SPP 270,000
ROAD. THIS PROJECT WILL CONSIDER A RIGHT-TURN LANE ON SB RW SPP 60,000
KY 55. (2024CCN)
UT SPP 110,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 270,000 170,000
Shelby 80319 KY-55 ADDRESS SAFETY AND IMPROVE TRAFFIC FLOW AT THE KY 55/US PL
60 INTERSECTION IN SHELBYVILLE. PROJECT WILL CONSIDER THE DN SPP 270,000
ADDITION OF A RIGHT-TURN LANE SOUTHBOUND ON KY 55. RW SPP 110,000
(2024CCN)
UT SPP 170,000
CN SPP 670,000
Project Cost: 0 270,000 950,000
Shelby 80326 US-60 CONSTRUCT PEDESTRIAN FACILITIES ON THE NORTH SIDE OF US 60 PL
FROM THE MASONIC HOME TO ROCKET LANE. (2024CCN) DN STP1 470,000
RW STP1 50,000
UT STP1 20,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 470,000 70,000
Total for Shelby county PL 250,000
DN 598,605 6,550,000 490,000
RW 220,000
UT 300,000
CN 5,150,701 3,220,000 5,580,000
Total Amounts: 5,999,306 9,770,000 6,590,000
Page 209 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Simpson 8855 KY-1008 IMPROVE KY-1008 FROM KY-73 TO NORTH FRANKLIN STREET. PL
(14CCN) (2022CCR) (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN HGC 4,600,000
Project Cost: 0 4,600,000 0
Simpson 8856 US-31 IMPROVE US-31W FROM KY-1008 TO KY-621. (14CCN)(16CCR) PL
(2020CCR) (2024CCR) DN
RW SPP 4,200,000
UT SPP 8,880,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 4,200,000 8,880,000
Simpson 80202 KY-100 SUPPLEMENTAL MOA FOR INDUSTRIAL ACCESS ROADS FOR PL
STONE-GIVENS PARK (2022CCN) DN
RW
UT
CN SPP 300,000
Project Cost: 300,000 0 0
Simpson 80310 KY-1171 IMPROVE MOBILITY ALONG KY 1171 (NORTH STREET) FROM THE PL
INTERSECTION WITH US 31W TO THE INTERSECTION WITH KY 1008 IN DN SPP 1,290,000
FRANKLIN. (2024CCN) RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,290,000 0
Simpson 80316 KY-1008 IMPROVE MOBILITY BY COMPLETING THE KY 1008 BYPASS AROUND PL
FRANKLIN. (2024CCN) DN SPP 3,410,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 3,410,000 0
Page 210 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Simpson 80321 KY-585 IMPROVE SAFETY ON KY 585 AT LICK CREEK FROM MP 3.45 TO 3.75. PL
(2024CCN) DN SPP 970,000
RW SPP 650,000
UT SPP 620,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 970,000 1,270,000
Total for Simpson county PL
DN 5,670,000
RW 4,200,000 650,000
UT 9,500,000
CN 300,000 4,600,000
Total Amounts: 300,000 14,470,000 10,150,000
Spencer 8954.2000 KY-155, Improve safety and traffic operations on KY 55 from KY 1169 to KY PL
KY-55 155 and on KY 155 from KY 55 to MP 2.0 (total length 2.71 miles) DN SPP 780,000
(Portion of 5-8954.0). (2024CCN) RW SPP 1,080,000
UT SPP 5,070,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 780,000 6,150,000
Spencer 8954.3000 KY-55 Improve traffic operations on KY 55 from KY 1169 to KY 155 (MP 10.5 PL
- 11.3) (Portion of 5-8954.0). (2024CCN) DN SPP 440,000
RW SPP 210,000
UT SPP 150,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 440,000 360,000
Spencer 8955 KY-44 IMPROVE SAFETY AND ADDRESS GEOMETRIC DEFICIENCIES ALONG PL
KY-44 NEAR DUTCHMAN CREEK ROAD. (16CCN) (2020CCR) DN
(2024CCR) RW SPP 220,000
UT SPP 300,000
CN SPP 3,260,000
Project Cost: 0 520,000 3,260,000
Page 211 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Spencer 10094 KY-44 BRIDGE PROJECT IN SPENCER COUNTY ON (108B00008N) KY 44 AT PL
PLUM CREEK DN BRX 330,450
RW
UT
CN BRX 2,202,998
Project Cost: 0 2,533,448 0
Spencer 80213 KY-55 REDUCE CONGESTION, IMPROVE SAFETY, AND ENHANCE MOBILITY PL
ON KY 55 FROM KY 44 TO INDUSTRIAL DR. (MP 6.610 TO MP 6.838) DN SPP 250,000
(2022CCN) RW
UT SPP 40,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 250,000 40,000
Spencer 80254 KY-44 IMPROVE CAPACITY, RELIEVE CONGESTION, AND IMPROVE SAFETY PL
ALONG KY 44 FROM GOOSE CREEK ROAD (CR 1121) TO OAK TREE DN SPP 8,630,000
WAY (CS 1053) (MILEPOINT 1.202 TO MILEPOINT 7.542) (2022CCN) RW
(2024CCR)
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 8,630,000 0
Spencer 80255 KY-44 IMPROVE CAPACITY, RELIEVE CONGESTION, AND IMPROVE SAFETY PL
ALONG KY 44 FROM COXS LANE (CR 1087) NEAR THE DN SPP 1,770,000
BULLITT/SPENCER CO LINE TO GOOSE CREEK ROAD (CR 1121) RW
(MILEPOINT 0 TO MILEPOINT 1.202). (2022CCN) (2024CCR)
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,770,000 0
Spencer 80256 KY-55 IMPROVE SAFETY AND TRAFFIC OPERATIONS ON KY 55 FROM KY PL
44 IN TAYLORSVILLE TO KY 1169 (NORMANDY ROAD) BY DN SPP 1,720,000
PROVIDING ADDITIONAL TURNING AND PASSING OPPORTUNITIES RW
(2+1 ROAD BY ADDING A TURN LANE THAT CAN SERVE AS AN
UT
ALTERNATING PASSING LANE). (2022CCN) (2024CCR)
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,720,000 0
Page 212 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Spencer 80257 KY-55 IMPROVE SAFETY AND TRAFFIC OPERATIONS ON KY 55 FROM KY PL
155 NEAR ELK CREEK TO KY 148 AT FINCHVILLE. PROJECT LIMITS DN SPP 3,270,000
ARE ON KY 55 IN SPENCER COUNTY FROM KY 155 (TAYLORSVILLE RW
ROAD) AT MP 11.270 TO THE SPENCER/SHELBY COUNTY LINE AT MP
UT
13.566 AND IN SPENCER COUNTY FROM MP 0.00 TO JUST NORTH OF
CN
Project Cost: 0 3,270,000 0
Spencer 80315 KY-44 ADDRESS SAFETY AND GEOMETRIC ISSUES ON KY 44 AT JUNCTION PL
KY 1251 TO CURVE AFTER HUNTER'S TRACE ROAD. (2024CCN) DN SPP 1,020,000
RW SPP 920,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,020,000 920,000
Spencer 80316 KY-155 Improve safety at the intersection of KY 155 and KY PL
3192/Hochstrasser Road (MP 2.4-2.6) (2024CCN) DN SPP 540,000
RW SPP 210,000
UT SPP 110,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 540,000 320,000
Spencer 80327 US-31 IMPROVE SAFETY AT THE US 31E/KY 523 INTERSECTION. (2024CCN) PL
DN STPF 400,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 0 400,000
Spencer 80351 KY-155 Improve intersection of KY 155 and Goebel Road/Hochstrasser Road PL
(MP 0.65 - 0.85). (2024CCN) DN SPP 330,000
RW SPP 160,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 330,000 160,000
Total for Spencer county PL
DN 19,080,450 400,000
RW 220,000 2,580,000
UT 300,000 5,370,000
CN 2,202,998 3,260,000
Total Amounts: 0 21,803,448 11,610,000
Page 213 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Statewide 65.1900 CO-0 BRIDGE REPAIRS ON VARIOUS BRIDGES FOR FY 2026 THROUGH FY PL
2032. (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN BRO 5,000,000 5,000,000 5,000,000
Project Cost: 5,000,000 5,000,000 5,000,000
Statewide 65.2000 CO-0 BRIDGE REPAIRS ON VARIOUS BRIDGES FOR FY 2026 THROUGH FY PL
2032. (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN BRX 2,000,000 2,000,000 1,000,000
Project Cost: 2,000,000 2,000,000 1,000,000
Statewide 65.2100 CO-0 BRIDGE REPAIRS ON VARIOUS OFF SYSTEM BRIDGES FOR FY 2026 PL
THROUGH FY 2032. (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN BRZ 1,000,000 1,000,000 1,000,000
Project Cost: 1,000,000 1,000,000 1,000,000
Statewide 65.2200 CO-0 BRIDGE REPAIRS ON VARIOUS BRIDGES FOR FY 2026-2032. (FBP PL
PROGRAM) (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN FBP 5,000,000 5,000,000 5,000,000
Project Cost: 5,000,000 5,000,000 5,000,000
Statewide 65.2300 CO-0 BRIDGE REPAIRS ON VARIOUS BRIDGES FOR FY 2026-2032. (FBP2 PL
PROGRAM) DN
RW
UT
CN FBP2 2,000,000 2,000,000 2,000,000
Project Cost: 2,000,000 2,000,000 2,000,000
Page 214 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Statewide 66.1900 CO-0 'ITS' AND 'TSMO' ACTIVITIES ON VARIOUS NHS ROUTES IN PL
KENTUCKY FOR FY 2027 THROUGH FY 2032. (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN NH 5,000,000 5,000,000
Project Cost: 0 5,000,000 5,000,000
Statewide 66.2100 CO-0 Transportation Systems Management and Operations (TSMO) activities PL
on various routes for FY-2022 through FY 2028. (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN SPP 2,000,000 2,000,000
Project Cost: 0 2,000,000 2,000,000
Statewide 195.1600 CO-0 STATEWIDE TRANSPORTATION ALTERNATIVES PROGRAM FOR FY PL
2026 THROUGH FY 2032 (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN TAP 12,300,000 12,300,000 12,300,000
Project Cost: 12,300,000 12,300,000 12,300,000
Statewide 219.1800 CO-0 NON-ATTAINMENT AREAS STATEWIDE CMAQ FUNDED PROJECTS PL
FOR FY 2026 THROUGH FY 2032. (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN CM 8,100,000 8,100,000 8,100,000
Project Cost: 8,100,000 8,100,000 8,100,000
Statewide 224.1400 CO-0 PAVEMENT REHAB ON STATE (NON RS) SYSTEM ROUTES IN PL
KENTUCKY FOR FY 2026 THROUGH FY 2032. (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN STP5 5,000,000 5,000,000
Project Cost: 0 5,000,000 5,000,000
Page 215 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Statewide 233 CO-0 INSTALLATION OF HIGH MAST LIGHTING AT THE I-24 REST AREA IN PL
CHRISTIAN COUNTY, KENTUCKY. (2024BOP) DN
RW
UT
CN SPP 1,040,000
Project Cost: 0 1,040,000 0
Statewide 239 CO-0 PROMOTING RESILIENT OPERATIONS FOR TRANSFORMATIVE, PL
EFFICIENT, AND COST SAVING TRANSPORTATION (PROTECT) DN
PROGRAM FORMULA FUNDS. RW
UT
CN PROT 20,000,000 5,000,000
Project Cost: 0 20,000,000 5,000,000
Statewide 244 CO-0 STATEWIDE CARBON REDUCTION PROGRAM. PL
DN
RW
UT
CN CARB 12,520,000 14,600,000 14,600,000
Project Cost: 12,520,000 14,600,000 14,600,000
Statewide 327.1600 CO-0 STATEWIDE BRIDGE INSPECTION FOR FY 2026 THROUGH FY 2032. PL
(2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN BRX 5,000,000 5,000,000 5,000,000
Project Cost: 5,000,000 5,000,000 5,000,000
Statewide 337.1500 CO-0 STATEWIDE I-STATE ROUTES FOR FY 2026 THROUGH FY 2032. PL
(2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN NHPM 5,000,000 5,000,000
Project Cost: 0 5,000,000 5,000,000
Page 216 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Statewide 346.1600 CO-0 STATEWIDE OFF-SYSTEM BRIDGE INSPECTION FOR FY 2026 PL
THROUGH FY 2032. (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN BRZ 3,000,000 3,000,000 3,000,000
Project Cost: 3,000,000 3,000,000 3,000,000
Statewide 352.1600 CO-0 RAILWAY-HIGHWAY CROSSINGS PROGRAM ON VARIOUS ROUTES PL
FOR FY 2026 THROUGH FY 2032. (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN RRP 3,430,000 3,510,000
Project Cost: 3,430,000 3,510,000 0
Statewide 369.1000 CO-0 PAVEMENT REHABILITATION FOR VARIOUS NHS ROUTES IN PL
KENTUCKY FOR FY 2026 THROUGH FY 2032. (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN NHPM 5,000,000 5,000,000
Project Cost: 0 5,000,000 5,000,000
Statewide 388.1000 CO-0 OHIO RIVER BRIDGES FRACTURE CRITICAL FOR FY 2026 THROUGH PL
FY 2032. (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN BRX 4,000,000 4,000,000 4,000,000
Project Cost: 4,000,000 4,000,000 4,000,000
Statewide 391.0600 CO-0 STATEWIDE HIGHWAY PROJECT DESIGN ACTIVITIES FOR FY 2026 PL
THROUGH FY 2032. (2024CCR) DN STPF 1,000,000 1,000,000 1,000,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 1,000,000 1,000,000 1,000,000
Page 217 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Statewide 391.0700 CO-0 STATEWIDE HIGHWAY PROJECT DESIGN ACTIVITIES FOR FY 2022 PL
THROUGH FY 2028. (2024CCR) DN SPP 5,000,000 5,000,000 5,000,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 5,000,000 5,000,000 5,000,000
Statewide 400.0700 CO-0 UPGRADE NAVIGATIONAL LIGHTING FOR BRIDGES OVER MAJOR PL
STREAMS AND WATERWAYS FOR FY 2026 THROUGH FY 2032. DN
(2024CCR) RW
UT
CN BRX 500,000 500,000 500,000
Project Cost: 500,000 500,000 500,000
Statewide 510.0500 CO-0 HONORING BORDER STATES COMMITMENTS FOR EXISTING PL
BRIDGES(CANNOT BE MOVED) FOR FY 2026 THROUGH FY 2032. DN
(2024CCR) RW
UT
CN BRX 2,000,000 2,000,000 2,000,000
Project Cost: 2,000,000 2,000,000 2,000,000
Statewide 511.0400 CO-0 STATEWIDE CORRECTIONS OF ROCK FALL OR EMBANKMENT PL
STABILIZATION FOR FY 2022 THROUGH FY 2028. (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN SPP 1,000,000 1,000,000 1,000,000
Project Cost: 1,000,000 1,000,000 1,000,000
Statewide 514.0100 CO-0 PREVENTATIVE MAINTENANCE FOR BRIDGE STRUCTURES FOR FY PL
2026 THROUGH FY 2032. (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN BRX 2,500,000 2,500,000 2,500,000
Project Cost: 2,500,000 2,500,000 2,500,000
Page 218 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Statewide 518.0100 CO-0 STATEWIDE CORRECTIONS OF ROCKFALL OR EMBANKMENT PL
STABILIZATION ON NH ROUTES FOR FY 2026 THROUGH FY 2032. DN
(2020CCR) (2024CCR) RW
UT
CN NH 5,000,000 5,000,000
Project Cost: 0 5,000,000 5,000,000
Statewide 518.0300 CO-0 STATEWIDE CORRECTIONS OF ROCKFALL OR EMBANKMENT PL
STABILIZATION ON NON NH ROUTES FOR FY 2026 THROUGH FY DN
2032. (2024CCR) RW
UT
CN STPF 5,000,000 5,000,000 5,000,000
Project Cost: 5,000,000 5,000,000 5,000,000
Statewide 600 CO-0 Statewide NHS Rest Area Repairs. (2024CCR) PL
DN
RW
UT
CN NH 5,000,000 5,000,000
Project Cost: 0 5,000,000 5,000,000
Statewide 600.1000 CO-0 STATEWIDE NHS REST AREA / WELCOME CENTERS / WEIGH STATION PL
REPAIRS. (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN SPP 5,000,000 5,000,000 5,000,000
Project Cost: 5,000,000 5,000,000 5,000,000
Statewide 601 CO-0 Additional Parking at NHS Rest Area and Weigh Stations. (2024CCR) PL
DN
RW
UT
CN NH 5,000,000 5,000,000
Project Cost: 0 5,000,000 5,000,000
Page 219 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Statewide 610 CO-0 ADDRESS SAFETY IMPROVEMENT NEEDS FOR STATE-OWNED DAMS PL
CONSTRUCTED TO FACILIATE KENTUCKY'S HIGHWAY SYSTEM. DN
RW
UT
CN SPP 5,000,000 5,000,000
Project Cost: 0 5,000,000 5,000,000
Statewide 611 CO-0 PLANNING FUNDS TO SCOPE PROJECTS FOR CONSIDERATION IN PL SPP 2,500,000 2,500,000
FUTURE HIGHWAY PLANS. DN
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 2,500,000 2,500,000
Statewide 911.0900 CO-0 STATEWIDE SAFETY PROGRAM FOR FY 2026 THROUGH FY 2032. PL
(HSIP) (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN SAF 71,300,000 71,300,000 71,300,000
Project Cost: 71,300,000 71,300,000 71,300,000
Statewide 911.5000 CO-0 STATEWIDE SAFETY FUNDING TO BE USED ALONGSIDE FEDERAL PL
HSIP FUNDING TO ENHANCE ROADWAY SAFETY IN KENTUCKY. DN
(2022CCR) RW
UT
CN SPP 2,500,000 2,500,000 2,500,000
Project Cost: 2,500,000 2,500,000 2,500,000
Statewide 1063.1600 CO-0 STATEWIDE UNDERWATER BRIDGE INSPECTION FOR FY 2026 PL
THROUGH FY 2032. (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN BRX 1,000,000 1,000,000 1,000,000
Project Cost: 1,000,000 1,000,000 1,000,000
Page 220 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Statewide 1071.0800 CO-0 STATEWIDE PROGRAM TO FUND BRIDGE SCOUR PL
COUNTER-MEASURES FOR STATE-MAINTAINED BRIDGES FOR FY DN
2026 THROUGH FY 2032. (2024CCR) RW
UT
CN BRX 3,000,000 3,000,000 3,000,000
Project Cost: 3,000,000 3,000,000 3,000,000
Statewide 1074.0800 CO-0 STATEWIDE BRIDGE REPLACEMENT PROGRAM FOR FY 2026 PL
THROUGH FY 2032. (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN BRX 2,000,000 2,000,000 1,000,000
Project Cost: 2,000,000 2,000,000 1,000,000
Statewide 2700.1400 CO-0 PAVEMENT PREVENTATIVE MAINTENANCE PROGRAM FOR FY 2026 PL
THROUGH FY 2032 STP5 FUNDING. (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN STP5 2,000,000 2,000,000
Project Cost: 0 2,000,000 2,000,000
Statewide 3011.0100 CO-0 AMERICANS WITH DISABILITIES ACT (ADA) TRANSITION PLAN PL
IMPLEMENTATION PROJECTS FY 2026 THROUGH FY 2032. (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN STPF 5,000,000 5,000,000 5,000,000
Project Cost: 5,000,000 5,000,000 5,000,000
Statewide 3022 CO-0 Whitehaven Rest Area Renovation located between Exit 6 and Exit 7 PL
on Interstate 24 in Paducah, KY. (2024BOP) DN
RW
UT
CN NH 980,000
Project Cost: 980,000 0 0
Page 221 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Statewide 8500.1600 CO-0 SCHOOL TURN LANE PROJECTS FOR NEW SCHOOLS FOR FY 2022 PL
THROUGH FY 2028. (2022CCR) (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN SPP 2,500,000 2,500,000 2,500,000
Project Cost: 2,500,000 2,500,000 2,500,000
Statewide 8600 CO-0 Western KY DECEMBER 2021 Tornado Relief Funding POOL FOR THE PL
LAST DOLLAR (UNCOVERED BY FEMA OR INSURANCE) DN
RECONCTRUCTION OF EXISTING ROADS. (2022CCR) (2024CCR)(SEE RW
GRAVES COUNTY 1-220.00 FOR MAYFIELD, KY KYD USDOT RAISE
UT
GRANT PROJECT)
CN SPP 3,000,000 7,000,000
Project Cost: 3,000,000 7,000,000 0
Statewide 8601 CO-0 ADVANCE CONSTRUCTION COMMITMENTS FOR MOUNTAIN PL
PARKWAY EXPANSION; I-65 CENTRAL CORRIDOR; AND OTHER DN
ACTIVE DESIGN/BUILD PROJECTS. RW
UT
CN NH 182,000,000 100,000,000 93,000,000
Project Cost: 182,000,000 100,000,000 93,000,000
Statewide 8602 CO-0 ADVANCE CONSTRUCTION CONTRACTS FOR KY 536 IN NORTHERN PL
KENTUCKY, KY 32 IN MOREHEAD, AND OTHER ACTIVE STPF DN
PROJECTS PREVIOUSLY AUTHORIZED. RW
UT
CN STPF 6,000,000 21,000,000
Project Cost: 0 6,000,000 21,000,000
Statewide 9068.6100 CO-0 US 68/KY 80 LAKE BARKLEY AND KENTUCKY LAKE GARVEE BOND PL
DEBT SERVICE FOR FY 2027. (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN GAR 6,000,000
Project Cost: 0 6,000,000 0
Page 222 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Statewide 9068.6600 CO-0 US 68/KY 80 LAKE BARKLEY AND KENTUCKY LAKE GARVEE BOND PL
DEBT SERVICE (STP) FOR FY 2026 THROUGH FY 2032. (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN GAR 6,000,000
Project Cost: 0 6,000,000 0
Statewide 9660 CO-0 GARVEE BOND DEBT SERVICE PAYMENTS FOR THE BRENT SPENCE PL
BRIDGE PROJECT AND THE I-69 ORX BRIDGE PROJECT. DN
RW
UT
CN GAR 29,000,000 38,600,000
Project Cost: 0 29,000,000 38,600,000
Statewide 10003 CO-0 ADDRESS CIF (CONSTRAINT INDUCED FATIGUE) DETAILS ON PL
VARIOUS BRIDGES STATEWIDE DN
RW
UT
CN FBP 4,000,000
Project Cost: 0 0 4,000,000
Total for Statewide county PL 2,500,000 2,500,000
DN 6,000,000 6,000,000 6,000,000
RW
UT
CN 352,630,000 387,850,000 368,900,000
Total Amounts: 358,630,000 396,350,000 377,400,000
Taylor 443 KY-70 IMPROVE SAFETY, ACCESS, GEOMETRICS AND DRAINAGE ON KY-70 PL
IN CAMPBELLSVILLE FROM US-68 TO COUNTRY VIEW COURT DN SPP 1,680,000
(CS-1305) RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,680,000 0
Page 223 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Taylor 80154.3000KY-210 ADDRESS SAFETY ON KY 210 FROM JUST EAST OF CORINTH PL
CHURCH (MP0.60) TO KY 883 (MP14.20) IN TAYLOR COUNTY. DN SPP 3,120,000
(2024CCN) RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 3,120,000 0
Taylor 80257 KY-3350, EXTEND KY 3350 (CAMPBELLSVILLE BYPASS) FROM ky 289 TO US PL
PF-9999 68 ON THE EAST SIDE OF CAMPBELLSVILLE. (2022CCN) (2024CCR) DN SPP 1,560,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,560,000 0
Total for Taylor county PL
DN 6,360,000
RW
UT
CN
Total Amounts: 0 6,360,000 0
Todd 10048 KY-848 BRIDGE PROJECT IN TODD COUNTY ON (110B00031N) KY-848 AT PL
SPRING CREEK DN BRX 130,320
RW
UT
CN BRX 868,802
Project Cost: 0 0 999,122
Total for Todd county PL
DN 130,320
RW
UT
CN 868,802
Total Amounts: 0 0 999,122
Page 224 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Trigg 147 KY-139 Correct geometric deficiencies and address safety, mobility and PL
access issues along KY 139 from the intersection of KY 124 north of DN SPP 1,620,000
Cadiz to the I-24 Interchange in Caldwell Co (EMP 0.348) (2024CCN) RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,620,000 0
Trigg 10182 KY-272 BRIDGE PROJECT IN TRIGG COUNTY ON (111B00009N) KY-272 AT PL
BURGE CREEK DN BRZ 269,786
RW
UT
CN BRZ 1,798,571
Project Cost: 2,068,357 0 0
Trigg 80306 CR-1005 ADDRESS SAFETY CONCERNS ON GLENWOOD RD (CR-1005) FROM PL
KY 272 TO US 68/80 FROM MP 0.0 TO MP 2.1 (2024CCN) DN SPP 780,000
RW SPP 750,000
UT SPP 500,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 780,000 1,250,000
Trigg 80307 CR-1014 ADDRESS SAFETY CONCERNS ON KINGS CHAPEL RD (CR-1004) PL
FROM KY 272 TO US 68/80 FROM MP 0.0 TO MP 3.7 (2024CCN) DN SPP 1,560,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,560,000 0
Trigg 80318 KY-276 IMPROVE KY 276 FROM KY139 (MP 0.00) TO US68 (MP 14.121). THIS PL
NARROW 2 LANE ROAD SERVES AS A BY-PASS WHEN I-24 IS DN SPP 3,800,000
SHUTDOWN NEAR CADIZ, KY. CORRIDOR IMPROVEMENTS, CORRECT RW
GEOMETRIC DEFICIENCIES, ADDRESS SAFETY. (2024CCN)
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 3,800,000 0
Total for Trigg county PL
DN 269,786 7,760,000
RW 750,000
UT 500,000
CN 1,798,571
Total Amounts: 2,068,357 7,760,000 1,250,000
Page 225 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Trimble 905 US-421 ADDRESS SAFETY ISSUES AND ACCESS AT THE INTERSECTION OF PL
US-421/KY-1226 AT MP 11.5. (12CCR) (2020CCR) (2024CCR) DN SPP 350,000
RW SPP 830,000
UT SPP 640,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 350,000 1,470,000
Trimble 22100 I -71 ADDRESS CONDITION OF I-071 FROM MILEPOINT 38.086 TO PL
MILEPOINT 38.808 DN NHPM 380,000
RW
UT
CN NHPM 3,780,000
Project Cost: 4,160,000 0 0
Trimble 80309 KY-36 IMPROVE SAFETY, TRUCK MOBILITY, AND ADDRESS GEOMETRIC PL
DEFICIENCIES ALONG KY 36 FROM US 421 TO 250 FEET EAST OF DN SPP 500,000
SCHOOL HOLLOW ROAD IN MILTON. (2024CCN) RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 500,000 0
Trimble 80337 US-421 CONSTRUCT PEDESTRIAN FACILITIES ALONG US 421 FROM PL
CUTSHAW LANE TO TRIMBLE COUNTY HIGH SCHOOL/KY 625 AND DN SPP 430,000
ALONG KY 625 TO BEDFORD ELEMENTARY SCHOOL (TOTAL 0.983 RW SPP 110,000
MI.) (2024CCN)
UT SPP 70,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 430,000 180,000
Total for Trimble county PL
DN 380,000 1,280,000
RW 940,000
UT 710,000
CN 3,780,000
Total Amounts: 4,160,000 1,280,000 1,650,000
Page 226 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Union 80202 US-60 Address safety and service concerns of US-60 from the KY-950 to PL
KY-492. (2022CCN) DN
RW SPP 3,680,000
UT SPP 8,320,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 3,680,000 8,320,000
Union 80203 KY-56 Address the service, safety and condition of KY 56 from Morganfield PL
to KY 141. (2022CCN) (2024CCR) DN
RW SPP 3,680,000
UT SPP 3,800,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 3,680,000 3,800,000
Union 80314 US-60 Reconstruct US 60 from Waverly to Corydon (2024CCN) PL
DN SPP 840,000
RW SPP 2,000,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 840,000 2,000,000
Union 80315 US-60 Reconstruct US 60 from the Morganfield Bypass to Waverly. PL
(2024CCN) DN SPP 1,150,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,150,000 0
Total for Union county PL
DN 1,990,000
RW 7,360,000 2,000,000
UT 12,120,000
CN
Total Amounts: 0 9,350,000 14,120,000
Page 227 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Warren 20 I -65 COMPLETE I65/US68 (GLASGOW ROAD)DIAMOND INTERCHANGE BY PL
ADDING NORTHBOUND ON-RAMP AND SOUTHBOUND OFF-RAMP. DN
(2024CCR) RW NH 530,000
UT NH 1,655,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 0 2,185,000
Warren 21 I -65 NEW I-65 INTERCHANGE IN SOUTHERN WARREN COUNTY NEAR PL
WOODBURN. (2024CCR) DN SPP 2,000,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 0 2,000,000
Warren 110.4000 KY-185 IMPROVE KY 185 FROM 0.32 MILES SOUTH OF THE AUSTIN RAYMER PL
ROAD TO 0.08 MILES SOUTH OF THE BRIDGE OVER IVY CREEK. DN
(2018BOP) (2022CCR) RW SPP 800,000
UT SPP 680,000
CN SPP 10,150,000
Project Cost: 0 1,480,000 10,150,000
Warren 182 KY-622 RECONSTRUCT KY 622 (PLANO RD) TO ELIMINATE TWO PL
RIGHT-ANGLE CURVES. (2022CCR) (2024CCR) DN
RW SPP 2,880,000
UT SPP 2,720,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 5,600,000 0
Warren 212 US-31 CONSTRUCT A DOUBLE CROSSOVER DIAMOND (DCD) ON US-31W PL
AT THE I-165 INTERCHANGE IN BOWLING GREEN. DN STP1 1,500,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,500,000 0
Page 228 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Warren 8818 KY-884 THREE SPRINGS ROAD EXTENSION FROM FLEALAND TO THE PL
NATCHER PARKWAY INCLUDING BRIDGE OVER PARKWAY. (14CCN) DN
(18CCN) (2020CCR) (2022CCR) (2024CCR) RW
UT
CN HGC 11,780,000
Project Cost: 11,780,000 0 0
Warren 8853 US-31 WIDEN US-31W FROM WARREN/SIMPSON COUNTY LINE TO PL
BUCHANON PARK. (14CCN) (2020CCN) (2022CCR) (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN HGC 18,720,000
Project Cost: 0 18,720,000 0
Warren 8854 KY-234 MAJOR WIDENING/RECONSTRUCTION OF CEMETERY ROAD (KY-234) PL
FROM FOUNTAIN TRACE TO ROGER PORTER ROAD (MP 7.878 TO MP DN
9.625).(14CCN) (2020CCN) (2022CCR) (2024CCR) RW SPP 5,400,000
UT SPP 4,800,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 10,200,000 0
Warren 8857 US-31 IMPROVE US-31W FROM CAMPBELL LANE (US-231) TO UNIVERSITY PL
BOULEVARD (US-231X). (14CCN)(16CCR)(18CCR) (2020CCR) DN
(2022CCR) (2024CCR) RW
UT
CN SPP 4,820,000
Project Cost: 0 4,820,000 0
Warren 8904.1000 US-31 WIDEN US 31W FROM PARK AVENUE TO FAIRVIEW AVENUE MP PL
13.7-14.25. (18CCN) (2020CCR) (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN HGC 5,880,000
Project Cost: 5,880,000 0 0
Page 229 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Warren 10053 CR-1388 BRIDGE PROJECT IN WARREN COUNTY ON (114C00016N) PL
GREENCASTLE RD AT TAYLOR BRANCH DN BRZ 157,458
RW
UT
CN BRZ 1,049,720
Project Cost: 1,207,178 0 0
Warren 80051 KY-3225 SAFETY IMPROVEMENTS AND REHABILITATION ON KY-3225. KEEP PL
EXISTING FOOTPRINT BY REPLACING CURBLINE IN SAME LOCATION DN
FROM MP 0 TO MP 1(18CCN) (2022CCR) RW SPP 1,420,000
UT SPP 130,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,420,000 130,000
Warren 80052 KY-234 WIDEN KY-234 FROM MP 11.9 TO 12.4. IMPROVEMENTS MAY PL
INCLUDE A ROUNDABOUT, TURN LANE, AND A SIGNAL AT HAMPTON DN
DR. (18CCN) (2022CCR) (2024CCR) RW
UT
CN SPP 1,260,000
Project Cost: 0 1,260,000 0
Warren 80201 CR-1704, Reduce congestion and increase safety on Cave Mill Road/Dishman PL
CS-1432, Lane from the end of the three-lane section near Raintree Drive (MP DN
CS-2281 0.570) just east of Grider Pond Road. (2022CCN) (2024CCR) RW SPP 6,830,000
UT SPP 6,450,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 6,830,000 6,450,000
Warren 80203 US-31 Transpark: Improve mobility and reduce congestion on US-31W from PL
Mizpah Road to Freeport Road (2022CCN) (2024CCR) DN
RW
UT
CN SPP 4,630,000
Project Cost: 0 4,630,000 0
Page 230 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Warren 80214 KY-101 Construct a two-lane roundabout at the intersection of KY 101 and the PL
I-65 southbound entrance and exit ramps in Smiths Grove. Widen the DN
existing I-65 southbound exit ramp to two lanes and extend the RW SPP 2,370,000
beginning point if the ramp approximately five-hundred to
UT SPP 2,710,000
one-thousand feet north. Widen approximately five hundred feet of
CN SPP 5,176,000
Project Cost: 0 5,080,000 5,176,000
Warren 80301 CS-1334 MINOR WIDENING OF CS-1344/CR1235 (SMALLHOUSE RD) FROM PL
ELROD RD TO US 231 (CAMPBELL LANE). SCOPE INCLUDES DN SPP 1,940,000
PEDESTRIAN AND BICYCLE ACCOMMODATIONS, INTERSECTION RW SPP 6,500,000
IMPROVEMENTS, CONTINUOUS CENTER TURN LANE. (2024CCN)
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,940,000 6,500,000
Warren 80302 US-31 IMPROVE SAFETY AND MOBILITY ON US 31W FROM FREEPORT PL
ROAD TO KY 101. (2024CCN) DN SPP 1,940,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,940,000 0
Warren 80304 KY-101 IMPROVE SAFETY AND MOBILITY ON KY 101 BETWEEN THE ALLEN PL
COUNTY LINE AND I 65. (2024CCN) DN SPP 970,000
RW SPP 1,630,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 970,000 1,630,000
Warren 80305 KY-622 IMPROVE SAFETY AND MOBILITY ON KY 622 FROM I 165 TO US 231. PL
(2024CCN) DN SPP 1,290,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,290,000 0
Page 231 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Warren 80307 US-31 IMPROVE SAFETY AND MOBILITY ON US 31W FROM KY 3225 TO KY PL
957, INCLUDING THE RECONSTRUCTION OF THE INTERCHANGE WITH DN NH 1,940,000
KY 446. (2024CCN) RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 0 1,940,000
Warren 80311 US-31 CONSTRUCT DUAL-LANE ROUNDABOUT AT BROADWAY AVE AND PL
US 31W BYPASS. (2024CCN) DN STP1 3,120,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 3,120,000 0 0
Warren 80322 I -65 IMPROVE SAFETY AND MOBILITY ON KY 234 AT I 65, INCLUDING THE PL
RECONSTRUCTION OF THE INTERCHANGE. (2024CCN) DN NH 1,940,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 0 1,940,000
Warren 80326 PF-9999 SCOPING STUDY FOR OUTER BELTLINE EXTENDING KY 3145 TO PL
NORTHERN WARREN COUNTY. (2024CCN) DN SPP 15,000,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 15,000,000 0
Warren 80327 US-68 MAJOR WIDENING OF 68X (RUSSELLVILLE RD) INCLUDING PL
CONSTRUCTION OF ROUNDABOUTS AT INTERSECTIONS WITH DN SPP 2,600,000
MORGANTOWN RD AND UNIVERSITY BLVD. SCOPE INCLUDES RW SPP 3,900,000
RECONSTRUCTION OF CSX OVERPASS AND PEDESTRIAN AND
UT
BICYCLE ACCOMMODATIONS NEAR WKU CAMPUS. (2024CCN)
CN
Project Cost: 0 2,600,000 3,900,000
Page 232 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Warren 80328 CR-1240 CONSTRUCT NEW INTERCHANGE ON I-165 (NATCHER EXPRESSWAY) PL
AT ELROD ROAD. INCLUDES NEW CONSTRUCTION FOR SEGMENTS DN SPP 1,300,000
OF ELROD ROAD AND MINOR WIDENING OF SMALLHOUSE ROAD. RW
APPROXIMATELY 5 MILES OF ROADWAY IMPROVEMENTS TO
UT
PROVIDE CONNECTIONS FROM NEW INTERCHANGE TO US 31W, KY
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,300,000 0
Total for Warren county PL
DN 3,277,458 26,540,000 5,880,000
RW 19,700,000 12,560,000
UT 10,910,000 8,235,000
CN 18,709,720 29,430,000 15,326,000
Total Amounts: 21,987,178 86,580,000 42,001,000
Washington 164.2000 KY-555 IMPROVE MOBILITY ON THE KY 555 HEARTLAND PARKWAY PL
CORRIDOR FROM KY 53 TO BLUEGRASS PARKWAY (2022CCN) DN
(2024CCR) RW
UT NH 4,500,000
CN NH 19,440,000
Project Cost: 4,500,000 19,440,000 0
Washington 396.3000 US-150 ADDRESS SAFETY, MOBILITY, AND GEOMETRIC ISSUES ALONG US PL
150 IN WASHINGTON COUNTY FROM 0.7 MILES EAST OF GRUNDY DN STPF 500,000
HOME ROAD (MILEPOINT 2.50) TO US 150X (MP 6.557) AT THE OLD RW
ST. CATHERINE'S COLLEGE. (2016BOP) (2022CCN) (2024CCR)
UT STPF 1,500,000
CN
Project Cost: 2,000,000 0 0
Washington 20042 KY-528 ADDRESS CONDITION OF KY-528 FROM MILEPOINT 1.4 TO MILEPOINT PL
1.8 DN STP4 16,250
RW
UT
CN STP4 308,750
Project Cost: 325,000 0 0
Page 233 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Washington 80350 CR-1031 Replacement of an existing metal truss bridge that has been down PL
rated by KYDOT to 5-tons at MP 1.983 on Sulphur Lick Road (CR DN FBP2 154,927
1031). RW
UT
CN FBP2 1,032,850
Project Cost: 0 0 1,187,777
Total for Washington county PL
DN 516,250 154,927
RW
UT 6,000,000
CN 308,750 19,440,000 1,032,850
Total Amounts: 6,825,000 19,440,000 1,187,777
Wayne 80005 KY-1275 IMPROVE CURVE ON KY 1275 AT KY 833/ROGERS GROVE ROAD PL
AND RESURFACE FROM KY 1275 FROM BELL LANE TO KY DN SPP 100,000
833/ROGERS GROVE ROAD(18CCN) (2020CCR) (2024CCR) RW SPP 1,000,000
UT SPP 60,000
CN SPP 2,000,000
Project Cost: 100,000 1,060,000 2,000,000
Wayne 80006 KY-1275 Reduce congestion and improve safety, capacity, and mobility along PL
KY 1275, including sidewalks, from KY 90 to Bell Lane. (18CCN) DN
(2020CCR) (2022CCR) (2024CCR) RW STP2 500,000
UT
CN STP2 3,000,000
Project Cost: 3,500,000 0 0
Wayne 80105 KY-90 REDUCE CONGESTION AND IMPROVES SAFETY, CAPACITY AND PL
MOBILITY OF KY 90 BETWEEN KY 90X/KY 1275 AND KY 3106 DN
(2020CCN) (2022CCR) (2024CCR) RW SPP 5,000,000
UT SPP 2,400,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 5,000,000 2,400,000
Page 234 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Wayne 80108 KY-90, KY-92 ADDRESS SAFETY, MOBILITY, AND CONNECTIVITY BY RELOCATING PL
ALONG KY 92 IN MONTICELLO BETWEEN LOCUST ST AND ELK DN
SPRINGS CREEK RD (2020CCN) (2022CCR) (2024CCR) RW SPP 1,166,000
UT SPP 874,500
CN SPP 4,860,000
Project Cost: 0 2,040,500 4,860,000
Wayne 80307 KY-90 Reduce congestion and improve safety along KY 90 from 0.284 mile PL
West of KY 92 to 0.084 mile West of KY 92. (2024CCN) DN SPP 150,000
RW SPP 200,000
UT SPP 240,000
CN SPP 690,000
Project Cost: 0 590,000 690,000
Wayne 80308 KY-1765 Improve safety and mobility along KY 1765 between KY 1275 and end PL SPP 200,000
of state maintenance near Conley Bottom boat dock. (2024CCN) DN SPP 630,000
RW SPP 3,520,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 200,000 630,000 3,520,000
Wayne 80309 KY-90 MINOR WIDENING BY ADDING OFFSET LEFT TURNING LANES INTO KY PL
1568 AND FRAZER CHAPEL ROAD. (2024CCN) DN SPP 200,000
RW SPP 180,000
UT SPP 240,000
CN SPP 1,040,000
Project Cost: 200,000 420,000 1,040,000
Wayne 80314 KY-92 IMPROVE VERTICAL GEOMETRICS ALONG KY 92 NEAR KY 789 TO PL
IMPROVE SIGHT DISTANCE. ADD TURNING LANES AND MINOR DN SPP 1,360,000
WIDENING FROM ALONG KY 92 FROM 789 TO KY 90. (2024CCN) RW SPP 2,150,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,360,000 2,150,000
Page 235 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Wayne 80315 CR-1127 BRIDGE REPLACEMENT OVER LITTLE SOUTH FORK ALONG BALDY PL
ROAD (CR 1127), DN FBP2 164,487
RW
UT
CN FBP2 1,096,582
Project Cost: 0 0 1,261,069
Total for Wayne county PL 200,000
DN 300,000 2,140,000 164,487
RW 500,000 7,546,000 5,670,000
UT 1,414,500 2,400,000
CN 3,000,000 9,686,582
Total Amounts: 4,000,000 11,100,500 17,921,069
Webster 228 KY-138 RECONSTRUCT BETWEEN KY 120 AND RR BRIDGE AT SLAUGHTERS PL
TO ALLEVIATE FLOODING. (12CCR)(18CCN) (2020CCR) (2022CCR) DN SPP 240,000
(2024CCR) RW SPP 250,000
UT SPP 380,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 240,000 630,000
Webster 22091 I -69 ADDRESS CONDITION OF I-069 FROM MILEPOINT 133.686 TO PL
MILEPOINT 134.982 DN NHPM 160,000
RW
UT
CN NHPM 1,558,266
Project Cost: 0 1,718,266 0
Webster 80316 KY-630 Address service concerns of KY 630 from KY 132 in Dixon to the PL
Hopkins County Line (2024CCN) DN SPP 760,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 760,000 0
Page 236 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Total for Webster county PL
DN 1,160,000
RW 250,000
UT 380,000
CN 1,558,266
Total Amounts: 0 2,718,266 630,000
Whitley 4328 KY-312 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-312 IN WHITLEY COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 10,000
Project Cost: 10,000 0 0
Whitley 4337 KY-727 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-727 IN WHITLEY COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 20,000
Project Cost: 20,000 0 0
Whitley 4363 KY-836 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-836 IN WHITLEY COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 20,000
Project Cost: 20,000 0 0
Whitley 4389 KY-204 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-204 IN WHITLEY COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 10,000
Project Cost: 10,000 0 0
Page 237 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Whitley 4390 KY-26 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-26 IN WHITLEY COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 10,000
Project Cost: 10,000 0 0
Whitley 4391 KY-478 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-478 IN WHITLEY COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 60,000
Project Cost: 60,000 0 0
Whitley 4392 KY-856 INSTALL GUARDRAIL ON KY-856 IN WHITLEY COUNTY PL
DN
RW
UT
CN GR 20,000
Project Cost: 20,000 0 0
Whitley 8954 PF-9999 CONSTRUCT A NEW ENTRANCE TO THE UNIVERSITY OF THE PL
CUMBERLANDS FROM SOUTH 2ND ST UP THE HILL TO TIE INTO DN SPP 410,000
HUTTON WAY. (16CCN) (2024CCN) RW
UT SPP 70,000
CN SPP 2,180,000
Project Cost: 0 410,000 2,250,000
Whitley 80264 KY-92 RECONFIGURE EXISTING INTERSECTION OF KY 92 AND PENNY LANE PL
TO IMPROVE SAFETY ALONG AT INTERSECTION. CONSTRUCT NEW DN
CONNECTOR ROAD BETWEEN KY 92 AND PENNY LANE. RW
RECONFIGURE TRAFFIC OPERATION ALONG PENNY LANE BETWEEN
UT
KY 92 AND NEW CONNECTOR ROAD (2022CCN) (2024CCR)
CN SPP 2,000,000
Project Cost: 0 0 2,000,000
Page 238 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Whitley 80307 CR-1412 Resurfacing of High Top Road (2024CCN) PL
DN
RW
UT
CN SPP 380,000
Project Cost: 0 380,000 0
Whitley 80308 CS-1132 Widen existing South 2nd street to improve geometric deficiencies PL
along route (2024CCN) DN SPP 1,040,000
RW SPP 3,500,000
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 1,040,000 3,500,000
Whitley 80310 US-25 Improve safety by lowering vertical crest on US25W and realigning PL
High Top Road intersection with US25W (2024CCN) DN
RW SPP 210,000
UT SPP 250,000
CN SPP 400,000
Project Cost: 0 460,000 400,000
Whitley 80351 CS-2000 Develop and evaluate potential intersection alternatives (including a PL
roundabout) to improve traffic flow at the intersection of Arena Drive DN
(CS 2000) and Corbin Center Drive. (2024CCN) RW SPP 110,000
UT SPP 260,000
CN SPP 1,500,000
Project Cost: 0 370,000 1,500,000
Whitley 80353 I -75 Widen I-75 from MP 19.2 in Whitley County to MP 23.5 South of Corbin PL
(2024CCN) DN NH 2,600,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 0 2,600,000
Total for Whitley county PL
DN 1,450,000 2,600,000
RW 320,000 3,500,000
UT 510,000 70,000
CN 150,000 380,000 6,080,000
Total Amounts: 150,000 2,660,000 12,250,000
Page 239 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Wolfe 177 KY-15 Minor widening to improve redundancy of Regional travel. (2024CCR) PL
DN
RW PROT 290,000
UT PROT 560,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 850,000 0
Wolfe 80352 KY-715 Reconstruct KY 715 from intersection with KY 11 (0.0) to the PL
intersection with KY 15 (MP 5.765). (2024CCN) DN SPP 2,600,000
RW
UT
CN
Project Cost: 0 0 2,600,000
Total for Wolfe county PL
DN 2,600,000
RW 290,000
UT 560,000
CN
Total Amounts: 0 850,000 2,600,000
Woodford 117 US-60 IMPROVE US 60 (VERSAILLES ROAD) FROM THE BLUEGRASS PL
PARKWAY/HUNTERTOWN PIKE TO PISGAH PIKE. DN
RW NH 1,070,000
UT NH 2,340,000
CN NH 6,910,000
Project Cost: 1,070,000 2,340,000 6,910,000
Woodford 8905 US-60 ACCESS MANAGEMENT IMPROVEMENTS ON US 60 FROM LEXINGTON PL
ROAD AT WOODFORD FEED TO MARSAILLES DRIVE (MP 9.38 TO MP DN
9.70).(16CCN)(18CCN) (2022CCR) (2024CCR) RW
UT SPP 800,000
CN SPP 910,000
Project Cost: 800,000 0 910,000
Page 240 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Woodford 20048 I -64 ADDRESS CONDITION OF I-064 FROM MILEPOINT 64.856 TO PL
MILEPOINT 67.106 DN NHPM 250,000
RW
UT
CN NHPM 2,472,500
Project Cost: 2,722,500 0 0
Woodford 22033 I -64 ADDRESS CONDITION OF I-064 FROM MILEPOINT 59.431 TO PL
MILEPOINT 64.856 DN NHPM 3,190,000
RW
UT
CN NHPM 31,930,000
Project Cost: 0 0 35,120,000
Woodford 80200 KY-1659 Reconstruct McCracken Pike (KY-1659) on a new horizontal alignment PL
to minimize pedestrian and vehicle conflicts near Woodford Reserve DN
Distillery (ROW to be provided by County) (2022CCN) (2024CCR) RW
UT SPP 330,000
CN SPP 1,660,000
Project Cost: 330,000 1,660,000 0
Woodford 80252 US-62 RECONSTRUCT INTERSECTION AT US 62 (ROSE HILL AVE & TYRONE PL
PK) AND KY 1964 (CLIFTON RD) IN VERSAILLES (2022CCN) DN SPP 370,000
RW SPP 500,000
UT SPP 1,000,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 370,000 1,500,000
Woodford 80320 KY-341 Improve safety and mobility on KY 341 beginning at I-64 to PL
approximately 0.8 miles north. (2024CCN) DN SPP 650,000
RW SPP 630,000
UT SPP 780,000
CN
Project Cost: 650,000 0 1,410,000
Page 241 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
County Item No. Route Description Phase Fund FY2026 FY2027 FY2028
Woodford 80353 US-60 Additional turn lanes and road improvement to US 60 at MP 6.1 for PL
entrance to Livestock Innovation Center at UK (2024CCN) DN SPP 220,000
RW
UT
CN SPP 1,150,000
Project Cost: 0 220,000 1,150,000
Woodford 80357 US-60 Safety improvements on US 60X from Main Street to Maple Street in PL
Versailles (MP 0.940-1.234). (2024CCN) DN SPP 275,000
RW
UT SPP 6,600,000
CN
Project Cost: 0 275,000 6,600,000
Total for Woodford county PL
DN 900,000 865,000 3,190,000
RW 1,070,000 1,130,000
UT 1,130,000 2,340,000 8,380,000
CN 2,472,500 1,660,000 40,900,000
Total Amounts: 5,572,500 4,865,000 53,600,000
Page 242 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
Biennium Fund Summary
Fund Description FY 2027 FY 2028 Total
APD APD 7,320,000 61,000,000 68,320,000
BRO BRO 103,656,111 111,331,706 214,987,817
BRO2 BRO2 30,865,000 3,005,000 33,870,000
BRX BRX 84,197,786 100,124,826 184,322,612
BRZ BRZ 19,219,492 19,290,606 38,510,098
CARB CARB 14,600,000 14,600,000 29,200,000
CM CM 8,100,000 8,100,000 16,200,000
FBP FBP 100,066,318 106,215,370 206,281,688
FBP2 FBP2 12,795,333 18,083,063 30,878,396
GAR GAR 41,000,000 38,600,000 79,600,000
GR GR 0 0 0
HGC HGC 118,725,000 59,010,000 177,735,000
IF IF 241,960,000 84,000,000 325,960,000
KYD KYD 27,200,000 0 27,200,000
NH NH 375,680,000 402,468,500 778,148,500
NHPM NHPM 82,493,977 201,729,347 284,223,324
PROT PROT 35,050,000 12,000,000 47,050,000
RRP RRP 3,510,000 0 3,510,000
RRS RRS 710,000 5,300,000 6,010,000
SAF SAF 71,300,000 71,300,000 142,600,000
SAH SAH 1,800,000 1,800,000 3,600,000
SGF SGF 125,000,000 0 125,000,000
SLO SLO 26,800,000 26,800,000 53,600,000
SLX SLX 7,800,000 7,800,000 15,600,000
SNK SNK 8,600,000 8,600,000 17,200,000
SPP SPP 1,149,243,446 1,396,448,800 2,545,692,246
STP1 STP1 27,790,000 28,300,000 56,090,000
STP2 STP2 48,010,000 48,910,000 96,920,000
STP3 STP3 8,130,000 6,000,000 14,130,000
STP4 STP4 7,640,000 4,915,726 12,555,726
STP5 STP5 21,120,910 13,050,000 34,170,910
STPF STPF 85,858,000 87,190,000 173,048,000
TAP TAP 12,300,000 12,300,000 24,600,000
Total Amount
2,908,541,373 2,958,272,944 5,866,814,317
Page 243 of 244

2026-2028 BIENNIAL HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION PLAN
Fund Summary
Fund Description FY 2026 FY 2027 FY 2028 Total
APD APD 1,560,000 7,320,000 61,000,000 69,880,000
BRO BRO 75,042,195 103,656,111 111,331,706 290,030,012
BRO2 BRO2 4,000,000 30,865,000 3,005,000 37,870,000
BRX BRX 79,037,858 84,197,786 100,124,826 263,360,470
BRZ BRZ 18,371,816 19,219,492 19,290,606 56,881,914
CARB CARB 14,600,000 14,600,000 14,600,000 43,800,000
CM CM 8,100,000 8,100,000 8,100,000 24,300,000
FBP FBP 79,285,743 100,066,318 106,215,370 285,567,431
FBP2 FBP2 16,287,927 12,795,333 18,083,063 47,166,323
GAR GAR 0 41,000,000 38,600,000 79,600,000
GR GR 8,645,000 0 0 8,645,000
HGC HGC 183,335,000 118,725,000 59,010,000 361,070,000
IF IF 0 241,960,000 84,000,000 325,960,000
KYD KYD 152,551,000 27,200,000 0 179,751,000
NH NH 312,194,000 375,680,000 402,468,500 1,090,342,500
NHPM NHPM 237,269,468 82,493,977 201,729,347 521,492,792
PROT PROT 21,236,000 35,050,000 12,000,000 68,286,000
RRP RRP 3,430,000 3,510,000 0 6,940,000
RRS RRS 790,000 710,000 5,300,000 6,800,000
SAF SAF 71,300,000 71,300,000 71,300,000 213,900,000
SAH SAH 1,800,000 1,800,000 1,800,000 5,400,000
SGF SGF 150,000,000 125,000,000 0 275,000,000
SLO SLO 26,800,000 26,800,000 26,800,000 80,400,000
SLX SLX 7,800,000 7,800,000 7,800,000 23,400,000
SNK SNK 8,600,000 8,600,000 8,600,000 25,800,000
SPP SPP 111,325,000 1,149,243,446 1,396,448,800 2,657,017,246
STP1 STP1 22,620,000 27,790,000 28,300,000 78,710,000
STP2 STP2 41,230,000 48,010,000 48,910,000 138,150,000
STP3 STP3 8,000,000 8,130,000 6,000,000 22,130,000
STP4 STP4 17,550,000 7,640,000 4,915,726 30,105,726
STP5 STP5 2,830,000 21,120,910 13,050,000 37,000,910
STPF STPF 70,567,000 85,858,000 87,190,000 243,615,000
TAP TAP 12,300,000 12,300,000 12,300,000 36,900,000
Total Amount 1,768,458,007 2,908,541,373 2,958,272,944 7,635,272,324
Page 244 of 244